_	The first occasion was in July 1952 when the Chief Surveyor expressed the opinion that Singapore should claim a limit around the island.
_	Medieval city-dwellers were of the opinion that the vroedschap, from which the magistrates were chosen, had to consist of "de weisten, treffelijksten en rijksten van de stadsbevolking" (the wisest, most respected, and richest of the city's population).
_	He was of the opinion that the war was a factor that had caused chaos in the Sadler's Wells Company and rendered valueless years of work.
_	He is of the opinion that management is a profession concerned with control in certain types of systems (enterprises and organizations).
_	Pinkus has expressed the opinion that the later, better-organized sessions stifled much of the spontaneous creativity that had propelled their earlier releases.
_	In 1907 Professor Berthold Laufer stated in his history of glasses that ""the opinion that spectacles originated in India is of the greatest probability and that spectacles must have been known in India earlier than in Europe"".
_	Harrison considered this to be an insult, thinking Congress implied he was the one person in the campaign not worthy of accolades, and he expressed the opinion that it held him up to obloquy and disrespect.
_	In her next race she finished third to the colts Conquistador and Warden of the Marches in the Royal Stakes at Newmarket on 17 October, leading some commentators to offer the opinion that she had been over-rated as a result of wins against an unusually weak crop of three-year-old fillies.
_	He expressed the opinion that accession to the European Union would mean a significant reduction of Czech sovereignty, and did not endorse either side in the 2003 accession referendum, in which 77% voted yes.
_	Furthermore, they argued that Shakespeare on television rarely worked, and they were of the opinion that there was simply no need to do all thirty-seven plays, as many were obscure and would not find an audience amongst the general public, even in England.
_	Many were of the opinion that it would be in all their interests to have a successful franchise in New York.
_	Stephen J. O'Brien from the Laboratory of Genomic Diversity of the National Cancer Institute was of the opinion that they have been separated from each other for only 5,000 years, which is not enough time to be classified as distinct subspecies.
_	German producers were of the opinion that his name was too difficult to pronounce for their consumers so they marketed him as Dravco.
_	Historian Daniel Taylor is of the opinion that the battle's result provided an excuse and that the sackings took place to "demonstrate that the army command was doing something to counteract the poor public opinion of the conduct of the campaign".
_	He is of the opinion that the practice, problems, and central concepts extend all the way to antiquity and refers to a debunking tale as told in some versions of the Old Testament, where the Prophet Daniel exposes a tale of a "living" statue as a scam.
_	I do not know, and I am still of the opinion that the moment a history writer chooses a topic, he has strayed from neutrality."
_	After the Balfour Declaration, he was of the opinion that the Three Oaths were no longer in effect.
_	Poett did find one positive feature of the patrols, however – his fitness levels quickly increased, and he was later of the opinion that he reached the peak of his physical fitness whilst serving at Razmak.
_	Buchanan held the opinion that states did not have the right to secede, but that it was also illegal for the Federal government to go to war to stop them.
_	The Government and opposition jointly mounted what they called the 'Anti-Partition Campaign', arguing the opinion that partition was the only obstacle preventing a united Ireland.
_	Journalists reporting on the conflict passed the opinion that the "UNIF1ED" campaign had failed to present the country as united, and instead had the opposite effect.
_	Orthodox, Sephardim, a majority of Israeli Jews and other Jews, including many whom are not observant, reject critical Bible scholarship and the documentary hypothesis, holding to the opinion that it is contradicted by the Torah and the Talmud, which state that Moses wrote the Torah, as well as by the Mishnah, which asserts the divine origin of the Torah as one of the essential Jewish principles of faith.
_	A boxing writer for South Africa's SuperSport wrote that "Many ringsiders were of the opinion that the decision could have gone in favour of the challenger" on Fightnews.com which was presented the WBA’s Website of the Year in 2010.
_	Other critics are of the opinion that all caps letters in text are often "too tightly packed against each other".
_	He was of the opinion that, unless imposed by force, a universal global language would presuppose a universal global culture, which does not currently exist and is not necessarily desirable.
_	Even though he added the location 'Antwerp' to name the artists and placed them in the year 1520, Friedländer made it clear that he did not intend to limit the group strictly to Antwerp and the time period to circae 1520, even though he was of the opinion that most of the "pseudo-Bles' works originated from Antwerp and Antwerp workshops.
_	Roberts appears to be of the opinion that, while counsel may be necessary to receive a fair trial in some cases, it is not in all cases.
_	He has also referred to himself as a "9/11 liberal", noting that his formerly liberal view of Islam changed as a result of the attacks on September 11, 2001, and he differentiates himself from liberals of the opinion that all religions are alike.
_	Sir Edward Gait in his History of Assam,1906 is of the opinion that the Kachari were the aborigines or earliest inhabitants of the Brahmaputra valley along with the Moran, Motok, Chutiya.
_	Neyman expressed the opinion that hypothesis testing was a generalization of and an improvement on significance testing.
_	That conclusion, if correct, supported the opinion that Cooper had not landed near Lake Merwin nor any tributary of the Lewis River, which feeds into the Columbia well downstream from Tina Bar.
_	Pete Seeger expressed the opinion that this song would last longer than any other written by Dylan.
_	Martin is also of the opinion that "...it is probable that [Hopkins] would have been deeply shocked at the reality of sexual intimacy with another person."
_	Historian Ron Chernow is of the opinion that his frustrations in dealing with government officials during this conflict led him to advocate the advantages of a strong national government and a vigorous executive agency that could get results; other historians tend to ascribe Washington's position on government to his later American Revolutionary War service.
_	On 12 July, "Generalfeldmarschall" Albert Kesselring had visited Sicily and formed the opinion that German troops were fighting virtually on their own.
_	The Tribunal may dismiss an application, in whole or in part, in accordance with its rules if the Tribunal is of the opinion that another proceeding has appropriately dealt with the substance of the application.
_	At the same time, the Ontario government had expressed the opinion that Ontario would need an additional medical school by 1966.
_	Some hold the opinion that the newsgroup should deal with funk music alone, and that the large amount of rap traffic be directed elsewhere.
_	News decided not to follow suit, as senior editors were of the opinion that the graphic images were "unnecessarily distressing".
_	However, Matheson was of the opinion that whilst agreeing that Bentley was of low intelligence, he was not suffering from epilepsy at the time of the alleged offence and he was not a "feeble-minded person" under the Mental Deficiency Acts.
_	The court was of the opinion that the living garden was not fixed in the form as necessary to enjoy copyright protection.
_	In 1943, bishop Grober expressed the opinion that the bishop should remain loyal to the "beloved folk and Fatherland", despite abuses of the "Reichskonkordat".
_	Feder was consulted by a producer who was putting together a documentary about Atlantis for ABC, to follow the release of the network's parent company, Disney's, animated feature "" that same year, and who was "looking for a reputable university anthropologist who was of the opinion that there is [a] historical and cultural connection between Atlantis and the native civilizations of the ancient New World."
_	Experts in Old Javanese literature are of the opinion that the kakawin Hariwangsa was more successful in its execution of the themes that occur in both works.
_	Ferry favours the opinion that "Voyager" misjudged the manoeuvring room she had.
_	Holcroft was of the opinion that the original inside and outside frames were modified whereas Le Fleming was of the opinion that new inside frames would have been required.
_	Kasravi is of the opinion that the text of the Safar-nama has here been corrupted because Qatran, though he spoke Iranian Adhari (the old Iranian language of Azerbaijan before the advent of Oghuz Turks) was fully acquainted with (Khurasani dialect of) Persian, as his Divan shows.
_	This tradition was introduced by Reformator, Martin Luther, as he as of the opinion that one should put the emphasis on Christ's birth and not on a saint's day and do away with the connotation that gifts have to be earned by good behavior.
_	On the motives behind this conversion, Michael J. Neufeld is of the opinion that he turned to religion "to pacify his own conscience", whereas University of Southampton scholar Kendrick Oliver said that von Braun was presumably moved "by a desire to find a new direction for his life after the moral chaos of his service for the Third Reich".
_	Ross was of the opinion that Hanlan did not want to row him and said as much.
_	Three were of the opinion that she was an impostor with little indication of malady.
_	The second holding offers the opinion that real property, being held under a Delaware statutory trust, is eligible to use a 1031 exchange, without the recognition of gain or loss, as long as the following seven restrictions are met:
_	Another group in the General Staff are of the opinion that remilitarization could only be accepted if a full reorganization of the border defense system were to take place and above all if the defensive garrisons were promptly improved.
_	The purpose of the account lying for inspection is to enable any interested party to object to the account if that party is of the opinion that it is incorrect.
_	Weekly in conversations, this name pops up and there are those who are of the opinion that if the name is disliked so much, it should not be brought up regularly.
_	He was of the opinion that the Zoutpansberg was sufficiently distant from British influence to afford the possibility of independence, and chose the location as the capital of his republic.
_	Several pundits praised his performances, expressing the opinion that this goal was the best goal of the season, and the greatest in Toronto FC's club history.
_	Haldane, who did not like Ford, was of the opinion that Ford and Kettlewell had attempted to capitalise on the supposed evolutionary adaptation of the main two variants of the peppered moth, for which Haldane, as early as 1924, had predicted the statistical probability of rate of change from light to melanic forms as an example of classic Mendelian genetics.
_	Botting already regarded the case of the peppered moth as tantamount to belief in Lamarckian evolution, and was of the opinion that some genetic mechanism other than bird predation was at work.
_	Several legal experts and industry analysts have expressed the opinion that the transaction is likely to receive regulatory approval, but would be scrutinized by regulators.
_	Dr. Stein and her work with Jason are mentioned frequently by Professor Bardox in novel "Jason X: Planet of the Beast"; Bardox holds the opinion that Dr. Stein's (who for an unknown reason is referred to being male) work was both "extremely brilliant, and primitive".
_	Cock throwing was traditionally associated with Shrove Tuesday; a contributor to "The Gentleman's Magazine" in 1737, during an anti-Gallican phase of British culture, was of the opinion that cock throwing arose from traditional enmity towards the French, for which the cock played an emblematic role.
_	JFK's friend and associate, historian Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr., for example, expressed the opinion that operatives linked to the CIA were among the most reckless individuals to have operated during the period—providing themselves with unscrutinized freedoms to threaten the lives of Castro and other members of the Cuban revolutionary government regardless of the legislative apparatus in Washington—freedoms that, unbeknownst to those at the White House attempting to prevent a nuclear war, placed the entire U.S.–Soviet relationship in perilous danger.
_	Creutz was of the opinion that his subordinates had disobeyed his orders and gather all the officers for on "Kronan" for a meeting.
_	In 2012 he was publicly criticised by Ian Poulter when Critchley voiced the opinion that 'Poulter, who has his own clothing company, was maybe not focusing on his golf as much as he could.
_	Townend was of the opinion that Price's "exceptional" work represented "one of the most important contributions to Viking studies in recent years, quite possibly in recent decades", dealing as it did with the neglected area of magic in the Viking world.
_	The very close connexion between the religion of the Anglo-Saxons and their laws, many of which are purely ordinances of religious observance enacted by the state, the repeated recognition of the supreme jurisdiction of the Pope, and the various instances of the application in the Church in England of the laws of the Church in general lead to the opinion that the ecclesiastical law of the secrecy of confession was recognized by the law of the land in Anglo-Saxon England.
_	The count at first implored Abraham's help in vain; for he, being a man of independent spirit, held stoutly to the opinion that even the brother of a king was not exempt from the decree of a council.
_	"...the ECB is of the opinion that the introduction by a euro area Member State of a tax, such as envisaged by the draft law, is incompatible with the Treaty."
_	Shanzerwho is of the opinion that Faltonia Betitia Proba likely died in AD 351bases much of her assertion on supposed date inconsistencies and anachronisms within the text.
_	After assessing the evidence, the bulk of which showed Tankard to be the aggressor, the VFA determined that Coulthard was "more to blame" for the fracas, with chairman H. C. A. Harrison expressing the opinion that "bad language is far worse than blows."
_	Wade was of the opinion that the offending fish must have been significantly larger than this to have taken an 18-year-old boy as well as a water buffalo.
_	This apparently low recovery level was partly a presentation issue, because elsewhere the audit expressed the opinion that the recovery could be some 20%.
_	Adolf Loos, architect of the café´s original furnishings, had the opinion that an architect had to focus on the functional aspects and not on the artistic ones.
_	If the sheriff is of the opinion that the items are worth more than R3,000, the sheriff will require the creditor to publish the notice of sale in a local newspaper.
_	After noting the letter from the Bishop of Ossory, the letter states "the views put forward by Troy deserve the highest commendation of the Holy See ... whoever takes the oath in its present form affirms, with God as his witness, that he denounces and rejects the opinion that the pope has power to free subjects from an oath of loyalty taken by them to their rulers, despite the fact that almost all the [P65] old theologians ... and general councils supported this teaching ... such an opinion infringes greatly on the rights of the Holy See".
_	An active columnist, Stubb has stated that he has "always been of the opinion that matters must be discussed openly and honestly".
_	They would be of the opinion that laughing at others is part of the daily life and if others do not like being laughed at, they should just fight back.
_	In 1992, "Propria Cures" published a photo montage of the writer Leon de Winter lying in a mass grave, expressing the opinion that De Winter was exploiting his Jewish background.
_	Similar to the last part, Mao was of the opinion that larger power could be delegated to local authorities.
_	Some of the earlier Title holders, for example Bill Beach, had had numerous challenges to their position but it would seem that nobody was of the opinion that they could beat Towns and no matches were arranged until 1904.
_	This view has been challenged by scholars such as Eric Helleiner, Louis Pauly and Susan Strange, who argue that the US and British administrations encouraged financial liberalization even as early as the late 1950s, when mainstream economics was still largely of the opinion that such a policy would be incompatible with the general welfare.
_	NDP immigration critic Jenny Kwan was of the opinion that "Kellie Leitch continues to spout divisive dog-whistle rhetoric even after her own party rejected her and her ideas."
_	If Zinn had been ten years younger and healthy, "I would have been of the opinion that the facts of the present case justified a sentence of 15 years' imprisonment."
_	Dr Jill Allibone is of the opinion that he might have been protecting himself and his family from the political troubles of the time.
_	He is also of the opinion that Lohgarh was not declared as the capital of the nascent Sikh state because three series of the coins issued by Banda Bahadur form 1710-12 does not carry any name of the city or town after the word zarb meaning ‘minted at’.
_	Gerard noted that he had lilacs growing “in very great plenty” in 1597, but lilacs were not mentioned by Shakespeare, and John Loudon was of the opinion that the Persian lilac had been introduced into English gardens by John Tradescant the elder.
_	Curtius is of the opinion that he wished to be begged to take the position.
_	Groom was of the opinion that Vardon was only entitled to the allowance from 15 February 1908.
_	Cohen found unsupported the opinion that, compared to civilians, veterans possess "sheer moral authority" or "are uniquely qualified to make judgments on matters of war and peace."
_	Montrose then ingenuously asked him if he had any objection to accompany him to Edinburgh, and on Huntly confessing that he would rather not, expressed the opinion that it would be well for him to do it.
_	Hermann Balck was of the opinion that they were the best troops that he met in both world wars.
_	Eric Hobsbawm, who had been previously attacked by Conquest for his book "Age of Extremes", while praising Conquest's "The Great Terror" "as a remarkable pioneer effort to assess the Stalin Terror", expressed the opinion that this work and others were now to be considered obsolete "simply because the archival sources are now available", thus there was not need any more for "using fragmentary sources" and "guesswork" as "when better or more complete data are available, they must take the place of poor and incomplete ones".
_	In February 2010, together with 13 other leading stem cell researchers, he wrote an open letter to journal editors to voice the opinion that obstructive reviews by a small number of researchers in the field were hindering publication of novel stem cell research.
_	In a national survey in 2015 across all races, 57% of Americans had the opinion that the Confederate flag represented Southern pride rather than racism.
_	Today, however, the majority is of the opinion that the tribal term "Cowlitz" is a regional collective designation applied by the Europeans to ethnically and linguistic different groups or bands of Indian peoples of the entire Cowlitz River Basin (Eugene Hunn: Anthropological Study of Yakama Tribe: Traditional Resource Harvest Sites
_	Holdsworth is of the opinion that the gist of this action was unlawful detention.
_	Ames is of the opinion that this case represents not so much an action, but a formal demand made in court for the return of the chattel, which, if denied, could be followed by an appeal.
_	The actor and writer Stephen Fry was of the opinion that the coverage was "mind-numbingly tedious", while Ben Dowell in "The Guardian" singled out the lack of television coverage given to the composers and performers who were commissioned to write music and perform on the Thames barges.
_	As early as the 5th century BCE the Greek philosopher Hippo expressed the opinion that cultigens (as we call them now) were produced from wild plants as the result of the care bestowed on them by man, a revolutionary view at a time when they were regarded as the special creation and gift of the gods.
_	He was of the opinion that the 200,000 to 400,000 rape victims was an underestimation.
_	Mary Clarke of "The Guardian" was less positive describing the ballet as "nauseating" and finishing her review with the opinion that "Sir Fred would have been appalled."
_	In the Santa Clara case the court reporter, Bancroft Davis, noted in the headnote to the opinion that the Chief Justice, Morrison Waite, began oral argument by stating, "The court does not wish to hear argument on the question whether the provision in the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution, which forbids a State to deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws, applies to these corporations.
_	We are all of the opinion that it does."
_	The argument that because 75% of people polled think the answer is A implies that the answer is A fails, because, if opinion did determine truth, then there would be no way to deal with the discrepancy between the 75% of the sample population that believe the answer is A and 25% who are of the opinion that the answer is not A.
_	Shastri was of the opinion that many more fragments could be recovered.
_	While many historians believe that this monastery which was mistaken for a fort was Odantapura, some are of the opinion that it was Nalanda itself.
_	Glenn Reynolds, a Professor of Law at the University of Tennessee, expressed the opinion that as a former U.S. senator, Boren should have known that the university was breaking the law in expelling the two students.
_	Some are at the opinion that Ayyappan might have left the troupe or the place with other women as he has forcefully captured the ornaments of Rohini the day before he went missing.
_	Bulgarian historian Plamen Pavlov is of the opinion that Aldimir and George's ancestors had sought refuge in Bulgaria after 1241, when they left the Kingdom of Hungary amidst sedition.
_	"It might be well to abstain from use of the word 'orthogenesis' .. since so many of the geneticists seem to be of the opinion that the use of the term implies some supernatural force."
_	The Court was also of the opinion that in India Article 21 was given relative pride of place in its constitutional framework due to the "economic, social and political conditions prevailing in India and the pro-active approach of the Indian Supreme Court in matters relating to the social and economic conditions of the people of India".
_	Begg expressed the opinion that while Corsetti's superiors deserved a heavy load of responsibility for the abuses at Bagram and Abu Ghraib, low level soldiers like his friend Corsetti couldn't escape all responsibility if they committed illegal acts.
_	"After consideration we are of the opinion that the word "person" contained in the rules regulating the admission of attorneys and counselors should be construed to include a woman as well as a man; and that the masculine pronoun "he" contained in the rules should be construed to include the feminine "she."
_	Govett was of the opinion that the Scriptures should always be open to a fresh scrutiny, based upon new light that might have been received and, because of this, as the years passed, he became independent of many of the denominational views that he had previously adhered to.
_	Lieutenant Colonel Edward Nicolls states there were no deaths among the British, and is of the opinion that the Americans suffered 15 fatalities and numerous casualties.
_	Bernard Lewis is of the opinion that the word in Cairo Geniza interpreted as Khazaria is actually Hakkari and therefore it relates to the Kurds of the Hakkari mountains in southeast Turkey.
_	Nicolaas and the secret political societies which were formed were of the opinion that this issue had to be resolved at all costs, and that Johan Valckenaer and his friends were the most appropriate people to draw up a Dutch-language constitution.
_	Professor Ernst Christmann, however, was of the opinion that there were already settlers in what is now Oberstaufenbach by 900, for Emperor Otto I in 945 granted a liegeman six "Königshufen" (an area of land) that lay between Bosenbach and Reichenbach, that is to say, within what are now Oberstaufenbach’s and Niederstaufenbach’s limits.
_	In 1870, some Reform Jews published the opinion that intermarriage is prohibited.
_	During the final days of the battle, Simmons was transferred and ordered to command the British forces in the 'Southern Area' of the battlefield, when the decision to surrender became apparent he joined fellow commanders in voicing the opinion that continued resistance was ill-advised.
_	The article in "El Sol" also expressed the opinion that "the United States is a nation of realities, declaring that Spain in its foreign policy does not possess that quality."
_	Perrier, with the assistance of Ned McGowan, a friend of the two suspects, was of the opinion that in the interests of a fair hearing he needed to hear evidence from the victim Dixon, before proceeding to deal with the persons who had committed the assault.
_	While the trips helped to develop his fascism, his attendance at the Nuremberg Rally of 1937 left him of the opinion that Nazism was impressive but not without its flaws.
_	We are of the opinion that the dextrinoid reaction of the metuloids in "Dextrinocystidium" is not an important character for generic separation."
_	Douglas' biographer, Edward Hubbard, was of the opinion that the design of the building was influenced by the writings of John Ruskin and George Gilbert Scott, particularly in the use of polychromy.
_	A contact knew the address of the leading British dramatist Alan Bennett who, after seeing his script, was of the opinion that Abbott had written a perfectly acceptable piece of work which he would be happy to endorse.
_	The site is larger than any other known archaeological site in the area, thus strengthening the opinion that this is the site of Paria la Vieja.
_	On the other hand, the balanced type (i.e. contextual ambidexterity) is consistent with the systems approach of fit across multiple dimensions, but contradicts the opinion that organizational choice is discrete.
_	Maitland, in his essays on "Roman Canon Law in the Church of England", expresses the opinion that the ecclesiastical courts in England regarded the general body of canon law, including the various papal decrees and rescripts and the commentaries of the various great writers, as their law, which they had to administer.
_	Two women may be nominated as members by the Governor of Jammu and Kashmir if he is of the opinion that women are not adequately represented.
_	Andrea Palladio, in the Preface to his "Quattro Libri" was of the opinion that Sansovino's Biblioteca Marciana was the best building erected since Antiquity.
_	The following excerpt from Michigan's 1919 yearbook outlines the opposing arguments: "Eastern critics were of the opinion that the Maize and Blue team was rightfully entitled to claim the honors, but western writers held that since Illinois played four Conference games, all of which went to them, they should hold the honors.
_	Pasarell also had a very good service, and in 1967 at the U.S. National Indoors, the celebrated writer and player Eugene Scott gave the opinion that Pasarell and Ashe had the two hardest serves in the world.
_	Published in his report on the generation of fever in Edwin Chadwick’s “Report on the sanitary condition of the laboring population,” despite the general feeling of many physicians at the time, Alison was of the opinion that malarias, or diseases, were not a result of putrescent animal and vegetable matters or human excretions, as many medical professionals believed, but rather was convinced that some diseases were “nearly beyond the power of medicine, but the causes of which are known, and under certain circumstances may be avoided; and the conditions necessary for avoiding them are in a great measure in the power of communities, though beyond the power of many of the individuals composing them.
_	Professor of art history Jan Svanberg is of the opinion that since Birger Jarl (died 1266) wore a ducal coronet of English and continental European design, he actually was a duke, and that his Latin title of "Dux Sueorum" should be given as "Duke and Regent of Sweden" in English.
_	Paul Collins of "Total Sci-Fi" expressed the opinion that "Children of Earth" finally shows Gwen's heroic characteristics in a way that had been missing in the first two series, while Daniel Martin from the "Guardian" stated that "it's great to see Gwen being so completely badass".
_	He said that his gold medal "changes the opinion that Asian countries don't get good results in sprint races.
_	Some people are of the opinion that wholesaling is fraudulent misrepresentation since the wholesaler does not actually intend to close on the property themselves.
_	Upon the death of his father, instead of becoming Baron Archibald, he renounced the peerage, expressing the opinion that hereditary honours were empty honours.
_	From the indications, blood near the rifle pits, etc., I am of the opinion that we wounded some of the Indians.
_	In 1983, Gujarati writer Suresh Joshi also returned the Award on the grounds that his book, "Chintayami Manasa", did not, in his opinion, deserve the Award, and also expressed the opinion that the Award was generally granted to authors who were "spent forces".
_	Andrew Langdon is of the opinion that it originally stood in the churchyard.
_	The Associated Press was of the opinion that the Dutch had "turned far too often to dirty tactics".
_	The Raceform representative was of the opinion that Bregawn, " must be considered an unlucky loser".
_	Various characters repeatedly put forth the opinion that, over time, Objects lead to something akin to bad karma or bad luck for their owners.
_	Castrén was of the opinion that Russia was seeking systematically to prevent all development towards freer conditions in Finland, and concluded from this that the Finns must begin to prepare a revolt against Russia.
_	The Court of Appeal was of the opinion that customary international law cannot be incorporated into the meaning of the word "law" in Article 9(1) of the Constitution.
_	Given the existence of the mandatory death penalty in several Singapore statutes, the Court was of the opinion that it could not treat the alleged customary international law rule prohibiting inhuman punishment as part of Singapore common law.
_	He was of the opinion that on basis of accurate measurements, the identity of the individual could be recorded.
_	Some people were of the opinion that J.Crew was challenging traditional gender identity roles, although author Jo B. Paoletti said that it was "no big deal".
_	The FIS Council was of the opinion that Fredrica Selva and Ieva Januškevičiūtė "were victims of the manipulated races", and forwarded the information to the International Olympic Committee.
_	The architectural historian Nikolaus Pevsner expressed the opinion that the west wing is the "outstanding domestic work" of Paley and Austin.
_	Most of the people were of the opinion that media has projected a negative image of women and brought her weak points to the forefront.
_	His mother was of the opinion that he should join the Marathas as they had helped his father previously on numerous occasions.
_	The four dissenting judges were of the opinion that such broad powers are necessary to implement legislative intent and authority under Article I and concerns about the reduced efficiency of the bankruptcy courts.
_	(According to John and Mai Malone, Grehan Barlow, an historical architect from Birmingham who visited the house in the late 1990s, was of the opinion that the Phibbses had built a house at Woodbrook in 1671; this would imply an earlier structure either on or close to the site of the present house.)
_	Rabbi Judah haNasi was of the opinion that the girdle of the ordinary priest was of "shatnez", but Rebbi Eleazar says it was of fine linen.
_	Gembarowicz (another Polish researcher) is of the opinion that the Muscovite army was about 40,000 strong.
_	The new Hungarian Minister of Foreign Affairs, István Csáky, advocated the opinion that Hungarian steps did not have the expected effects, increased anti-Hungarian moods, caused disillusionment of the last Hungarophiles and pushed the Slovak government into cooperation with the central Czechoslovak government.
_	In "Lingens", the European Court of Human Rights was of the opinion that a politician "inevitably and knowingly lays himself open to close scrutiny of his every word and deed by both journalists and the public at large, and he must consequently display a greater degree of tolerance".
_	We are of the opinion that the suggested "preferred" role of the mother is not a principle, a presumption, a preference, or even a norm.
_	Edna Gundersen of "USA Today", reviewing the songs on "Dangerous", offered the opinion that Jackson's "heartfelt" delivery redeemed the "fairy-tale cliches" of "Gone Too Soon".
_	Cuccinelli expressed the opinion that some provisions would be redundant, given existing laws, and others would be unconstitutional.
_	Gerard Iannelli, director of the U.S. Metric Program, gave the opinion that Americans have so far not done so because of the effort it takes to "translate" from customary to metric units when both measurements are not shown.
_	In contrast to inaccessible Kohr Kharfot, many LDS researchers are now of the opinion that Kohr Rori better meets all of the 12 key points addressed by Aston and others as well as additional aspects they failed to address.
_	The CIA offered the opinion that containing Hussein for six months would result in the collapse of his regime.
_	Burke was of the opinion that the holiday was too "European."
_	He was of the opinion that "If a day of thanksgiving must take place, let it be done by the authority of the States."
_	Mark Benady, vice president of Gibraltar's Jewish community, is of the opinion that the area's infrastructure, including its four synagogues, could support a community of 2,000.
_	The archaeologist A. Bon, who excavated the fortress, was of the opinion that the fortress measured 225 m by 130 m in size.
_	The latter held the opinion that Craft Freemasonry consisted of three degrees only and that the Royal Arch was at the most an extension of the third (Master Mason's) degree which was to be administered separately.
_	The Government were of the opinion that as it was substantially different from that of a general election and that as a national referendum the United Kingdom was a single constituency and favoured an unprecedented single national count of all the votes for the whole country to take place at Earls Court in London over several days with one declaration of the final result by the National Counting Officer (later in the legislation the title was changed to Chief Counting Officer) but the proposal didn't attract the wider support of the Labour Party or the opposition parties; the Liberal Party favoured individual counts in each of the parliamentary constituencies and tabled an amendment, but was defeated by 263 to 131 votes in the House of Commons; however, another amendment, tabled in the Commons by Labour MP Roderick MacFarquhar, sought to have separate counts for each administrative region (the post-1974 county council areas): this won cross-party support, and was carried by 272 to 155 votes.
_	If the Central Government is of the opinion that, having regard to the use of any controlled substance in the production or manufacture of any narcotic drug or psychotropic substance, it is necessary or expedient so to do in the public interest, it may, by order, provide for regulating or prohibiting the production, manufacture, supply and distribution thereof and trade and commerce therein.
_	Some have the opinion that it is inconceivable that Mozart wrote a homotonal concerto (i.e. with all three movements in the same key; here E-flat major).
_	Schabako in der Tat richtig ist...” or ‘In contrast to my exposition at the [2014] Munster colloquium, I am now of the opinion that the (new) succession Shebitku-Shabako is in fact correct…
_	More than one prince named Nayan existed and their identity is confused; the historian Pelliot was of the opinion that the Christian prince Nayan was not a descendant of Belgutai.
_	National Security Advisor Brajesh Mishra was reportedly of the opinion that Jain had not effectively defended India’s decision to conduct the Pokhran II tests, with reporters like KP Nayar arguing that Jain was against the idea and had communicated this to the South African government.
_	On the other hand, both citizens and law authorities shared the opinion that drunkenness was an unacceptable excuse, so if a crime was committed in such a state the felon must be fully prosecuted.
_	In his book "The Blind Watchmaker", Dawkins introduced the term "hierarchical reductionism" to describe the opinion that complex systems can be described with a hierarchy of organizations, each of which is only described in terms of objects one level down in the hierarchy.
_	Some researchers are of the opinion that it is impossible to find a consistent theory of transformation processes, because of the historical, political and social particularities of each country and their different types of transformation processes.
_	He expresses the opinion that "it takes about 10 years of maximal concentration and effort to get to fly against the masters".
_	He was of the opinion that the abbey of Dol may have had at its head from time to time abbots with episcopal jurisdiction, but that Dol was not the seat of a diocese.
_	Marx is of the opinion that alienation reaches its peak once labour becomes wage labour.
_	He is of the opinion that only providing quality education and grooming influence on mind, character or physical ability of an individual.
_	IV, is of the opinion that these vows took the place of those the censors used to make in the times of the Republic for the prosperity and preservation thereof.
_	He was of the opinion that traditional members of the Kirk, “may not be convinced by some of the plans, particularly the suggestion that there should be bishops.
_	The future "Citizen King", Louis-Philippe, duc d'Orléans, witnessed these events as a young officer and was of the opinion that the soldiers would have obeyed orders if put to the test.
_	She has also directed criticism towards justice minister Beatrice Ask, who expressed the opinion that suspected sex buyers should be exposed by media; Ramberg said that it was a "scary opinion".
_	Despite being handsomely paid "under the table", Botha was of the opinion that he could earn more in professional sport and thus he travelled to the United States in 1983 on the invitation of the American football team the Dallas Cowboys to try out as a placekicker.
_	In that year Mather and Ash were successfully sued by William Hutchison, J.P. (ca.1841–1914), for a libel accusing the wealthy squatter of dummying, and giving the opinion that Justices of the Peace should be free of such taint.
_	Furthermore, the groups voiced the opinion that " too often exclude scholars with diverse perspectives while stifling discourse on critical issues.
_	European culture equally self-identified as Hyperborean; thus Washington Irving, in elaborating on Astoria in the Pacific Northwest, was of the opinion that
_	The survey was taken by 2601 people, and unaudited reports claim that 54% thought there would be challenges and drawbacks to modernisation, with 91.4% of the opinion that on balance the benefits of modernisation outweighed the drawbacks.
_	Anaxagoras (500–428 BCE) was of the opinion that matter of the universe had an innate capacity for infinite division.
_	Judging the circumstances to be inappropriate to the establishment of British institutions in the colony, Murray was of the opinion that it would be more practical to keep the current civil institutions.
_	Tony Morris, writing in the "Racing Post", offered the opinion that "a star was born" in the Nell Gwyn.
_	Kakalios is of the opinion that the most unrealistic aspect of the comic-book universe is often the sociology.
_	“At present there are some knowledgeable people who have expressed the opinion that "Khun Chang Khun Phaen" is an immoral book and a bad example which should be burnt or destroyed, so no one may read it from now on.
_	When Mossadegh called for the dissolution of the Majlis in August 1953, the editors of the "New York Times" gave the opinion that: "A plebiscite more fantastic and farcical than any ever held under Hitler or Stalin is now being staged in Iran by Premier Mossadegh in an effort to make himself unchallenged dictator of the country."
_	In her history of the Gregynog Press, Dorothy A. Harrop reports that Robert Maynard (the Controller of the Press) "came to be of the opinion that Hodgson was probably the best pressman in the country at that time. …
_	The archbishop was not adverse to the idea and Perron's investigation was of the opinion that Anselm's remains were probably intact and misidentified as Theobald's, but the matter was uncertain and seems to have been dropped.
_	But she stated the opinion that because she lacked the medical expertise to evaluate the position of the camp's medical authorities she lacked jurisdiction to rule on the petition.
_	Testimony also expressed the opinion that the mission to mitigate vulnerability and prepare for natural hazard disasters before they occurred had been separated from disaster preparedness functions, making the nation more vulnerable to known hazards, like hurricanes.
_	You know that I have always been of the opinion that one should follow fashion moderately, but never carry it to excess.
_	Duncker was confident that he would be able to sustain the business, but Frölich's widow was vehemently of the opinion that he was too young and inexperienced to do so.
_	James Hunter of "Rolling Stone" magazine noted that musically, Jackson was no longer trying to hide any eccentricities he had, he expressed the opinion that in "They Don't Care About Us", the pop musician sounded more embattled than ever.
_	Verse 7.7 of the Bhagavad Gita, is often used to support the opinion that Krishna himself is the "Svayam Bhagavan", and that no impersonal form of Brahman supersedes his existence, as it is a common view that Bhagavad Gita was propounding Krishna-theism before first major proponents of monism.
_	David McGee, Milo Miles, and Mark Kemp, of "Rolling Stone" magazine, are of the opinion that "Anthology" is one of the best of Berry's compilation albums.
_	Most drug addiction programs are of the opinion that a "slow onset, long duration" DRI is less likely to be abused (c.f. Volkow and others).
_	However the City of Chester Swimming Club were of the opinion that the new baths would not be suitable for competitive swimming or for water polo.
_	I remain of the opinion that the safest legal course would be to secure the adoption of a further resolution to authorise the use of force...
_	Opposition to the Congress revolved around the opinion that the provincial houses of assembly were the proper agencies to solicit redress for grievances.
_	A month after dropping out of the race, Huntsman offered the opinion that there was a need for a third party in America.
_	In 1999, a critic was of the opinion that "Some Disordered Interior Geometries" was "a distinctively bizarre book…
_	However, Lockwood stresses the distinction between global climate change and regional-and-seasonal climate changes and is of the opinion that solar modulation of the winter, northern hemisphere jet stream might well result in Europe experiencing a higher fraction of cold winters.
_	Henry's former Arsenal and France teammate Emmanuel Petit wrote that "The feeling among the French public on Thursday morning was one of embarrassment – we didn't want to qualify in controversial circumstances, we wanted to beat Ireland by playing within the rules" and "Thierry's handball will not send out a good message", but he was of the opinion that this "very rare indiscretion" would not damage his reputation, explaining that "There is a referee on the pitch and if he didn't see that's not France's problem."
_	French player Patrice Evra questioned the patriotism of those French people attacking Henry, and was of the opinion that those same people would have criticised Henry had he informed the referee he had committed handball.
_	He expressed the opinion that Germany would shortly win the war, but he was a long way out in his calculation, as Germany was defeated six weeks later.
_	"Remarques sur la Bibliothèque ecclésiastique de M. Dupin" (Paris, 1691–93), in which he points out many errors; "Dissertation historique et théologique dana laquelle on examine quel a été le sentiment du Concile de Constance et des principaux Théologiens qui y ont assisté, sur l'autorité du pape et sur son infaillibilité" (Luxemburg, 1724), in which the author defends the opinion that the decree of the Council of Constance concerning the superiority of a general council over the pope was intended only for the time of a schism; "Dissertationes historicæ, criticæ, chronologicæ in Sacram Scripturam Veteris Testamenti" (Toul, 1699); "Justification de la morale et de la discipline de Rome et de toute l'Italie" (1727), a reply to an anonymous treatise entitled:
_	Stephens is of the opinion that the author’s motivation for the study is not merely historical or ethnographic, but rather in "rescuing the state of missionary work in South Asia".
_	Already having converted from two Christian denominations, Abbot Burder then came to the opinion that the rigorous Trappist life was too hard for Englishmen and made controversial plans for separating the monastery from the Trappist General Chapter and affiliating it to the Benedictines.
_	Some scholars hold the opinion that Dhul-Kifl was Buddha."the one of Kapeel" as the sound
_	William Logan is of the opinion that Vellaattiri was also not directly under the Chera kings but enjoyed more freedom and rights than other chieftains under them.
_	Roger Bacon held the opinion that language was but a veil covering up eternal truths, hiding them from human experience.
_	News technology writer Rory Cellan-Jones was of the opinion that the blackout achieved its objectives but possibly at some cost to Wikipedia's reputation.
_	Shalom Laytin, co-owner of Brake Masters, is of the opinion that "those complaints have been properly addressed by the company".
_	The geologist Jan Zonneveld, who worked at the Centraal Bureau Luchtkartering in Paramaribo, around 1950, after studying the use of water level profiles, field research and the interpretation of aerial photographs, was of the opinion that on the surface not two, but three elements should be distinguished, namely from north to south. :
_	I am absolutely of the opinion that war with the United States is such a serious matter that everything has to be undertaken to avoid it.
_	Lins Honeyman rated the album a perfect ten squares, is of the opinion that it "is full of inventive and innovative dance-oriented worship that thrills as well as inspires," and commended the production team behind the project for "breaking away from the formulaic worship albums that flood the market at this moment in time."
_	A modern writer has hazarded the opinion that "he was no relation of Qutb al-Din" but was selected as his successor as he was available on the spot.
_	Based on the opinion that surface water infiltration from irrigation contributed to the landslide, seventy-one homeowners sued La Conchita Ranch Co. in Bateman v. La Conchita Ranch Co.
_	A report published in October 2010 by Research Councils UK voiced the opinion that cuts to research and development are likely to do immense damage to the UK economy.
_	Representatives of Public Citizen, the Electronic Frontier Foundation and the Citizen Media Law Project were all of the opinion that Beck's trademark argument in his complaint against the website was ridiculous.
_	On one hand, media barrister Hugh Tomlinson QC is of the opinion that "in practice, the law of libel provides no sanction against the publication of spent convictions".
_	While most of the press were of the opinion that the final decision was unjust, some independent observers, including Timeform, supported the Turf Club, pointing out that Starkey was at least as culpable as Eddery for the bumping which occurred and that King Lake had appeared to win on merit.
_	He was of the opinion that the abbey of Dol may have had at its head from time to time abbots with episcopal jurisdiction, but that Dol was not the seat of a diocese.
_	In its closing paragraph, the Board emphasized that its abstention from that discussion was not intended to intimate any dissent from the opinion that the Supreme Court of Canada had previously given on the matter.
_	The two dissenting judges on the bench, Justice Asif Saeed Khosa and Justice Gulzar Ahmed, were of the opinion that Sharif had not been honest to the nation and should be disqualified from office.
_	Maurice Collis holds the opinion that Pinto's accounts, while not entirely true, remain compatible with historical events.
_	He was of the opinion that only a separate state would help the tribals and backward communities to develop.
_	If it is not "apparent from the four corners” of the opinion that the judgment rests on an independent state law rule, then, unless it is “necessary or desirable” to obtain clarification from the state court itself, the Supreme Court will presume that the decision rested in part on federal law, thereby rendering it reviewable.
_	The first glance of this scene hurries our senses into the opinion that this earth has been created in time, that the mountains were formed first, that the rivers began to flow afterwards, that in this place particularly they have been so dammed up by the Blue Ridge of mountains as to have formed an ocean which filled the whole valley; that, continuing to rise, they have at last broken over at this spot and have torn the mountain down from its summit to its base.
_	The second, from Roger Henderson QC, expressed the opinion that use of swaps to hedge their own borrowing by a local authority was lawful, but not swaps for speculative trading.
_	The author is of the opinion that the dolls work through the power of suggestion, and that even in cases of conscious scepticism unconscious belief might have an effect.
_	Sil argues that Ramakrishna is a product of Vivekananda's "Mythmaking and Propaganda", Scholars Max Müller, Walter G. Neevel, Christopher Isherwood have expressed the opinion that Vivekananda has presented an accurate picture of Ramakrishna.
_	Some commentators have expressed the opinion that the decision does not postulate a general rule with respect to surveillance measures through new technology.
_	How the Australian Electoral Commission arrived at this opinion is unknown; it runs contrary to the opinions of Chief Justice Sir Garfield Barwick, who wrote that voters must actually mark the ballot paper and deposit that ballot into a ballot box, and Justice Blackburn who was of the opinion that casting an invalid vote was a violation of the Act.
_	FIBA Europe president Ólafur Rafnsson was on the opinion that "it was an excellent choice as Hungary has tradition in basketball and especially in women's basketball."
_	Paul was of the opinion that Friedrich Schelling was the author, having noticed some similarities with his "Gianozzo".
_	The current use for this quotation is to bolster with Franklin's authority the opinion that republics require the cultivation of specific political beliefs, interests, and habits among their citizens, and that if those habits are not cultivated, they are in danger of falling back into some sort of authoritarian rule, such as a monarchy.
_	Cambridge won the coin toss and chose to start from the southern side, the Surrey side, of the River Thames, based on the opinion that taking a lead early in the race would give them an advantage.
_	Its founders were of the opinion that it was easier to shorten the course than to lengthen it.
_	In his subsequent writings, however, he admitted to serious faults in his use of Sitchin’s theory and proposed an alternative, cataclysm theory of ancient myth: "I am now firmly of the opinion that these gods personified the falling sky; in other words, the descent of the gods was a poetic rendition of the cataclysm myth which stood at the heart of ancient Near Eastern religions."
_	Bell was of the opinion that Vasco had added romantic sections to the original text, which was mostly poetry written during the reign of King Dinis.
_	She expresses the opinion that people in the new world no longer have souls, and appears eager to volunteer herself and her children to become category one—effectively committing suicide.
_	He concluded the review with the opinion that "It's déjà vu all over again from "God Hates Us All" — and once you've titled something "God Hates Us All," haven't you made your point enough already?"
_	Culture critic Joseph Vogel was of the opinion that it fulfilled Jackson's creative ambitions and was at once his most socially conscious record, "his most personally revealing", and "a dazzling musical odyssey", comparing it to Stevie Wonder's "Songs in the Key of Life" as "the work of an artist engaging with the world around him-and inside him-as never before."
_	DPubS has been designed with the opinion that “libraries should get involved in publishing."
_	Two witnesses have said that LaPaz told them he was of the opinion that the Roswell crash object was an unmanned extraterrestrial probe.
_	Kurt's choice of "I'm the Greatest Star" to audition for the role of Tony—the one song not from "West Side Story"—drew comment: Benigno ascribed it to Kurt's "ability to make a talented ass of himself", while Slezak was of the opinion that Kurt was "way too savvy, and way too hungry for the role" for that kind of misstep.
_	The couple had bought a house and her husband wanted to put the house in her name, but Shammi was of the opinion that since her sister-in law was not doing anything, Ahmed should put the house in his sister's name.
_	The series' stunt man and stunt arranger Ray Austin expressed the opinion that the show's violence ultimately harmed its popular success in the United States.
_	It addresses perceived injustices committed against minorities by the French political system and the opinion that even though there is a large number of people of African and Arab origins in France, they are poorly represented in politics.
_	In Great Britain, "Discworld" author Terry Pratchett, up until the point of his death in 2015, emphasized that he was careful not to read fanfics, and had voiced the opinion that "everything works if people are sensible" and didn't mind "so long as people don't put it where I can trip over it".
_	Fahey expressed the opinion that this would not be a fatal obstacle for an advanced SST development.
_	King responded to the objections by stating that the "Government is of the opinion that the sales were made at a fair price."
_	Neither had much writing experience and based its contents upon the "Northern Star" and other Chartist publications and "had formed the opinion that the effectiveness of an article was dependent upon the amount of treason it contained".
_	Arnoux, who was placed second in the championship at the start of the weekend, was of the opinion that "if only FOCA cars take part in the race, then it can't count for championship points".
_	In the article “The Revolution Against ‘Capital’,” Gramsci expressed the opinion that the October Revolution negated Marxist materialism.
_	So instead of noticing features that would make their job easier, Fortran programmers of the time noticed COBOL syntax and had the opinion that it was a business language, while COBOL programmers noticed Fortran syntax and looked upon it as a scientific language.
_	Muggeridge is firmly of the opinion that the information Foote sent "could only, in fact, have come from Bletchley".
_	This work greatly expanded the number of finds, and is of the opinion that the site is one of largest late-Clovis sites in New England.
_	Sephardic and Hasidic authorities are of the opinion that the blessing on laying the head-tefillin is not necessary and the one blessing on laying the arm-tefillin is sufficient.
_	However, since there have already been those from the Edo period like Sekien Toriyama who created many new "yōkai", there is also the opinion that it is unreasonable to criticize modern creations without doing the same for classical creations too.
_	And, "The party leader based these proposals on the opinion that the German people were not capable of making up their minds and that they therefore were not yet ready for the free press."
_	Some authors are of the opinion that Galician possesses no real dialects.
_	IN 1938 Paul Bartsch was of the opinion that "Leucosyrinx clionella" was actually as synonym of "Burchia clionella", agreeing in radular characters with Y-shaped marginals only as well in the shell's appearance.
_	Some are of the opinion that Dhul Kifl could be Ezekiel.
_	He was of the opinion that the allegations of harassment was a lack of respect and refuted allegations of exorcism.
_	Sławek was of the opinion that such an alliance, aimed at the Third Reich, would end in a Polish-German war.
_	Unlike his predecessor, who valued a broad gamut of research activities, Burnet was of the opinion that the institute could not make a significant impact at global level in this way, and he pursued a policy of focusing all effort into one area at a time.
_	Muslim interpretations of these verses are varied, but classical Muslim scholars seemed to have been of the opinion that Dhul-Qarnayn's journey was real, not allegorical, and that Dhul-Qarnayn's wall is also a real, physical wall somewhere on Earth.
_	Though many new papers, academic researchers and some of its followers consider it as a separate religion, many of the followers are even of the opinion that this is but a Hindu sect rather than an autonomous religion.
_	In general the commentators have been of the opinion that he was Alexander the Great but the characteristics of Zul-Qarnain described in the Quran are not applicable to him.
_	We are also of the opinion that probably Zul-Qarnain was Cyrus, but the historical facts, which have come to light up to this time, are not sufficient to make any categorical assertion.
_	When John Knox, on account of his letter about the mass, was in 1563 accused of treason, Spens came to him privately, and expressed the opinion that Knox had not been guilty of anything punishable by law.
_	In 2003 Kulliyat-i-Yagana was compiled by Pakistani scholar and writer Mushfiq Khwaja and has the opinion that Yagana or his publishers appeared to be naive regarding the art of presentation.
_	In November 2011 the United Nations Working Group on Arbitrary Detention adopted the opinion that the detention was disproportional and breached human rights conventions.
_	He was of the opinion that "until we have provided and cared for the oppressed laboring man in our own midst, we should not extend our sympathy to the laboring men of other States."
_	The Court was of the opinion that the initial withdrawal of the appeal was a nullity as Yong had failed to appreciate the fact that he could have proceeded with his appeal on points of law, namely, challenging the compatibility of the mandatory death penalty with Articles 9(1) and 12(1) of the Constitution of Singapore.
_	They expressed the opinion that the lyrics used were unsuitable for young audiences because they might not understand the song's context and that the song was ambiguous for some of the listeners.
_	In spite of diminishing film use, some concert photographers continue to shoot with film as they prefer the film aesthetic, and others are of the opinion that negative film captures more information than digital technology, and has less margin for exposure error.
_	"I am of the opinion that MCC officers have resorted to the use of force as a first response to situations where verbal techniques ... would have been more appropriate," he said.
_	He is of the opinion that "Brook is so intent on cost and the grim injustice of expropriation that he can seem crassly unresponsive, indifferent to the almost beatific peace of the paintings" and "knows everything about price, but rather less about value."
_	The smiths gave the opinion that the iron required more work than common redshort iron and was weaker when cold.
_	After careful consideration, Sawyer decided that he was "of the opinion that a native of China, of the Mongolian race, is not a white person" and due to this Ah Yup was denied citizenship to the United States of America.
_	In his post-war memoir, "Hitler Was My Friend", Hoffmann expressed the opinion that Raubal killed herself because she was in love with someone other than Hitler, and could not take Hitler's rabidly jealous control of her life, especially after he found out that she had had an affair with Emil Maurice, Hitler's old comrade and chaffeur.
_	János Ladányi, a Hungarian sociologist, was of the opinion that the anti-gypsy attitude reached such an irrational level that even a civil war was possible.
_	His extraordinary spending spree is cited as one of the causes of the serious impoverishment of the people he ruled, adding to the opinion that his reign was exclusively negative.
_	There was a bit of truth in the opinion that race cars had very little in common with common commercial cars, with their oversized engines and extreme solutions.
_	Jenny Kitzinger (2005), a famous focus group researcher, is of the opinion that focus group method is an ‘ideal’ approach for examining the stories, experiences, points of view, beliefs, needs and concerns of individuals.
_	The court also gave the opinion that a digital music player, as an entire unit or device, could not be considered an audio recording medium.
_	Baker himself was of the opinion that ""the squad of players he [Matthews] has should see us challenging for more silverware next season.""
_	The authors were of the opinion that the nasal horn of the USNM 2412 skull could have been lost when the animal was alive or when it became fossilized., and that all three "genera" actually represent different aged individuals of "Triceratops".
_	Meillet offered the opinion that oral-formulaic composition might be a distinctive feature of orally transmitted epics (which the "Iliad" was said to be).
_	Though Wainger wrote that these symptoms would affect Brown's work, he was also of the opinion that he would be able to continue teaching if given psychotherapy and medication.
_	Because the use of Standard Yoruba did not result from some deliberate linguistic policy, much controversy exists as to what constitutes 'genuine Yoruba', with some writers holding the opinion that the Ọyọ dialect is the most "pure" form, and others stating that there is no such thing as genuine Yoruba at all.
_	In fact, all observers concur in the opinion that such a fireball moves slowly."
_	The Commission held the opinion that if BMW could not make a success of Rover, then it would be hard for SAIC to do so.
_	The noted 20th-century historian Frank Stenton was of the opinion that the language used by Bede "leaves no doubt that ... Penda, though descended from the royal family of the Mercians, only became their king after Edwin's defeat".
_	While the French writers, including Prentout, accepted that Yves de Criel was the father of Yves de Bellême, Geoffrey H. White was of the opinion that, while "probable", it should not be stated as fact.
_	Equally revealing was the shift over time to an outcome that favored conventional rather than nuclear escalation, and the opinion that US and NATO forces would ultimately emerge victorious from a conventional war of extended duration once the economic capacities of the West had shifted to military production.
_	Under such circumstances, I am of the opinion that the party seeking to rely on such terms should not be able to do so in the absence of first having taken reasonable measures to draw such terms to the attention of the other party, and, in the absence of such reasonable measures, it is not necessary for the party denying knowledge of such terms to prove either fraud, misrepresentation or non est factum.
_	Both Tests went to the final day and Shakib expressed the opinion that the experience had exhausted his side.
_	The classical rabbis expressed the opinion that each of the food rules could be waived, if the portion of food violating the regulations was less than a certain size, known as a "shiur" (Hebrew: "size", שיעור), unless it was still possible to taste or smell it; for the "milk and meat" regulations, this minimal size was a "ke'zayit" (כזית), literally meaning anything "similar to an olive" in size.
_	This idea manifests itself in the opinion that whites are deprived as a group of opportunities due to policies intended to benefit blacks.
_	In spite of this trend, some photographers continue to shoot with film as they prefer the film aesthetic, and others are of the opinion that negative film captures more information than digital technology, and has less margin for exposure error.
_	Belluzzo also expressed the opinion that "some great power is launching discs to study them".
_	The situation escalated into a diplomatic incident between the countries as the MCC—supported by the British public and still of the opinion that their "fast leg theory" tactic was harmless—took serious offence at being branded "unsportsmanlike" and demanded a retraction.
_	Writing in "The Listener", John Raymond was of the opinion that Bond's "admirers ... will find him in top form" and that the stories, "all but one of which are well up to 007's high standard".
_	However, other factors may have played a part in his subsequent omission, including the emergence of Tom Richardson as a successful fast bowler, and the opinion that Mold's bowling was flattered by the difficult, uneven pitches on which Lancashire played their home games.
_	One analyst for SoundScan expressed the opinion that the press were out of touch with the public when it came to Jackson; the public liked him, while the press did not.
_	Matthew Cassel of "The Electronic Intifada" in the context of the "Bush shoeing" incident has expressed the opinion that the Western media overplayed the phenomenon as being "Arab" in particular.
_	Moore goes on to say: "Sir William Jones, Sir John Malcolm and the missing Chamberlain, after full investigation, were of the opinion that the Ten Tribes migrated to India, Tibet, and Cashemire [Kashmir] through Afghanistan."
_	Milton Friedman also held the opinion that the Smoot-Hawley tariff of 1930 did not cause the Great Depression.
_	Cumont (1897) was of the opinion that much of the text reflects a historical event.
_	Williamson expressed the opinion that his 2017 general election campaign in Derby North would be a "test case for Corbynism", and Corbyn campaigned for Williamson on 6 May.
_	Increasingly interested in art, he decided to switch from classical studies to a course at UCL's art school, the Slade School of Fine Art; he returned to his previous subject after coming to the opinion that – in his words – he never became more than "a conventionally accomplished picture maker".
_	Some of those who saw Pisemsky's performance were of the opinion that he presented this character better than Schepkin did," wrote Almazov.
_	They are of the opinion that Taqizadeh was a supporter of the Iranian constitution and that during World War I he allied with Germany to oppose the Anglo-Russian influence which was aimed at undermining Iran's independence.
_	Dalí was also of the opinion that the two figures were praying over their buried child, rather than to the Angelus.
_	Gandhiji: "Some are of the opinion that nonviolent Satyagraha is of no use, and to establish right, violence is necessary.
_	Nonetheless, he was of the opinion that Chelsea manager José Mourinho had little to be concerned about, concluding his piece with the sentence: "A London club did come away from Cardiff as big winners but it was not Arsenal, it was Chelsea."
_	Some Muslims were of the opinion that they should be punished immediately, while Ali required time to punish them.
_	But not so; one of the inspectors, being of the opinion that if we did not keep awake we should catch cold, threw a fog signal into the fire and we promptly moved out.
_	Avery Robert Dulles held the opinion that "Jesus, though he repeatedly denounced sin as a kind of moral slavery, said not a word against slavery as a social institution", and believes that the writers of the New Testament did not oppose slavery either.
_	The historian Alexander Brown Griswold, however, is of the opinion that Mueang Rat must have been located in the valley of the Nan River near Uttaradit due to geographical characteristics.
_	Many expressed the opinion that In addition, they believed that Trudeau would continue his hard federalist stand, and this will mean unfavorable result for Western Canada including Alberta and its natural resources.
_	Captain Sandy MacGregor, the commander of the 3rd Field Troop, was of the opinion that the "decision almost certainly saved hundreds of Australian lives."
_	A significant minority of attendees at the 2012 "Rebreather Forum 3" indicated the opinion that it would be acceptable to dive solo on rebreathers in some circumstances.
_	Ernst Christmann was of the opinion that a church that Otto the Great gave the Worms Cathedral Foundation in 937 as a donation was none other than the church in Neunkirchen am Potzberg.
_	Article 30 of the Norwegian Constitution states that any member of the Council of State, if he is of the opinion that the "King's decision conflicts with the form of government or the laws of the Realm" is bound by a "duty to make strong remonstrances against it, as well as to enter his opinion in the records."
_	During the course of the trial, three doctors expressed the opinion that the book served a very useful purpose.
_	Thurgood Marshall and William J. Brennan Jr. expressed the opinion that the death penalty was proscribed absolutely by the Eighth Amendment as cruel and unusual punishment.
_	Hara was of the opinion that the longer Japan waited to engage the United States, the weaker its position would become thus subjugating the island nation to the will of American dominance in the region.
_	The Court was of the opinion that the threshold of culpability in imposing the mandatory death penalty for drug-related offences was a matter of policy and was therefore a matter for legislation and not for the courts to decide.
_	He also reported about dingoes that were aggressive and completely uncontrollable, but he was of the opinion that these reports "should not get more attention than they deserve," since the behaviour depends on how the dingo was raised since early puppyhood.
_	During the post-War discussions on the stance that Auschwitz was to assume as a museum for posterity, he expressed the opinion that he believed would be shared by all former inmates that the camp should be left completely intact, without any decorative or modernizing changes, especially in the outdoor spaces, as opposed to those who never experienced the camp as it was in real life.
_	Taylor's first doubts on the issue came when he discovered that scientists on whom he had relied to come to the opinion that climate change would not be as great a problem as the scientific consensus on climate change suggests were privately aware with problems in their public stance on the issue.
_	Taking a critical approach to the book, Shippey was of the opinion that the author's arguments relied "very heavily on assumptions about the precise (one might say gnostic) meanings of sometimes rather common words."
_	Allen Carlson is of the opinion that it is nearly impossible, without substantial field research in Tibet, to verify the numerous allegations of violations advanced by China critics.
_	True is of the opinion that in practice, attempts to mainstream gender within international institutions have led to the marginalization and increasing invisibility of gender in each policy area.
_	But I eventually came to the opinion that it simply didn't work out that way.
_	By 2016, the Chancellor was aiming to deliver a budget surplus by 2020, but following the result of the United Kingdom European Union membership referendum, 2016, he expressed the opinion that this goal was no longer achievable.
_	McNamara offered the opinion that perhaps the four took part in the show to attain some of the attention and following that their younger brother Michael had during his lifetime.
_	Experts of the news agency and expressed the opinion that the charts, published by the portal could not fully reflect the artist popularity in Russia, as Tophit along with Moskva.
_	While Kristofer M. Helgen and Don E. Wilson, who have done the most recent research about island raccoons, are of the opinion that the Cozumel raccoon should be considered a high conservation priority, the other three subspecies may themselves pose a threat to the insular ecosystem as invasive species.
_	Historian Prasert na Nagara () expressed the opinion that this means Sukhothai had already been independent from Ayutthaya by that time.
_	The Arya Samaj is of the opinion that "swastik" is 'OM' written in the ancient Brahmi script.
_	Although they were of the opinion that the M22 possessed a number of faults, the War Office believed it would perform adequately as an airborne tank.
_	T. F. O'Rahilly expressed the opinion that Gaelic in the Isle of Man was saddled with a corrupt spelling which is neither traditional nor phonetic; if the traditional Gaelic orthography had been preserved, the close kinship that exists between Manx Gaelic and Scottish Gaelic would be obvious to all at first sight.
_	Saprang also held the opinion that military coups against the government "should never be ruled out."
_	Gabriel J. Chin, Professor of Law at UC Davis School of Law, held the opinion that the term "natural born" is ambiguous and citizenship-granting authority has changed over the years.
_	He rejected the civil rights movement's strategy of nonviolence, expressing the opinion that black people should defend and advance themselves "by any means necessary".
_	When hood unit road switchers became the common kind of diesel locomotive, some B units were built, but many railroads soon came to the opinion that the lower cost of a B unit did not offset the lack of operational flexibility.
_	A preface states that the design of these verses is ‘no less than regenerating the whole British nation,’ and expresses the opinion that all who have John Milton's poem "Paradise Regained" ‘would do well to furnish themselves with this little piece, which compleats, or rather realizeth, his design.’
_	NSB was after the slide of the opinion that the railway could be repaired easily and that with investments of 700,000 Norwegian kroner the area could be secured to allow trains to pass on the new shelf.
_	In addition, the Air Force was increasingly of the opinion that unmanned intercontinental ballistic missiles could accomplish the mission of the B-70 Valkyrie/F-108 Rapier combination much more effectively and at far lower cost.
_	In 1948, F. R. Leavis in "The Great Tradition" gave the opinion that the Jewish sections of the book were its weakest, and that a truncated version called "Gwendolen Harleth" should be printed on its own.
_	Sławek himself decided to accept the invitation, but later stated that his promotion to Marshal was one of the saddest days of his life, as he was of the opinion that Józef Piłsudski was the only person worthy of that rank.
_	On the basis of these policies, historians have argued that "Given the hostility toward Chinese expressed by many colonial officials and the lack of physical and social integration, it is not surprising that most Malays formed the opinion that Chinese were only transients in Malaya with no real attachments to the country."
_	During the discussion that followed, Bhushan Gupta, member of parliament, voiced the opinion that this should not be yet another university.
_	At the conference Peter changed sides, expressing the opinion that not only could the Jews could not be converted, but they might do harm through missionary work.
_	Many researchers were of the opinion that "Plateosaurus" could use both quadrupedal gaits (for slow speeds) and bipedal gaits (for rapid locomotion), and Wellnhofer insisted that the tail curved strongly downward, making a bipedal posture impossible.
_	He, like the local admiral Steven van der Haghen, was of the opinion that the VOC's goals should be achieved solely via commercial and diplomatic routes.
_	M. Brutails is of the opinion that even if the style of St Front's reveals an imitation of Oriental art, the construction differs altogether from Byzantine methods.
_	Some scholars are of the opinion that Vaidyanātha is the same person who wrote "Prataprudriya".
_	Thomas himself added the opinion that the letters on it were "beyond question letters of the Cherokee alphabet said to have been invented by George Guess (or Sequoyah), ... about 1821."
_	Some reviews express the opinion that more research is needed to answer the question of what effect phytoestrogens may have on infants, but their authors did not find any adverse effects.
_	Furthermore, the groups voiced the opinion that " too often exclude scholars with diverse perspectives while stifling discourse on critical issues.
_	We are of the opinion that this area should not be deprived of the benefit of irrigation on account of the reorganisation of States."
_	Christensen expressed the opinion that these communities should be racially homogenous and should exhibit "racial consciousness", opining that in a voluntary social order, no one would want to live alongside those of a different race.
_	Voicing the opinion that Pirates GM Dave Littlefield had undersold Wilson, the anonymous GM was quoted as saying, "We really thought Wilson was a guy a lot of AL teams would be interested in.
_	One criminologist expressed the opinion that the likelihood of different killers with similar long bladed knives committing murders three streets apart within four months is "very, very small".
_	He was of the opinion that there is an underlying fundamental organisation (') in the diversity of flowering plants.
_	Mark Edward Nero from About.com was of the opinion that while Norwood was stepping "out of her musical lane" on "Put It Down" she would manage "to make the track her own and sounds completely comfortable" on it.
_	At first, the matter was referred to the Law Lords, who were unanimously of the opinion that women were qualified to sit in the House by virtue of the act.
_	Plucknett is of the opinion that this good will probably did flow down the feudal chain.
_	Gawker viewed Hilton's public apology with skepticism, being of the opinion that it was just an attempt to rebuild his "brand" and a possible attempt to prevent Canadian authorities from filing criminal charges against him for his use of hate speech during the Toronto incident.
_	Medieval Jain commentators on these passages interpreted them in the literal sense, but also mentioned the opinion that the offensive words had different meanings, some of which did not refer to animals and hence were compatible with vegetarianism.
_	Arnold Schoenberg famously expressed the opinion that no one could possibly write a Tenth Symphony without being close to the hereafter (see Curse of the ninth); and a mistaken report led Richard Specht to suggest Mahler wanted the manuscript burned after his death.
_	They voiced the opinion that the closures would not provide effective crime control, was a waste of city funds, and the closures would potentially harm local businesses.
_	Tolkien was of the opinion that the invention of an artistic language in order to be convincing and pleasing must include not only the language's historical development, but also the history of its speakers, and especially the mythology associated with both the language and the speakers.
_	For many years, most historians, linguists and cultural anthropologists are of the opinion that Isoko is just a dialect and a cultural unit of Urhobo.
_	On the other hand, Helgen and Wilson are of the opinion that the Guadeloupe raccoon itself could be considered to be an invasive species which poses a threat to the insular ecosystem.
_	There are two accounts of the way in which Dimapur got its name : many writers are of the opinion that the name ’ Dimapur’ was derived from Dimasa Kachari words Di-meaning water, Ma-meaning big and Pur-meaning city or township in the Dimasa dialect; while others contend that Dimapur is a corruption of Hidimbapur, meaning the city of Hidimbi (of Mahabharata fame) - the rakshasi-turned-woman whose marriage to the Pandava prince Bhima led to the birth of Ghatotkacha - believed to be the progenitor of the Kacharis.
_	Although the Volunteer and IRB leaders were not against a rising in principle, they were of the opinion that it was not opportune at that moment.
_	In his "New York Times" review, Bosley Crowther was of the opinion that "for all its emotional excess, "Random Harvest" is a strangely empty film."
_	While I am glad to state the fact, I am sorry to remain of the opinion that such exceptions are exceptions, and that the rule is still the rule."
_	The reviewer in "Punch", by contrast, wrote, "I consulted a Russian, who is very much alive, and received the opinion that, if Mr. Walpole has not succeeded in drawing the real average Russian, he has given us a type whose faults and virtues sound the keynote of the situation as it is to-day."
_	Bernard Levin, among others, was of the opinion that "The Government refused to accept the Devlin Report because it told the truth".
_	He was of the opinion that while Michael Jackson outshines his sister in the vocals, it is Janet Jackson who gives the better performance in the music video.
_	The Indian troops in some regiments were of the opinion that this was an intentional act of the British, with the aim of defiling their religions.
_	In December 1634 Windebank was appointed to discuss with the papal agent Gregorio Panzani the possibility of a union between the Anglican and Roman Churches, and expressed the opinion that the Puritan opposition might be crippled by sending their leaders to the war in the Netherlands.
_	Anomaly, the order says will include the following two cases :"(a) where the Official Side and the Staff Side are of the opinion that any recommendation is in contravention of the principle or the policy enunciated by the Seventh Central Pay Commission itself without the Commission assigning any reason; and (b) where the maximum of the Level in the Pay Matrix corresponding to the applicable Grade Pay in the Pay Band under the pre-revised structure, as notified vide CCS (RP) Rules 2016, is less than the amount an employee is entitled to be fixed at, as per the formula for fixation of pay contained in the said Rules".
_	He is of the opinion that the problem of theodicy is the central issue in any philosophy of religion.
_	While Scruggs made the arrangements for these payments, the other members of the SKG joint venture knew or should have known that the payments were being made, and I am of the opinion that their failure to take timely and reasonable remedial steps or to object to this arrangement amounts to a ratification of Scruggs's actions.
_	Incidentally it may be remarked that he seems to have held the opinion that the Hebrew roots are not necessarily triliteral.
_	He was of the opinion that if anyone should draw the line, the Internal Revenue Service should be the one.
_	Vasari expressed the opinion that the manner of painting would make even "the most confident master... despair and lose heart."
_	He was of the opinion that "Wealth is the relentless enemy of understanding".
_	The appeals court upheld the district court's ruling in a relatively short opinion, stating that the district court properly determined the fairness of the Japanese court's proceedings as well as the opinion that "any court" applies to both foreign and domestic courts.
_	On 20 August 2013 an "Aftenposten" editorial wrote that "...some are of the opinion that Norway ought to be able to pay itself out of the troubles.
_	Pliny the Elder discusses the stone, but makes it clear that he does not believe in it, or at least its supposed origin: "I for my part am of the opinion that the whole story is false and that no gemstone bearing this name has been seen in our time.
_	According to an SMS/web poll conducted by CNN IBN, 88 percent of the voters were of the opinion that Raj Thackeray was "feeding on media hype".
_	Lje expresses the opinion that cause and effect are simply a construct of the mind, that events are fixed and the human consciousness is simply an observer.
_	This is countered by the opinion that after-tax returns should be considered, especially during retirement, on the basis that allocation to equities is in general, lower, than any returns and should be maximized, to the most lucrative extent.
_	Some contemporary scholars hold the opinion that "aut dedere aut judicare" is not an obligation under customary international law but rather “a specific conventional clause relating to specific crimes” and, accordingly, an obligation that only exists when a state has voluntarily assumed the obligation.
_	The "Variety" review expressed the opinion that the movie was cheaply made and that, except for the flood scene, the production suffered as a result.
_	In a previous conversation with Squadron Leader Ralph Booth, captain of the R100, on 27 June, Irwin had expressed the opinion that "most of the losses were from the gas valves", due to "excessive pulsing and flapping" of the envelope fabric.
_	With its mainstream acceptance however, it was of the opinion that the show had all the ingredients to become an "audience-pleasing family sitcom in the tradition of "Only Fools and Horses" and "The Royle Family" – churning out series after series and Christmas special after Christmas special", although by then, the writers had already ruled out future full series.
_	He dealt frequently with folklore as an expression of unconscious desires and anxieties and was of the opinion that if people reacted strongly to what he had to say, he had probably hit a nerve and was probably on to something.
_	Krämer shared the opinion that she does not want to be addressed as a Kunde, because it is a form of address that is not suitable for a female customer.
_	At the time of his departure, Hume held the opinion that to implement political change and self-governance in India, political work was required in Britain to raise awareness of Indian issues among the British public.
_	The original trial court was of the opinion that such action was illegal.
_	The fact that it is rarely explained that a "6 sigma" process will have long-term defect rates corresponding to 4.5 sigma performance rather than actual 6 sigma performance has led several commentators to express the opinion that Six Sigma is a confidence trick.
_	Some of his relatives were of the opinion that he received spiritual initiation from his own father while his younger sister, Janaki Devi, was of the view that Swami Baalak Kaw was his spiritual master.
_	S. N. Fotedar, his principal biographer, who was associated with him for over two decades, tried to lay his hands on all the evidence he could in this regard and finally settled with the opinion that Swami Zanakak Tufchi was his spiritual master.
_	Nau is of the opinion that they are much older than the latter quarter of the 4th century and calls attention to Origen of Alexandrias writings - "it seemed good to the Apostles and the elders assembled at Antioch, and in their own words to the Holy Spirit to write a letter to the Gentiles who believed".
_	Hitler biographer John Toland offers the opinion that Hitler "carried within him its teaching that the Jew was the killer of God.
_	The Advisory Body are of the opinion that the site is of such prominence and importance that a work of major importance should be provided…
_	He was of the opinion that T had once been a fine artifact:
_	McGibbon and Ross were of the opinion that the doorway is quite typical of sixteenth and seventeenth century Scottish Renaissance Gothic work as found in several collegiate and parish churches and not necessarily Norman in origin.
_	This statement cannot be relied upon, as Simeon Kayyara in fact lived in the century following Yehudai Gaon; and Halevy is of the opinion that the names were inadvertently switched, though this reading creates as many problems as it solves.
_	Some heraldists are also of the opinion that crests, as personal devices, are not suited for use by corporate bodies, but this is not widely observed.
_	The State's media at the time generally was of the opinion that bauxite revenues were a major factor in the Government's decision making on the issue.
_	Let "A" be the opinion that user "i" has about the trustworthiness of user "j", based on "direct evidence", e.g. direct interactions between "i" and "j".
_	Botkin was of the opinion that patriarchal society had caused many of the problems plaguing humankind.
_	Currently, she is of the opinion that sex is a limitation...awakening or enlightenment means transcend of all which is fenomenal, temporary and transient.
_	Lord Walker, agreeing with the reasons given by Baroness Hale and having examined the precedent in detail, was also of the opinion that the appeal should be dismissed.
_	Colin Patterson reviewed "Evolution of Living Organisms" for the "New Scientist" stating that the book was a criticism of neo-Darwinism, with the opinion that paleontology is "the only true science of evolution".
_	On its original publication in Australia a reviewer in "The Queenslander" concluded that the volume "should find an honoured place on the colonial bookshelf beside such authors as Adam Lindsay Gordon, Brunton Stephens, Paterson, and Lawson; and we venture the opinion that its author is not the least of these."
_	I am of the opinion that he is most suitable to be called to the important position now vacant and that he is capable of elevating it to the height of its true aim.
_	By 1931 the fortunes of the two Clubs had reversed as the Lancaster RC building needed refurbishment and without the benefit of a benefactor the committee were 'unanimously of the opinion that under present conditions it is impossible to carry on'.
_	The paper expressed the opinion that war had come to Norway because of France and England, but also was of the opinion that the Nasjonal Samling had no mandate to represent Norwegian interests.
_	The investigation is of the opinion that this was the result of dependence on Doppler and Weather Radar Systems on board PH-MBH which left room for misinterpretation."
_	While Supermarine was extremely profitable McLean and his management team were of the opinion that as well as wages being higher than at Vickers, it was also not being run efficiently, had poor record keeping, stock control, and was poorly equipped to build all-metal aircraft, with the ratio of unskilled to skilled labour at 1:3 compared with Vickers' 3:1.
_	Groups including , a trade union composed of booksellers from across Japan, have expressed the opinion that issuing points for books, and selling books using points, is an infringement of the resale price maintenance system, and requested that the redemption rate of the points (currently 3%) be lowered.
_	Those who used the avvisi in this way held the opinion that the information provided by avvisi could not be stopped and it was thus better to capitalize on it.
_	It is believed that these belong to the invading period of Alexander the great and some scholrs are of the opinion that these ancient graves belong to Baloch (surname) tribe but question arises that which Baloch tribe had tradition to keep corpse in open or columned graves with carved stone slabs .
_	In an interview following the election, Kerr voiced the opinion that Trump's rise to power was based on insults against women and minorities.
_	Church members, including copastor Mona West, claimed that the vote was less about the investigation and more about the congregation's long-simmering frustration with the denomination, including the opinion that the denomination was focused too much on gay issues and hampered their desire to reach out to Dallas residents disaffected by conservative churches; as church member Michael Magnia explained:
_	The show went ahead with the episode (June 18), in which host John Oliver discussed the Crandall Canyon Mine collapse and expressed the opinion that Murray did not do enough to protect his miners' safety.
_	Felix Salmon of Reuters was initially an outspoken skeptic of paywalls, but later expressed the opinion that they could be effective.
_	These runs seemed to confirm the opinion that he didn't get the 3-mile trip.
_	By 2014, both physicist Stephen Hawking and business magnate Elon Musk had publicly voiced the opinion that superhuman artificial intelligence could provide incalculable benefits, but could also end the human race if deployed incautiously (see Existential risk from advanced artificial intelligence).
_	He expressed the opinion that the purpose of the inscription "is most probably to record the extension of the Buddhist faith to that remarkable point of the Malay Peninsula".
_	After their victory Fishman expressed the opinion that it might be time to
_	While this house was not the matrimonial home (it was rented by Mr Calderbank’s father, and Mr Calderbank's mother lived there), the trial judge was of the opinion that this house was worth about £12,000, which was £2,000 more than Mr Calderbank later obtained at trial.
_	The authors of the "Buildings of England" express the opinion that this is "one of the most agreeable of all Douglas' model farms".
_	The Court was therefore of the opinion that an examination of Article 5 would sufficiently satisfy any claim of this nature and deemed it unnecessary to investigate the alleged violation Article 2 of Protocol No. 4 any further.
_	The phrase gained acceptance during the Vietnam War era and 21st-century commentators have expressed the opinion that a number of the fears raised in his speech have come true.
_	A minority of Serbian linguists are of the opinion that Serbo-Croatian did exist, but has, in the meantime, dissolved.
_	In addition, Lord Diplock expressed the opinion that the appropriate boundary to be drawn between varying classes of persons is a question best left to the Legislature.
_	In what is referred to as Easter Crisis of 1920, on 29 March King Christian X dismissed the government, the Cabinet of Zahle II consisting of members of the Danish Social Liberal Party, replacing it with a caretaker cabinet led by Otto Liebe on 30 March, as he was of the opinion that Central Schleswig should be returned to Denmark regardless of the outcome of the Schleswig Plebiscites.
_	"As there were no survivors of the crew, the cause of the Lifeboat capsizing is a matter of conjecture, but from the evidence available we are of the opinion that whilst attempting to make the Harbour on a strong flood tide and in high and dangerous breaking sea, she was suddenly capsized and the crew were thrown into the water, two men being entangled under the boat.
_	While Rabbi Moshe Feinstein permitted, in principle, entry to some parts of the site, most other Haredi rabbis are of the opinion that the Mount is off limits to Jews and non-Jews alike.
_	Hope-Scott was reassuring, expressing the opinion that an action was possible but not probable and that the risk was worth taking.
_	The Monarchist Party of Russia supports Prince Nikolai as the heir of the Russian throne, since they are of the opinion that neither Maria Vladimirovna Romanova nor Nicholas Romanov qualified as dynasts.
_	The treatise opens with the opinion that "prevalent religious beliefs and standards of morality . . . are based chiefly on . . . fantasies . . . of primitive people of an ancient past”, and he “to develop morally and intellectually, as well as enable us to lead happier lives.
_	He expressed the opinion that "the UDTs and SEALs are essentially one and the same.
_	Prior to the 2005 U.S. premiere, the Florida Attorney General expressed the opinion that the State Anatomical Board’s approval should be required.
_	The Board fought the Tampa exhibit, with its director expressing the opinion that the exhibit should be shut down.
_	After S.mouse's first appearance on "Angry Boys", Larissa Dubecki of "The Age" expressed the opinion that he contained some of Jonah Takalua's DNA, but also "found him plain annoying although his impending house arrest might pique interest."
_	"The 7th Voyage of Sinbad" continues to be well-reviewed by critics, with many holding the opinion that it is the best film of the "Sinbad" trilogy.
_	They also supported their actions with the opinion that their sophisticated artistic taste would allow them to appreciate the plundered art.
_	That included linguistic unity of Croats and Serbs and the opinion that the Croatian literature is at the same time Serbian and vice versa.
_	All in all, many people are of the opinion that the 1954 Land Cruiser was better designed than the 1955 Ultra-Vista wrap around windshield President models.
_	Stephen Thomas Erlewine of AllMusic expressed the opinion that "Scream", "improved on the slamming beats of his earlier single 'Jam,'" a song that received critical acclaim in its own right, as the recipient of two Grammy nominations:
_	In his book, "Warrior Politics: Why Leadership Demands a Pagan Ethos", published shortly after 9/11, Kaplan offered the opinion that political and business leaders should discard Christian/Jewish morality in public decision-making in favor of a pagan morality focused on the morality of the result rather than the morality of the means.
_	Sheikh Mujibur Rahman was of the opinion that the Nawab of Dhaka must stay in Bangladesh: in his country and with his people.
_	Though Belmont was of the opinion that Venona evidence could lead to successful convictions, it was ultimately decided, in consideration of compromising the Army Signals Intelligence efforts, that there would not be prosecutions.
_	She worked very hard, but the jury is of the opinion that the other girls still have more potential.
_	Some Portuguese employers and families are of the opinion that the existence of private education institutions, where accessibility is based primarily on ability to pay, is not as fair as the public system and could gloom the meritocracy concept, leading to easier entrance criteria and lower teaching standards.
_	Recent historians are of the opinion that while Stanisha might have been conscripted at a young age, and had to go through the Devşirme, this was not the case with Skanderbeg, who is assumed to have been sent hostage to the Sultan by his father only at the age of 18.
_	The Liberal Democrats took a similar stance to the Conservatives, and were also of the opinion that setting targets every five years would be an abdication of responsibility, because a government typically remains in power for only four years.
_	Boxer is of the opinion that India should not get help from the U.S. in the civilian nuclear energy sector until it breaks its relationship with Iran.
_	III was of the opinion that the pope should decide the question of who sat on the throne, to whom spiritual and temporal princes would have to submit.
_	He wrote an impassioned letter to the Secretary of State, James Madison, voicing the opinion that, "The more you give the more the Turks will ask for."
_	He is of the opinion that teachers should be supporting students as surrogates of their families and fail to arouse their interest in life.
_	Visiting the United States for the first time in connection with an exhibition of his work in 1891, Crane scandalized polite society by appearing at a Boston anarchist meeting and expressing the opinion that the Haymarket defendants had been put to death wrongfully.
_	Phillips was of the opinion that the murderer must have possessed anatomical knowledge to have sliced out the reproductive organs in a single movement with a blade about 6–8 inches (15–20 cm) long.
_	This was not accomplished before an acrimonious dispute between the two centres, for the Beuren dwellers were of the opinion that any new church building should happen in their village.
_	At the end of each speech that Cato the elder made, he would say "Ceterum censeo Carthaginem esse delendam",or in English, "Moreover, I am of the opinion that Carthage ought to be destroyed."
_	Two of the dissenting judges (Grewe and Palavrić) were of the opinion that differential treatment challenged by the appeal is not justified in an objective or in a proportionate manner.
_	This supports the opinion that any individual entering the water for the purpose of rescue should be trained to the level of a Rescue Technician.
_	Brazier again applied for the position and was endorsed by the Governor, Montfort Stokes, Senator James Iredell, Jr., state Attorney General Romulus M. Saunders and others, attesting to his skill as a surveyor and expressing the opinion that “as a Draughtsman, it is believed that (Brazier) has no superior in the Country.”
_	Boys expressed the opinion that Byng had been in error in not re-appointing King as prime minister and then granting the dissolution of parliament to King instead of Meighen.
_	Martti Ahtisaari was also of the opinion that the policy of constructive engagement acted as an undeniable catalyst for resolution.
_	The third form of the tradition is that of Jason of Cyrene, on which the second Book of the Maccabees is based; and Schlatter is even of the opinion that Josephus himself drew his account of the Tobiads from this same source.
_	She expressed the opinion that what is referred to as the “soul” is nothing more than blood and that death is final.
_	He used his official position as the first postwar head of the German Historical Association to demand the return of the records and held the opinion that their absence hurt his own research projects the most.
_	On the opinion that his views are influential enough to topple car companies, he has argued that he has proof that he has had no influence.
_	On 25 April Governor Wanton, Deputy Governor Darius Sessions and two others signed a protest against raising an army of observation "because we are of the opinion that such a measure will be attended with the most fatal consequences to our charter privileges, [and] involve the country in all the horrors of a civil war."
_	Burgon supported his arguments with the opinion that the Codex Alexandrinus and Codex Ephraemi, were older than the Sinaiticus and Vaticanus; and also that the Peshitta translation into Syriac (which supports the Byzantine Text), originated in the 2nd century.
_	The Commission also has the right to bring its own application to the HRTO if the Commission is of the opinion that the application is in the public interest.
_	ABS-CBN writer Fred Hawson described Elsa as "an incredible character with a unique and interesting predicament because of the powers she possessed" and expressed the opinion that "Frozen" should have focused more on her rather than Anna.
_	She was of the opinion that he had to maintain the dignity of his social position.
_	Sumariwalla is of the opinion that there has been great increase in infrastructure for sports by the government in recent years, and has quoted that "The day is not far when India can expect an Olympics Medal in Athletics".
_	It’s rare to find patients of less than 15 years of age, which seems to confirm the opinion that PET is an acquired condition.
_	Meise was of the opinion that between 135 and 200 represented good species.
_	"We are of the opinion that, on the basis of continuous information and an open discussion, future treaty changes which affect Austrian interests should be decided on in a referendum in Austria."
_	Architecture historian Stefan Stamov likens the Belovo Basilica's plan to that of Mediterranean basilicas and presents the opinion that it was influenced by construction techniques from Asia Minor.
_	Konstantinou is of the opinion that Fartcopter can teach us about our relationship with drones.
_	The Board was of the opinion that the children would only become good and proper members of "industrial society" if they were completely removed and not allowed to return.
_	This crisis, which led him to turn from being a liberal Protestant to being a liberal Catholic, came largely from his earlier researches into Biblical Criticism and the historical Jesus, his conclusions leading him to the opinion that the Jesus of liberal Protestantism did not exist, and that the historical Jesus was much closer to that taught in Catholic doctrine.
_	Holst's family, many of his friends and colleagues in the resistance movement, among them Hans Ringvold and Erik Myhre, held the opinion that Holst was murdered.
_	The three generals disagreed on what Burgoyne's most likely movement was, and Congress also rendered the opinion that Burgoyne's army was likely to move to New York by sea.
_	Marcos was inclined to agree since he was of the opinion that "Palawan, the three Davaos, the two Surigaos, the two Agusans, Southern Cotabato, Bukidnon, the two Misamis, possibly Lanao del Norte, Zamboanga del Norte and others" would not want to be included in the Muslim autonomous region.
_	Initially, Emery (1912, 1914) was of the opinion that the genus was referable to the tribe Myrmecinini, but Ashmead (1905) and Wheeler (1910) had already referred it to Tetramoriini, an opinion that Emery (1915, 1924) also came to accept.
_	Historian Suchit Wongthet () expressed the opinion that "lan" here is an old Thai–Lao term which encyclopediae say refers to "eel trap made of bamboo".
_	The experts gave the opinion that the structure and all the pillars of the bridge are in sound condition and the bridge would be able to serve the North East region of the country for years to come.
_	Ecological activists as well as scientists such as botanists, zoologists, ecology experts, hydrologists experts on peat bog plant cover and the European Commission are of the opinion that the Rospuda Valley is endangered by the plans of construction of the Augustów ringroad.
_	The University was of the opinion that only the Ministry had the authority to initiate the revocation of the dr. univ. title (citing a legal article on degrees awarded by defunct institutions of higher education).
_	This sentiment warred with the opinion that it had been time for James to be stopped.
_	By creating an analogy between construction-stages and life-stages, he clearly expresses the opinion that man and architecture are not separable.
_	The review in "Motion Picture News" gave the opinion that there would be "few who will not feel the power of it".
_	Nevertheless, Jung remained of the opinion that while "no one should deny the danger of the descent ... every descent is followed by an ascent ...enantiodromia"; and assimilation of—rather than possession by—the shadow becomes at last a real possibility.
_	If the Minister is unable to answer, the question is disallowed but if the Speaker is of the opinion that the question is of sufficient public importance, he may direct that it be answered as the first question on the day allotted to the group.
_	Cortese said they were both of the opinion that the amount spent in January – around £2 million – meant the playoffs had to become their target for the campaign.
_	Many conventional historians and scholars are of the opinion that one of the names that the Temple had - "The Golden Temple" - literally was in cognizance of the fact that the Temple was already unimaginably wealthy by that point.
_	Liu Tuo, head of the desertification control office in the state forestry administration, is of the opinion that there are huge gaps in the country's efforts to reclaim the land that has become desert.
_	The supervising engineer was of the opinion that the mine was originally created by Germans.
_	However, in an article about the show, Haidee Muller – Huisgenoot reporter and Saktyd judge – was of the opinion that the show is the brain-child of Esmaré Weideman, CEO of Media24 and previous editor-in-chief of Huisgenoot, YOU and Drum magazines.
_	Justice Scalia stated in the opinion that while the OCC has "visitorial powers," the right to examine the affairs of a corporation, that does not mean that it has the exclusive right to enforcement.
_	These examples will suffice to justify the opinion that Akiva was the man to whom Judaism owes preeminently its activity and its capacity for development.
_	A city does not automatically revert to town status if the population drops below 5,000; this only occurs if the city council requests it, the majority of electors vote to revert to town status, or the appropriate provincial minister is of the opinion that the reversion to town status is in the public interest.
_	while ImagineIndia was of the opinion that,"...characters do not appear stereotypical, but a modern, sensitive and realistic portrait of people struggling to find happiness, with the ebbs and tides of human relationships"
_	In review, he scathingly offered the opinion that telepathy was a merely American phenomenon; he was described by the US researcher, J. B. Rhine, as one of his most harsh and unfair critics.
_	Blackburn holds the opinion that many people in prison have been wrongly convicted.
_	The case led to negotiations between the British and Spanish governments expressed the opinion that the Spanish government had no right to treat the crew as prisoners of war, much less to chain them up.
_	Harper most recently restated this commitment after news broke that a lawyer with the federal Justice Department was of the opinion that foreign same-sex couples visiting Canada to get married who are from regions where same-sex marriage is illegal were not obligated to get divorced in Canada since their marriage in their home region was never legitimate.
_	The Dutch Government under Mark Rutte prohibited Turkish Ministers from entering the Netherlands for rallies, stating "We are of the opinion that Dutch public spaces are not the place for political campaigns of other countries".
_	Although Rollo's ancestry is disputed, it is now common among British, French and Norwegian scientists to have the opinion that, judging from the sources and the possible two alternatives, more sources point to Norwegian ancestry.
_	The writer concluded the book review with the opinion that only "twelve of the twenty-six selections can be considered as examples of anthropological science fiction."
_	Richards was of the opinion that the colonial government should acquiesce to the crown demands, and was consequently voted from office in 1684.
_	In 1984, #46 was donated to the Pacific Southwest Railway Museum, as a result of high maintenance costs, and the opinion that the locomotive was too light on its feet.
_	Claus Telp comments that Airaines was not in the sector of the 7th, but at Hangest and Martainville elements of the 7th might have shot some prisoners and used British Colonel Broomhall as a human shield (although Telp is of the opinion that it was unlikely Rommel approved or even knew about these two incidents).
_	Bracton was of the opinion that a gift of land to the Church could be voided by the heirs, but not the lord.
_	Several prominent educational leaders, researchers, and social commentators have echoed the opinion that the intentional promotion of Urdu and the continued denial of any official sanction or recognition of the Punjabi language amounts to a process of "Urdu-isation" that is detrimental to the health of the Punjabi language In August 2015, the Pakistan Academy of Letters, International Writer’s Council (IWC) and World Punjabi Congress (WPC) organised the "Khawaja Farid Conference" and demanded that a Punjabi-language university should be established in Lahore and that Punjabi language should be declared as the medium of instruction at the primary level.
_	Osborne was of the opinion that the Republican judges’ impeachments were unwarranted and an attempted political purge.
_	While the Senate Finance Committee under John Sherman disagreed, being of the opinion that the $356,000,000 was a maximum as well as a minimum, no legislation was passed to assert the Committee's opinion.
_	In a September 10 order, Pokorny ruled that Firoz must stand trial because he knew what he was selling - "This judge is of the opinion that Mr. Christian Firoz knew precisely that the Salvia Divinorum he was selling was a 'substance' his purchasers were buying intended for human ingestion for the sole purpose of achieving mind-altering intoxication.
_	In his original version of his book "Sex Without Guilt", Ellis expressed the opinion that religious restrictions on sexual expression are often needless and harmful to emotional health.
_	Waterhouse early formed the opinion that the rich and well watered soils of the North Shore were ideally suited to plants found in forest glades, most notably Japanese azaleas and camellias.
_	Louis Ginzberg (in his "Geonica") is of the opinion that the Babylonian recension (see below) is the work of Yehudai Gaon and that Simeon Kayyara expanded it into what is now known as the Spanish recension.
_	Portland mayor Frank Ivancie was among those who expressed the opinion that the modernist style then being applied to most large office buildings had begun to make some American cities' downtowns look "boring", with most of the newer, large buildings being covered in glass and steel, and largely lacking in design features that would make them stand out.
_	Historians are of the opinion that Koodal Azhagar temple finds mention in Sangam literature (3 century BCE - 3 century AD) in works like "Madurai Kanchi" by Mangudi Marudan, "Paripāṭal", "Kaliththokai" and "Silappatikaram".
_	Al-Zahrawi was not afraid to depart from old practice, for example, he openly disparages the opinion that cauterization should only be used in the spring season: “…the Ancients…[affirmed] that spring was the best.
_	Four pages later, he again opposes the opinion that gold is the best material for cauterization, stating that iron is actually his preferred metal: “therefore in our own opinion cauterization is swifter and more successful with iron”.
_	After looking at submitted video and media material, the police came to the opinion that no criminal offences had been committed and no further action was taken.
_	Some are of the opinion that Gergesa was the country of the ancient Girgashites; but it is more probable that 'Gergesenes' was introduced by Origen upon mere conjecture; as before him most copies seem to have read 'Gadarenes', agreeable to the parallel passages and the ancient Syriac version.
_	Pavlov is of the opinion that the war ended with a continuation of the peace of 815.
_	However, some are also of the opinion that such a deep analysis is unwarranted, since they consider the "Jia Junpeng Phenomenon" to be merely kuso culture from internet.
_	In the "New York Journal of Books", Janice Durante is of the opinion that "as the pasha does in "The Red Lantern", author Hamilton presents readers with a precious gift: a collection of content not quite like anything we’ve heard or seen before.
_	The Criminal Justice Act 2003 (England and Wales) states that '(2)The court must not pass a custodial sentence unless it is of the opinion that the offence, or the combination of the offence and one or more offences associated with it, was so serious that neither a fine alone nor a community sentence can be justified for the offence'.
_	This has caused at least one U.S. district judge to express the opinion that Puerto Rico is no longer unincorporated:
_	Many were of the opinion that Vassalli was a scholar, a thinker and a dreamer and that therefore he was not cut out for the intricacies of political life.
_	The author is of the opinion that failure to comprehend the true import of this verse, the early Muslim jurists and scholars committed profound error, and shed the blood of innocent human beings in the name of "Holy War" or Jihad.
_	Notable in their omission were several of the top British rock-climbers of the period – Alf Bridge, Colin Kirkus and Maurice Linnell – reflecting the traditional approach of the sub-committee, as well as Ruttledge himself, who said: "I am coming more and more to the opinion that we must beware of the north British school of rock-climbers if we are to succeed on Everest.
_	Given the uneven relation of forces I am of the opinion that I should have to sacrifice myself sooner or later.
_	In an address to the Irish Senate in December 2006 John O'Donoghue, the then Minister for Arts, Sport and Tourism also expressed the opinion that it was a matter for those who bore these titles to decide on the system they used for succession, but that he found it strange that an English system had been used for the succession of titles originally created under a native Irish system.
_	Prior to modern archaeological studies, most biblical scholars held the opinion that the Jebusites were identical to the Hittites, which continues to be the case, though less so.
_	When the College of Medicine was launched, several commentators writing in the "Guardian" and the "BMJ", expressed the opinion that the new organisation was simply a re-branding of the Prince's "Foundation", some describing it as "Hamlet without the Prince".
_	While team owner Daniel Snyder expresses the opinion that the court decision is a victory for the team, the Executive Director of the NCAI asserts that the name remains a slur, and the decision that grants it First Amendment protection does not alter any of the arguments against its continued use.
_	Kent and others were of the opinion that Krog and Hoel could not receive any money since the statutes of the union said that the receivers should not "belong to movements that are in conflict with morality or the on Christianity founded order of society".
_	The German public was of the opinion that the crown princess was responsible for encouraging this union between Denmark and the United Kingdom.
_	This is one of many characteristics pointed out by some who are of the opinion that she must have been an aggressive woman.
_	He praised the "Lighter than Air" technology (balloon flight) and was of the opinion that private planes would be similarly ubiquitous as motorcycles.
_	He ended his review with the opinion that "Miller will have to ditch a few pretensions if he wants to be good".
_	After the accident, the AAIB and the helicopter's manufacturer, Stratford, Connecticut-based Sikorsky Aircraft, reached the opinion that the electrical energy imparted by the lightning strike in 1999 exploited an anomaly that was built into the blade at manufacture and damaged the spar.
_	Whereas certain scholars (e.g., Zunz, J.L. Rapoport, W. Bacher, Oppenheim, and Hochmuth) suppose Babylonia or Palestine, Güdemann is of the opinion that the work was written in Italy, or at least that its author must have been an Italian who had traveled a great deal and had been as far as Babylon, who learned there of the polemic between the Rabbinites and Karaites, but who abstained from mentioning Europe or Italy because he considered he would be likely to create a greater impression among his fellow countrymen by relating observations which he had made abroad.
_	Because of this, by 1925 the department's manager was of the opinion that trams should still be used for the heaviest and busiest loadings, but never for new routes with a frequency less than 6 per hour, while buses would still remain employed on routes either complementing or connecting existing tram lines, or on routes that were unsuitable or uneconomic for trams.
_	Nurkse is of the opinion that Say's Law of markets operates in underdeveloped countries.
_	In court, Larrikin's principal Norman Lurie gave the opinion that, had the parties negotiated a licence at the outset as willing parties, the royalties would have been between 25 and 50 per cent.
_	Burt felt that the similarities between "S.H.I.E.L.D."s Inhumans and the X-Men became "particularly pointed" in the third season with the Hive storyline, which had a lot in common with the film "" that was released around the same time; Burt was of the opinion that "S.H.I.E.L.D." executed the storyline "much better" than the film did.
_	Jim Cramer of CNBC offered the opinion that the absence of the uptick rule harms the stock market today.
_	Shenoy was of the opinion that India could not finance all the money needed for rapid industrialisation and may not be able to consume all the goods thus produced.
_	Some mathematicians are of the opinion that the doing of mathematics is closer to discovery than invention, for example:
_	JJ were all of the opinion that as the subject matter of the legislation was external to Australia then the law was a valid one under the external affairs power.
_	In a review for "Allmusic", Steve Huey expressed the opinion that "Crush" was a "solidly crafted mainstream rock record that's much better than most might expect."
_	In the early 1900s, Professor Eduard Suess used the theory to explain the 1908 Messina earthquake, being of the opinion that the Earth's crust was gradually shrinking everywhere.
_	Chi Chi Izundu on BBC "Newsbeat" expressed the opinion that some of the album "has the vibe of 80s rock", and another part is "hauntingly beautiful" and that the album is "all in all, a very pleasant listen".
_	John Hamilton's look at contemporary reviews notes that "Motion Picture Examiner" was of the opinion that the film has 'Some moments of horror and some intrigue but the thin and far-fetched plot is drawn out to a length that makes it unwieldy', whilst "The New York Times" said of the double bill of "It!" and "The Frozen Dead", 'As horror exercises, they are horrible bores'.
_	You will surely remember that in 1939 we were all of the opinion that Hitler "was" Germany.
_	"In accordance with section 13 (3) of the Education Act 2005, HMCI is of the opinion that this school requires special measures because it is failing to give its pupils an acceptable standard of education and the persons responsible for leading, managing or governing the school are not demonstrating the capacity to secure the necessary improvement.
_	We are strongly of the opinion that in the last analysis economic considerations will outweigh nationalistic affiliations in the Balkans and that a settlement which insures economic prosperity is most likely to be a lasting one."
_	According to a poll conducted by Medián and published on 18 January, 6% of Fidesz voters expressed the opinion that Schmitt should resign.
_	In the article Cook wrote for "The Nation", he ultimately was of the opinion that Hiss was not guilty of the accusations made by Whittaker Chambers who accused Hiss of being a Soviet spy while working for the US State Department.
_	Govind Kund is of the opinion that Shri Krishna stayed here for 21 days from Krishna Pandavas who came to discover Duryodhana.
_	The British ecological economist Clive Spash holds the opinion that critical realism offers a thorough basis—as a philosophy of science—for the theoretical foundation of ecological economics.
_	Luther's response was angry and he expressed the opinion that Eck did not understand the matter on which he wrote.
_	The crown-appointed New York executive council met on April 24 and concluded that "we were unanimously of the opinion that we had no power to do anything."
_	The Mandinka accounts are of the opinion that Fula took many casualties with hundreds of their infantry being decapitated as they tried to scale the wall with ladders.
_	Most of the reviews shared the opinion that while the film was cheesy, they enjoyed the acting.
_	Ksenia Sobchak is of the opinion that, having annexed Crimea from Ukraine in 2014, Russia violated the 1994 Budapest Memorandum; she claimed on 24 October 2017 that "Under these agreements, we agreed that Crimea is Ukrainian, which is the most important for me".
_	Reginald Innes Pocock (1939) mentioned that some people had the opinion that the tiger played a role in the near-extinction of the Indian lion, but he dismissed this view as 'fanciful'.
_	The appellate court pointed out that if Prakash J was of the opinion that the members of the Board (who are members of the College as an unincorporated association) cannot be ascertained, she should have ordered – which she did not – that the College be dissolved under the equitable jurisdiction of the High Court and the property that is held for the purpose of the College (i.e., that part of the Premises that is impressed with a charitable purpose in favor of the College and the money in the College’s accounts) should then either be applied cy-pres, handed to the Public Trustee, or turned over to the Commissioner of Charities.
_	He expressed the opinion that Germany would shortly win the war, but he was a long way out in his calculation, as Germany was defeated six weeks later.
_	The new sentence, replacing one paragraph, said, "However, more than 12 years have elapsed since the act was committed, we are of the opinion that the life sentence awarded by the High Court need not be enhanced in view of the factual position discussed in the earlier paras."
_	Historians, including Robin Jeffry, Faucett and Samuel Mateer, are of the opinion that as with all other Kings of Malabar (Kerala), the Cochin Raja (Perumpadapum Moopil) was also of Nair origin.
_	The art critics who have examined the Lincoln medal are at one in the opinion that it must remain the authoritative medallic representation of
_	Sampson was of the opinion that had it not been for the Battle of Santiago de Cuba, Schley would have been court-martialed.
_	Scholar Stancho Vaklinov considers the identification of the Round Church as the "new golden church" from literature "incontestable", while art historian Nikola Mavrodinov is of the opinion that it is probable.
_	Despite criticising the sonata as a whole, Hadden conveyed the opinion that the "Marche funèbre" "is really the finest movement in the Sonata".
_	There were doubts as to the profitability of the line, but the city engineer was of the opinion that deficits could always be covered by the profits from the line to St. Hanshaugen.
_	Michael Millar, writing in "The Spectator", was of the opinion that "the Equality Bill before parliament today gives employers the right to choose an ethnic minority candidate or female candidate over a white male, specifically because they are an ethnic minority or female."
_	The general manager of "Al Arabiya" wrote an editorial expressing the opinion that Ennahdha is fundamentally a conservative Islamist party with a moderate leadership.
_	These criticisms were repeated on the 10th anniversary, when journalist Jonathan Freedland expressed the opinion that "It has become an embarrassing memory, like a mawkish, self-pitying teenage entry in a diary ... we cringe to think about it."
_	Significant evidence supports the opinion that the actual reason for the Cominform Resolution was the unwillingness of Josip Broz Tito to obey the instructions of Joseph Stalin.
_	Writing several years later, Winston Churchill—who had been First Lord of the Admiralty—expressed the opinion that by forcing Turkey into the war the "Goeben" had brought "more slaughter, more misery, and more ruin than has ever before been borne within the compass of a ship."
_	Several prominent personalities including former cricketer Imran Khan and writer John Birmingham are of the opinion that Richards was the best ever batsman against genuine fast bowling.
_	The pathologist, George Bagster Phillips, was of the opinion that the murderer must have possessed anatomical knowledge to have sliced out the reproductive organs in a single movement with a blade about 6–8 inches (15–20 cm) long.
_	Joseph Goebbels, the Nazi propaganda Minister, was of the opinion that simply gaining power was only part of the process in creating the new German state; the Nazis needed to win the heart of the people.
_	Rapaport had long been of the opinion that there was a lack of suitable education for exceptionally gifted musical children.
_	"Fence for Life" stated the opinion that "politicization" of the fence by various groups was delaying the completion of the security barrier and was likely to block its construction.
_	Both were of the opinion that it was a wonderful shot.
_	These included the opinion that "I believe that pigs look very good roasting on a stick...
_	(1) The Secretary must be of the opinion that the existing rate is unjust, and (2) this opinion must be the result of a full hearing.
_	"NME"s Dan Martin was of the opinion that "Judas" was the song that Gaga should have come back with.
_	In the December 9 "Leavenworth Evening Bulletin", an article noted: "Gen. S. Sandford and Tappan, and Col. Taylor of the Indian Peace Commission, unite in the opinion that the late battle with the Indians was simply an attack upon peaceful bands, which were on the march to their new reservations".
_	Every participating organization must provide mentors for each of the project ideas received, if the organization is of the opinion that the project would benefit from them.
_	His conservatism became more pronounced in his later years: he was adamant about not admitting women to his graduate courses and publicly expressed the opinion that women did not have the natural ability to be great playwrights.
_	The Superintendents were unanimous in the opinion that they could not manage the hospitals without restraints.
_	His contact with Bengali Hindus led him to the opinion that Protestant spiritualty was inadequate to meet the needs of his deeply spiritual Vaisnava friends.
_	In addition, one of justices expressed the opinion that the foreigners should be guaranteed the voting right at local elections.
_	In particular, for an astronaut, he cannot agree with the opinion that space travel and space exploration are nothing but a youthful and dangerous adventurism.
_	Ross was of the opinion that, while the tree was in poor health, it was "far from dying."
_	Karunakara and the villagers are of the opinion that the temple can only be opened by the descendant of Raja Lingeswaran (Rajnikanth), who built the dam as well as the Shiva temple.
_	Before the race, O'Neill expressed the opinion that Intersky Falcon was more likely to win than Rhinestone Cowboy saying that the horse was "a complete one-off" and adding; "The improvement he has made has been amazing.
_	Critics have often expressed the opinion that the film is a social commentary that is reflecting the issues of Japanese society towards the end of the 20th century.
_	Some Indian scholars are of the opinion that the orthodox Shunga emperors were not intolerant towards Buddhism and that Buddhism prospered during the time of the Shunga emperors.
_	Gyllenhaal himself took the opinion that Ennis and Jack were heterosexual men who "develop this love, this bond," also saying in a "Details" interview: "I approached the story believing that these are actually two straight guys who fall in love."
_	However, this began to change in 1964, when the University of Ottawa administration censored an article in La Rotonde espousing the opinion that Queen Elizabeth II was not welcome in Quebec.
_	Social conditions, religion, and national traditions of our country confirm the opinion that Russian Communism is not applicable in Turkey."
_	Philologists are of the opinion that it should be pronounced with the "g" as in "Gertrude".
_	Entrepreneurs are of the opinion that implementing the legal responsibilities arising from IA may cause small-scale companies a serious problem.
_	Some scholars are of the opinion that the work was composed in the 5th century CE.
_	He had several discussions with intellectual friends like Kalki, and was of the opinion that if Subbulakshmi was to act in a film, it could not be a mass entertainer, but would need to carry a universal and uplifting message for the masses.
_	He was of the opinion that it might have actually been a coyote: "[...] they've been traded around quite a bit, brought
_	This story is doubted by Wolfgang Burgdorf, who is of the opinion that "Frederick had a physical disgust of women" and therefore "was unable to sleep with them".
_	Tim Maeyens, 4th in the Olympic single scull finals for Belgium, has also the opinion that students rowing deserve more attention and support.
_	In 1925, Oxford University Press published Wheeler's first book for a general audience, "Prehistoric and Roman Wales"; he later expressed the opinion that it was not a good book.
_	Leaving Cole's division in place (according to Beresford, to protect the Allied flank from further cavalry attack, although Wellington was of the opinion that Beresford was actually securing his line of retreat), Beresford instead called upon Hamilton's Portuguese Division, but Hamilton had moved closer to Albuera to support Alten in fending off Godinot's attack, and the orders took a long time to reach him.
_	At this point, she retired, expressing the opinion that she was glad to leave UCL, for reasons that she did not make clear.
_	Alexander Macrae was of the opinion that these events probably took place sometime in the first half of the 14th century before the Mackenzies became firmly established in the Kintail area.
_	J. Eric Thompson was of the opinion that the Madrid Codex came from western Yucatán and dated to between 1250 and 1450 AD.
_	The "AU" feature was justified (while acknowledging the earlier March review) by the opinion that the game represented a landmark in game development, both on the BBC Micro and other platforms.
_	He was of the opinion that writing was a "recipe not for memory, but for reminding" and the person relying on the written word would only give off the illusion of a person possessing knowledge.
_	McCloy responded in a letter dated 4 July 1944 to John W. Pehle of the War Refugee Board, "The War Department is of the opinion that the suggested air operation is impracticable.
_	Original planners were of the opinion that it would never grow beyond its original square mile (2.6 km²) layout (still known as "the Mile Square").
_	The city council of Ghent was of the opinion that the local museum did not receive a sufficient number of visitors.
_	The Treasury had said it is not set up to prioritize payments, and has given the opinion that it is unclear whether it would be legal to do so.
_	In the "New Statesman" during 2015 Marr expressed the opinion that the new Labour leader, Jeremy Corbyn, may be electable and that Conservative leaders recognise this.
_	Critics shared the opinion that groups did not exist as scientifically valid entities.
_	She was also of the opinion that strip clubs violated women’s rights.
_	Section 152 of The Criminal Justice Act 2003 states that the court must not pass a custodial sentence unless it is of the opinion that the offence (or combination of offences): "was so serious that neither a fine alone nor a community sentence can be justified".
_	The respondent, Commissioner, relies heavily on the case "Helvering v. Horst" especially the language of the opinion that "The power to dispose of income is the equivalent of ownership of it.
_	Oil, one of the companies prospecting for oil in the country, is of the opinion that the national reserves are in excess of 1 billion barrels.
_	Baillie herself was of the opinion that these plays, especially "Ethwald", exemplified her best writing.
_	Everybody was of the opinion that Irfan was good.
_	In 1942, Hans von Boetticher was of the opinion that our species was different enough to assign it to its own genus, and made the new combination "Somalita cabanisi".
_	While most scholars are of the opinion that mulukhiya's origins lie in Ancient Egypt, there is evidence that India is the source of the related species "Corchorus capsularis", which is also used for food as well as fiber.
_	She dissented from the part of the opinion that distinguished the current case from "Montana", stating that the while the Tribal Court did not have the authority to regulate the bank's sale, the court did have the authority to hear a case involving discriminatory conduct by the bank.
_	Zirin maintains the opinion that the aggressive hatred toward Barry Bonds is in large degree due to racism.
_	Neil Arnold of Metal Forces expressed the opinion that with "Necrocacy", "the Californian psychopaths have simply cemented their place alongside Carcass as leaders in a field swamped in clogged up gore".
_	Ron Barassi, drawing comparisons between Australian rules football and Gaelic football was of the opinion that Gaelic Footballers could provide a previously untapped pool of potential Australian Rules players.
_	Some scholars are of the opinion that the 23 member body of the Beth din shel Kohanim also served in the Sanhedrin as a third of the 71 members serving therein.
_	Her future father inlaw is of the opinion that all female bankers are promiscuous and wouldn't approve her marriage to his son, this leads him to sending several of his wealthy friends as potential client to try to lure her to have a sexual relationship with them, to see if she will stand her ground.
_	Swayne indicated the legal direction he was heading by noting at the outset of the opinion that the case involved, “first the question of the intention of Congress, and second, assuming the intention to exist, the question of its power, to tax certain tobacco in the Territory of the Cherokee nation in the face of a prior treaty between that nation and the United States that such tobacco should be exempt from taxation.”
_	Some climate scientists are increasingly of the opinion that the goal should be a complete restoration of the atmosphere's preindustrial condition, on the grounds that too protracted a deviation from those conditions will produce irreversible changes.
_	Nonetheless, the opinion that the 1909 ruling is legally binding continues to persist, even among the better-read and moderate Parsis.
_	Patrice Halgand apparently was of the opinion that this was too many, and attacked on the final climb with 21 km to go.
_	Novalis, himself a geologist and mining engineer, expressed the opinion that Goethe was the first physicist of his time and 'epoch-making in the history of physics', writing that Goethe's studies of light, of the metamorphosis of plants and of insects were indications and proofs 'that the perfect educational lecture belongs in the artist's sphere of work'; and that Goethe would be surpassed 'but only in the way in which the ancients can be surpassed, in inner content and force, in variety and depth—as an artist actually not, or only very little, for his rightness and intensity are perhaps already more exemplary than it would seem'.
_	However, other experts are of the opinion that this is the profile of Angela Borgia.
_	Orion's work would come to be published as "Never Again the Burning Times: Paganism Revisited" by Waveland Press in 1995, although would be heavily criticized in reviews written by both Luhrmann and T.O. Beidelman, both of whom were of the opinion that Orion's Pagan beliefs had clouded her critical interpretation.
_	This choice of languages relies on Seneca the Younger, who spent eight years in exile on Corsica starting in 41 AD and expressed the opinion that the coastal Corsicans were Ligurian but the inlanders were of Iberian extraction, most like the Cantabri.
_	Other manuscripts of "Kalam-i Pir" have him as Diya al-Dīn. Rashid al-Dīn Hamadani has him as Nūr al-Dīn, but Hodgson is of the opinion that this is dubious.
_	Garcilaso de la Vega further mentions that the Jesuit priests taught the "Auto Sacramental" comedy by writing it in Aymara, and the natives of Juli later presented their version of the religious dance to the priests and, later, presented a dialogue to the rest of the Spanish population in such a way that it “changed the opinion that up to that point had regarded the natives as being dumb, rude, or incapable.
_	In the journal "Pacific affairs", Tony Saich is of the opinion that "the author has done a magnificent job of reconstructing the military mobilization in Beijing and the role of the People's Liberation Army in the bloody suppression of the Chinese people's movement."
_	The authors of the "Buildings of England" series express the opinion that it is "by far the grandest church of Stockport", and state "St George is a church on a splendid scale".
_	Critical opinion aligned itself with the opinion that the poem was
_	The historian Simon Ward expresses the opinion that "its design conformed to the generally medieval feel of the walls".
_	Seller was of the opinion that sophisticated filming techniques such as panning, flash-backs, quick cuts, and excessive movement within the frame confused uneducated Africans.
_	On the opposite side of the camp, Child did express the opinion that the ballad "must be of considerable age", though the earliest available to him was datable only to ca. 1700–1750.
_	They hoped to sway Ferruccio Lamborghini away from the opinion that such a car would be too expensive and distract from the company's focus.
_	However, a later memo on 1 May 2009 after discussion with QC David Perry and Tim Jewill, head of the criminal law team at the Ministry of Justice, Brian McNeill "accepted the decision of the Bulgarian courts is to be treated as final and the legal process regarding any appeal by Shields in that country (Bulgaria) has been exhausted", whilst expressing the opinion that had Shields's defence presented the evidence of Witness A for consideration that in the UK "this case would now be referred back to the court of appeal or to the criminal case review commission."
_	Charles Picard shares the opinion that this is the same myth of Erichthonios but he rather suggests the creation of Panathenae.
_	Nina Coltart, in expressing some of her own doubts about psychoanalytic training, noted that "Neville Symington...is of the opinion that a long personal analysis, which we all have as part of our training, leaves the narcissism stronger, and the ego weaker, than they were at the beginning".
_	However, Michael Camille is of the opinion that "though Panofsky's concept of iconology has been very influential in the humanities and is quite effective when applied to Renaissance art, it is still problematic when applied to art from periods before and after."
_	They also hold the opinion that state-funded "Realschulen" and Gymnasiums offered many working-class children the possibility to move up the social ladder.
_	As a result, a “Corrective Action Plan” had been prepared and implemented, but EASA was of the opinion that “it is unlikely that such action would have shown a major effect on the system at the time of or prior to, the accident”.
_	Some are in the opinion that he was also called R. Jeremiah Rabbah (Rabbah = "the Great").
_	Where the Speaker of Parliament is of the opinion that a bill appears to prejudicially affect individual rights or interests (such a bill is known as a hybrid bill) it must be referred to a select committee, and the committee must hear any affected party who has presented a petition to Parliament.
_	However, the Central Jewish Association of Germany was of the opinion that the Nazi government was not deliberately provoking anti-Jewish pogroms.
_	Many newspaper stories expressed the opinion that it was not appropriate that Chambers charge the juvenile as an adult for what most would consider nothing more than a childish prank.
_	"The committee is of the opinion that there is a prima-facie evidence from the personal & medical investigation of victims during the field visit to HLL Factory, Kodaikanal on 4th, 5th & 6th October, 2011 that not only the ex-workers of the HLL, Kodaikanal, but also their new born children have suffered on account of mercury exposure such as Tremor, knee pain, Loss of memory, Loss of teeth, Irregular menstrual period for women, Infertility, Skin problems, Premature delivery of baby by pregnant women and children having ailments like Mental retardation, Deformity of organ, Birth defect like blue baby and Loss of memory were also noticed."
_	Some researchers, including William L. Shirer and Alan Bullock, are of the opinion that the NSDAP itself was responsible for starting the fire.
_	But most equestrian sports authorities are of the opinion that tent-pegging originated in these areas since ancient times in the battlefields as a tactic used by the horsed cavalry against elephant mounted troops.
_	Followers of the Gadadhara parivara are of the opinion that Rupa and Sanatana Goswami, Narottama Dasa Thakura Mahasaya and his guru Loknath Goswami were disciples of Gadadhara Pandita.
_	Philip offered the opinion that the "essence of his work" was "the struggle to render the complex in simple, bare terms; to couch the abstract in the concrete and communicate it directly to the reader".
_	He also expressed the opinion that "Time is Garner's most consistent theme".
_	The colonial government began to record the high water levels at Keta from 1907 onwards, but for a long time they did not do much because of the opinion that the merchants and inhabitants should also invest in saving their own town and businesses.
_	The teams (excepting Ferrari and the other major manufacturers – Renault and Alfa Romeo in particular) were of the opinion that their rights and ability to compete against the larger and better funded teams were being negatively affected by a perceived bias on the part of FISA, the controlling organisation, toward the major manufacturers.
_	Kirch was of the opinion that her petitions were denied due to her gender.
_	There was the opinion that suggested a fear for general situation of the economic structure, that the Japanese economy experienced deflation caused by globalization and the growing international competition.
_	"The committee is of the opinion that the application of the 3LD by the UK in respect of the ELAS case was deficient and that UK regulators and authorities did not adequately respect the ultimate purpose of the Directive."
_	Li Zanhua was said to have secretly communicated to his brother Emperor Taizong the opinion that this was a good opportunity to invade Later Tang, although Emperor Taizong took no actions at that time.
_	Bulgakov, however, was of the opinion that the "Filioque" did not represent an insurmountable obstacle to reunion of the Eastern Orthodox and Roman Catholic churches, an opinion shared by .
_	Some attest that Murtaza ordered the massacre out of distrust, while others are of the opinion that Abaza Hasan was himself actively preparing to seize Aleppo from within, and Murtaza took action to preempt this.
_	Although the commission was of the opinion that the evidence afforded considerable support for the dingo hypothesis, it did not examine the evidence to see whether it had been proved that a dingo took the baby.
_	The president of ReGAIN has asserted that, to the best of his knowledge, "nothing was obtained improperly," and expressed the opinion that the lawsuit request for information on anonymous message board posters was an action "proving that the Legion is a cult which controls information, stifles freedom of expression, and goes after dissenters."
_	Phayer is of the opinion that the concordat conditioned German bishops to avoid speaking out against anything that was not strictly related to church matters, leading to a muted response to the attacks on Mosaic Jews.
_	On the other hand, the newspaper also says that many experts are of the opinion that the experience of performing can help calligraphy students in their more traditional work.
_	The UGP was of the opinion that such an important decision should not be left to them MLAs but should be put before the people of Goa to decide.
_	Because Young pleaded guilty to murder, his exact motive for the crime was never determined, but medical experts and the judge were of the opinion that Young was medically—though probably not legally—insane.
_	Apparently his father was of the opinion that there were already too many graduates of Yale University in Connecticut.
_	However Sadie voiced the opinion that since it was the white that suffered to bring on the separation they needed to be the ones to right the matter and Shoghi Effendi was reported by her to have said "Yes, but we must help them."
_	Many are of the opinion that Kahar was not a rebel or a traitor, but indeed, he was a patriot who had fought for Indonesia's independence.
_	Reacting on 29 August 2005 to a decision of High Court Justice Gerald Winter to free a Fijian citizen and an Australian who had been convicted of sodomy, on the grounds that it was illegal only if committed in a public place, Qarase said he was of the opinion that any law which conflicted with God's laws should be amended, and he would study ways to ensure that homosexual acts remained illegal.
_	Because Schenk was of the opinion that her aunt Katharina, who worked as a maid in Budweis, could notice her niece's disappearance, he also planned to kill her.
_	He was also of the opinion that stronger independent regulation of the press was needed, claiming that broadcast media had always been more strictly regulated.
_	There are some with the opinion that external presence would be interfering with the internal affairs of Thailand but we believe that since Patani is under colonial occupation and its people are struggling to regain their right of self-determination this would not be the case.
_	In his Dictionary of National Biography article (1896) on Peter, the historian C. H. Firth was of the opinion that his popular hatred was hardly deserved.
_	While the majority of the Finns Party were of the opinion that the amendments to the "Marriage Act" should be repealed, the other two parties generally disagreed.
_	If an inspector is of the opinion that a person (section 21) is currently contravening the Act; or has contravened the Act in the past in circumstances that make it likely that the contravention will continue or be repeated he may serve him with an "improvement notice":
_	He always has been of the opinion that the structures actually observed in naturally deformed rocks form the key to our understanding of the tectonic processes and that the development of mechanical models for the origin of these structures must always be compared with natural observations if they are to be truly relevant.
_	An article from a major Cuban social change news source, “Cubanet,” reinforces the opinion that rap motivates change while reggaeton inspires merely dancing.
_	Although the main centre on the island many people were of the opinion that its importance will hardly increase.
_	The assignment to the French left him of the opinion that, "There is nothing about flying that we could learn from foreigners..."
_	Solomon Luria is of the opinion that the dedicator of devoted goods is required to specify that the property or items be given to a priest in order for a priest to be eligible as the recipient.
_	Foley said that after considering the report of the Solicitor General, delivered after an exhaustive examination over two and a half years of the 37 complaints contained in Mr Keogh's third petition, he formed the opinion that it did not disclose any arguable basis on which the Supreme Court could find that there had been a miscarriage of justice.
_	On the other hand, authorities based on Maimonides and Rabbi Yosef Karo, author of the Shulchan Aruch, were of the opinion that semicha could be established by consensus and a Sanhedrin could be formed without waiting for Moshiach.
_	Ingenhoven, the architect of the new station, expressed the opinion that much of Bonatz's original visions, which tended towards "a knight's castle or Valhalla", can still be found in the current building.
_	This provision relating to conditional discharge is useful in offenses of trivial nature or where the offense is committed under peculiar circumstances where no punishment is warranted or the crime involved is such that it is not expedient to place the person on probation or the court is of the opinion that probation would unnecessarily burden the work of a probation officer, particularly at the cost of the other probationers who deserve such handling.
_	We are of the opinion that as advisors we can have a different opinion.
_	He didn not excluded the Ugric impact, as he was of the opinion that the tribe of the Sabir people who joined Hungarians—mentioned by Purple-born Constantine (szabartoiaszfaloi)—is such a tribe.
_	Microsoft is of the opinion that organizations have diverging dynamics and contrary priorities during their software development; some organizations need a responsive and adaptable software development environment, while others need a standardized, repeatable and more controlled environment.
_	In late 1964, the British commentator Neil Wates expressed the opinion that urban renewal in the United States had 'demonstrated the tremendous advantages which flow from an urban renewal programme,' such as remedying the 'personal problems' of the poor, creation or renovation of housing stock, educational and cultural 'opportunities'.
_	General Laake was of the opinion that it served no purpose to prepare for mobilization, as the mobilization itself would take at least three days to carry out in any case.
_	It was he who gave the opinion that the Elector Palatine would have to pass into France incognito, to go to command the Duke of Weimar's troops, and seize de Brissac ; this was why he was pursued there, and why the Elector was stopped on his journey.".
_	Bruce Campbell of Astrotech and other American eyewitnesses in Xichang reported that the satellite post-crash was surprisingly intact, along with the opinion that the official death toll only reflects those in the military who were caught by the disaster and not the civilian population.
_	In a report in The New York Times of 18 June 1922 A Hatfield Jr is quoted from his book ""There are indications which lead me to the opinion that the engraver was no other than that gifted British artist William Humphrys ... in his obituary notice in The Art Journal (1865) it is stated that he engraved the portrait of Washington for United States stamps.
_	MP John Mann of the Labour Party, who concurrently headed the Parliamentary Commons Treasury Committee, called the sum "outrageous" and expressed the opinion that it "should immediately be returned to the Treasury".
_	He held the opinion that the cultural gap between Germany and Turkey would be too large and also held the opinion that Germany didn't need any more laborers because there were enough unemployed people living in the poorer regions of Germany who could fill these vacancies.
_	However, the plausibly prescient British Secretary of State for Business, Enterprise and Regulatory Reform Peter Mandelson, speaking in 2009, expressed the opinion that "however long it might persist as a grouping, as a steering committee for the global economy, the era of the G8 is over.
_	Pinkus has expressed the opinion that these better-organized recording sessions stifled much of the spontaneous creativity that had propelled the group's previous albums.
_	The States were of the opinion that the project was of such importance that if necessary they would exercise eminent domain, "...notwithstanding any Clameur de haro or any opposition whatsoever...".
_	Spot also gave a somewhat positive review of the multiplayer, although criticism was directed towards the game's vehicles, with the opinion that the vehicles could have been more inspired.
_	We are of the opinion that the liability of the accused for Injury No.1 would not require a re-determination in view of the evidence.
_	Some say that there is no differentiation between the so-called internal and external systems of the Chinese martial arts, while other well-known teachers hold the opinion that they are different.
_	To this conception we oppose the opinion that the revolution of the twentieth century shows parallels to earlier revolutions only in its opening phrase, but that later it ushers in a régime of terror without end, of hostility towards everything human, of horrors which carry no remedy, and which can be cured only "ferro et igni"".
_	Also, Janice Wong, a Hong Kong fashion critic, holds the opinion that the prototype of beauty beggar is the advertorial on "personal media"(Chinese:自媒體) platform.
_	He further offered the opinion that the legality of these measures would depend on a number of unknowns, such as how the critical views of evolution-critical views were presented, and possibly the degree of congruence between them and other state policies, such as state science curriculum.
_	Men are generally hairier than women, and Darwin was of the opinion that hairlessness was related to sexual selection; however, several other explanations have been advanced to explain human hairlessness, a leading one is loss of body hair to facilitate sweating.
_	Hughes, Edmund Sharpe's biographer, is of the opinion that Whewell was influential in gaining this award for Sharpe.
_	Sternberg is of the opinion that Berns gives insufficient credit to the role played by intelligence; analytical thinking; and several aspects of creative thinking, particularly conformity arising from family and cultural background.
_	Gottfried Leibniz was of the opinion that space made no sense except as the relative location of bodies, and time made no sense except as the relative movement of bodies.
_	Malachi is acknowledged to have been the last authentic prophet if one accepts the opinion that Nechemyah died in Babylon before 9th Tevet 3448 (313 BCE).
_	From the beginning of the 17th century up to the present day botanists have agreed in the opinion that Cesalpino in this work, in which he took Aristotle for his guide, laid the foundation of the morphology and physiology of plants and produced the first scientific classification of flowering plants.
_	Rae Alexandra of "Kerrang!" magazine, was of the opinion that "It's Not Your Fault" displays "more maturity - and piano - than ever before.
_	Some authors were of the opinion that for best portability, only a single character should be used per data item.
_	The report of the three-member committee, placed in both Houses of Parliament, said it was of the opinion that Justice Sen was 'guilty of misbehaviour' under read with proviso (b) to of the Constitution of India.
_	John Morley was of the opinion that political violence exemplified by the "Samiti" were manifestations of Indian antagonism to the government, and was running a natural course which was culminating in assassinations.
_	This author is of the opinion that half an acre of land on which Lohgarh has been raised is generally occupied by medium sixed bavelis (large houses).
_	He is also of the opinion that Lohgarh was not declared as the capital of the nascent Sikh state because three series of the coins issued by Banda Bahadur from 1710–12 do not carry any name of the city or town after the word "zarb" meaning "minted at".
_	Blatter explained that, as AARs had not yet been trialled outside of Europe, the committee was of the opinion that any experiment must be carried out "globally" before it could be used in a World Cup.
_	A teletext review voiced the opinion that the plot lacked depth, and that it wasn't a great theatrical performance.
_	On the other hand, Bahru Zewde is of the opinion that "Aklilu's impact on Ethiopian politics is not so easily identifiable.
_	Brady, having seen combat in the 1790s with Wayne and during the War of 1812, was of the opinion that the Sauk could be easily defeated with only a few companies of soldiers.
_	Judicial experts are of the opinion that he would have been acquiıtted even he was tried because his responsibilities in the party were not of financial nature.
_	[He well loved bread soaked in wine for breakfast; / To live in pleasure was ever his custom, / For he was a son of Epicurus, / Who was of the opinion that pure pleasure / Was true perfect happiness.]
_	Some polling agencies and political commentators are of the opinion that ODS is on the path to become main centre-right party again.
_	The basis of conference is that unless any race is powerful enough to compete with other races on the question of economics, the said race can not sustain in the world as a race against the onslaught of other races and the conference is of the opinion that the Tamil race has lost its economic competitiveness to sustain as a race and therefore, all efforts should be made to regain the economic superiority of the Tamil People.
_	I have not formed the opinion that he is in any way a wholly bad man.
_	Welch has expressed the opinion that ending the Iraq War is a top priority, and impeachment would distract the Congress from addressing that outcome.
_	Ibn Taymiyyah is of the opinion that ""This (verse) implies condemnation of those who are not Khashi'oon...
_	Acknowledging the efforts of the Signal Corps in compiling data and information on the strength of materials, the use of radio-telegraphy in aeronautics, and other topics, Scriven concluded that "the Signal Corps officials give the opinion that the work of aeronautics in the United States Army should be carried out along its present lines of development, and that the work should receive every reasonable aid and encouragement by Congress."
_	These facts justify the opinion that the basis of the Dominican Rite was the typical Gallican Rite of the thirteenth century, but documentary evidence that the rite was adapted from any one locality is lacking.
_	Jean-Michel Frodon, a French movie critic, expressed the opinion that ""Home" had many viewers but didn't have much echo" because Arthus-Bertrand's personality, activities and his innovative no-cost concept have captured more attention than the movie itself.
_	The poet Marcus Annaeus Lucanus (AD 39–65) was of the opinion that Caesar's victory over Pompey and the fall of Cato the Younger (95 BC–46 BC) marked the end of traditional liberty in Rome; historian Chester G. Starr, Jr. writes of his avoidance of criticizing Augustus, "perhaps Augustus was too sacred a figure to accuse directly."
_	The chaos and destruction has a positive side: the rank and file of Wolfram and Hart express the opinion that it greatly improved the party.
_	In books that were taken on the "Beagle" as references, Henry De la Beche, Frederick William Beechey and Charles Lyell had published the opinion that the coral had grown on underwater mountains or volcanoes, with atolls taking the shape of underlying volcanic craters.
_	As a result the Gold Discovery Committee were of the opinion that this find was the first publisher of the location of the discovery of a goldfield in the Colony of Victoria.
_	This, and Nadal's loss to Nick Kyrgios in the fourth round, his third consecutive early-round loss at Wimbledon, led former players and experts, including Jimmy Connors, to express the opinion that the "aura" around the Big Four had faded.
_	During the campaign, Kemp expressed the opinion that Republican Party leaders did not stand behind the ticket wholeheartedly.
_	But researchers of World War II are of the opinion that the exact number of Asian labourers who died at the Death Railway is known only to the Japanese government.
_	Specifically, some members of the National Assembly are of the opinion that the song – written at the time of the first fight for independence – does not accurately reflect the present era of triumph and success.
_	Other scholars are of the opinion that the Gospel of John was composed in two or three stages.
_	Writing in "Wisden", Jack Bannister was of the opinion that a "worse example of misbehaviour it would be difficult to imagine" and that "rarely on a cricket field has physical violence seemed so close".
_	One of his friends, another gambler named Jobo, had the opinion that having implants in order to attract men was a crazy thing to do.
_	Many in North East Derbyshire were of the opinion that her stance on fracking is the root cause of her defeat having published a letter supporting fracking (going against the national Party policy) on the day the postal votes were arriving.
_	In March came James's refusal to convert, following which Harley and Bolingbroke reached the opinion that James's restoration was not feasible, though they maintained their correspondence with him.
_	W. D. Hamilton was of the opinion that the King's reply at Southwell to Lord Lothian settled the matter of his status:
_	"If," he says, "you were of the opinion that it was your duty to denounce the Guide as heretical, why does a portion of your flock recede from the decision as if it regretted the step?
_	Mark Guishard, a meteorologist with Bermuda Weather Service, was of the opinion that the system had completed tropical cyclogenesis and was a tropical cyclone.
_	Coombes was still of the opinion that he could again be the Champion and challenged Cole to another match.
_	Lyautey had successfully retained the territory he had captured before the war but was of the opinion that he could not advance any further without risking "an extremely painful" mountain conflict.
_	In 1957, Hernán Velasco and Aníbal Ortúzar left "Los Quincheros", with the opinion that the group ought to conclude its history.
_	She expressed the opinion that "in any school of Western mysticism the author and finisher of our faith must be Christ Jesus, the Great Initiator of the West", and treated "the Master Jesus" as her personal spiritual guide.
_	They formed the opinion that this was not desirable in Nottingham.
_	Initially and interchangeably called the North American Hyperthermia Group (NAHG) for a number of years, the North American Hyperthermia Society was founded in 1981 by those who shared the opinion that hyperthermia continued to show promise as a therapeutic modality, and that the growing numbers of investigators and the amount of data produced required a separate forum for discussion of results and planning future directions of research and application.
_	On November 14, 1704 the Massachusetts House of Representatives expressed the opinion that the Acadians in the town were "under little or no restraint, which this House apprehend not safe."
_	He voiced the opinion that Rogers' policies would appear more mainstream were it not for her association with LaRouche, stating with Rogers that LaRouche's support for "investment in public works, separating commercial from investment banking and opposition to corporatism" were similar to the programs of Franklin D. Roosevelt.
_	Dr. Leask expresses the opinion that this cave was constructed long before Kevin's time and it was probably the first and oldest piece of work to be undertaken by man in the glen.
_	She is also of the opinion that the "adverse reaction to organising and mobilizing" women's movements is on the rise compared to earlier times.
_	Music critic Edward Greenfield expresses the opinion that Khachaturian "notably outshone other Soviet contemporaries in creating a sharply identifiable style, something which his successors have found impossible to emulate".
_	Historian Jyotsna Kamat is of the opinion that the didactic work comprising 19 stories dates to the 10th century and was inspired by the Sanskrit writing "Brihatkatha-Khosa".
_	Zec is of the opinion that design may contribute to a significant appreciation and greater success on the international market if it is included as a relevant basis into corporate strategy.
_	Hu was not prepared to abandon Marxism completely, but frankly expressed the opinion that Communism could not solve "all of mankind's problems".
_	So the party line has changed to the opinion that such severe reactions are so rare that the general population doesn't (and shouldn't) need to worry about them."
_	The ambassador's own investigation was of the opinion that Anselm's body had been confused with Archbishop Theobald's and likely remained entombed near the altar of the Virgin Mary, but in the uncertainty nothing further seems to have been done then or when inquiries were renewed in 1841.
_	Some journalists from the study firmly held the opinion that impartial accounts and a detached, namely "objective", reporting style should continue to govern, even within a crowdfunding context.
_	Talking to "Dawn", Tasnim was of the opinion that ""the submarine had come for intelligence gathering purposes.
_	Experts expressed the opinion that Zeman had dominated the debate and appeared as the victor.
_	THKO was of the opinion that it had become impossible to carry on the struggle for independence and democracy within the legal framework and depending on peaceful methods of struggle in Turkey.
_	There is a theory that the kitsunebi is also a kind of onibi, but there is also the opinion that strictly speaking, they are different from onibi.
_	Initially a secret society, the AWB first appeared on the public scene after its members were charged with and fined for tarring and feathering Floors van Jaarsveld, a professor of history who had publicly voiced the opinion that the Day of the Vow, a religious public holiday in remembrance of the Battle of Blood River, was nothing more than a secular event with hardly any real reference point in history.
_	Samarth was of the opinion that saints who sit quietly in the midst of suffering were a shame on mankind and unfit to be saints.
_	However, Warren was of the opinion that laws against flag-burning are "constitutional," and that therefore the defendant's conviction should have been affirmed.
_	The change came after repeated lobbying by the Auckland Regional Council, which was of the opinion that Transit's initial proposal to simply reserve space alongside the duplicate bridge for a later, but separate, rail bridge was not acceptable.
_	He called these "fake news" and expressed the opinion that journalists responsible should be jailed.
_	Section 45 removes the requirement of the Local Government Ombudsman to consider complaints about a school from parents and pupils, as well as strengthening the Secretary of State's power to intervene when they are of the opinion that a governing body is acting or intends to act in an unreasonable manner.
_	In 1901, Melvill expressed the opinion that some malacologists might consider this species to belong in the genus "Calliostoma".
_	Muslim filmmaker Kamran Pasha stated, "I am of the opinion that it is a film of questionable artistic merit, backed by a group of bitter bigots whose only agenda was to incite hatred and violence by smearing the character of Prophet Muhammad."
_	They returned after a few moments and Lord Coleridge declared, "We are all of the opinion that the conviction should be affirmed but we will put our reasons in writing and give them on Saturday next."
_	Merrick was of the opinion that it would be either loved or hated, being a design which is "beautifully fractious, and not quite knowable".
_	However he reported that "I found the permanent way, generally, in a very incomplete state, and the rails especially so much out of adjustment, that I am of the opinion that the Horncastle Railway cannot be opened without danger to the public using the same".
_	Govett became increasingly taken up with eschatology, and he was of the opinion that before the Great Tribulation there would be a selective or partial rapture, and that only the raptured saints (the firstfruits) are worthy to reign with Christ during the Millennium.
_	Palmerston had adopted the opinion that peace with France was not to be relied on, and indeed that war between the two countries was sooner or later inevitable.
_	M. de Lasteyrie however is of the opinion that the Life was written about 955, before the birth of Adhémar.
_	Kaveney concurs with the opinion that the series avoided playing a cliché, "proving that it is possible for a queer character to die in popular culture without that death being the surrogate vengeance of the straight world".
_	However this has been refuted by Kathryn Morrison who expresses the opinion that the carvings date from the late 11th or early 12th century, and that an earlier date is "impossible".
_	Competent judges are of the opinion that if "Victory" had been published as soon as it was written, and just at the close of the war, it would have circulated widely.
_	The fathers of the council were of the opinion that no valid claim could be laid to the conquest of the Philippines other than that based on the right to preach the gospel, with the qualifying clauses, mentioned above.
_	(At one point during the show, Vedder had even stopped the proceedings, clearly of the opinion that Taft's presence was intrusive.
_	He is of the opinion that the creation of Pakistan rendered it obsolete because the two nations had transformed themselves into Indian and Pakistani nations.
_	Long before Namibia's independence from South Africa, SWAPO was of the opinion that the country should become officially monolingual, choosing this approach in contrast to that of its neighbour South Africa (which granted all 11 of its major languages official status), which was seen by them as "a deliberate policy of ethnolinguistic fragmentation."
_	The compounds as depicted have the carbon of the pyrrolidine carbon and the phenyl "cis", but Maryanoff and coworkers are of the opinion that the compound is "trans".
_	In 1566 Dudley formed the opinion that Elizabeth would never marry, recalling that she had always said so since she was eight years old; but he still was hopeful—she had also assured him he would be her choice in case she changed her mind (and married an Englishman).
_	Norman Finkelstein, a writer and professor of political science expressed the opinion that "Charlie Hebdo"'s abrasive cartoons of Muhammad exceeded the boundaries of free speech, and compared those cartoons with the cartoons of Julius Streicher, who was hanged by the Allies after World War II for the words and drawings he had published.
_	Further, he Daily News (April 9, 1867) expressed the opinion that:—
_	However, many hold the opinion that Sheean's gallantry, devotion to duty and self-sacrifice were worthy of the Victoria Cross, with author Robert Macklin stating his "actions were in the highest tradition of the Australian military" and comparing them with those of Vietnam War Victoria Cross recipient Kevin Wheatley.
_	There is almost unanimity in the opinion that Eochaidh is derived from the Gaelic word for horse, eoch or each.
_	In 1961, "The New York Times" reported the opinion that the bikini is permissible for people are not "too fat or too thin".
_	Prior to the attempt, some prominent cycling personalities such as Bradley Wiggins, Eddy Merckx and Chris Boardman expressed the opinion that Voigt had a fair chance of beating the 49.7 km mark.
_	Phayer is of the opinion that in practice Faulhaber, along with Cardinal Preysing, accomplished "little or nothing" of significance in attacking anti-Semitism and that this was due to the priorities of the Vatican and the envoy of Pope Pius XII, Bishop Aloysius Muench.
_	A project may be designated by the Minister of the Environment if he or she is of the opinion that the carrying out of the project may cause adverse environmental effects, or that public concerns related to those effects warrant the designation.
_	Serbia holds the opinion that the thalweg of the Danube valley and the centerline of the river represents the international border between the two countries.
_	Maimonides, both in his commentary to the Mishna (Chullin Ch. 9 and 10) and in his Mishna Torah compilation was of the opinion that the giving of the gifts was completely mandatory outside Israel.
_	The early 3rd century BCE Babylonian writer Berossus was also of the opinion that "Xisthros" landed with his ship in Corduene.
_	Raza is of the opinion that the Bharatiya Janata Party is not an anti Islamic party.
_	The protest letter expressed the opinion that the school should not celebrate a person who has "so flagrantly disregarded human rights".
_	Good also shared the opinion that the career mode is too basic and that it lacks a personality.
_	The Nebraska Attorney General offered the opinion that the Omaha Tribe had the authority to regulate liquor sales on its reservation and it did not interfere with the Nebraska Liquor Commission.
_	Some other historians are of the opinion that Siliwangi is derived from the Sundanese word "Asilih Wewangi", meaning changing title.
_	The agreement caused consternation in parliament and government, and Evensen had difficulty getting it accepted by his own government, where many held the opinion that he had exceeded his authority.
_	"I have always been of the opinion that there never was an overriding reason for this state to be established.
_	(b) if the male person is "not more than three years older" than the female person and the court is of the opinion that the evidence discloses that as between the male person and the female person, the male person is not wholly or substantially to blame.
_	Henderson voiced the opinion that black and white cooperation in the war was not possible.
_	John Bennet expressed the opinion that by Mezana is meant Messana, a Mycenaean Greek form of Messene.
_	Brigadier General Charles A. Willoughby was of the opinion that: "the count of enemy dead at Sanananda could not be considered 'a true count of effective enemy strength' since it included many 'sick and wounded who were killed.'"
_	George Makdisi, in a 1970 investigation into the differences between the Christian university and the Islamic madrasah, was initially of the opinion that the Christian doctorate of the medieval university was the one element in the university that was the most different from the Islamic "ijazah" certification.
_	Some believe that it evokes the nation's tempestuous history, while others are of the opinion that it is a lingering remnant of communism in the country.
_	V instructed Cardinal Bellarmine to deliver this finding to Galileo, and to order him to abandon the opinion that heliocentrism was physically true.
_	, a fourteenth-century literary critic, was of the opinion that the "Suwen" was compiled by several authors over a long period.
_	Eminent Irish tenor Michael Kelly, for whom Mozart created the roles of Don Basilio and Don Curzio in his da Ponte opera "Le nozze di Figaro", was of the opinion that although they played well their performance as a whole was not outstanding; but the image of four of the greatest composers of their time joining in common music-making remains an unforgettable vignette of the Classical era (comprising the second half of the eighteenth century).
_	Some scholars are of the opinion that the source of the story is untraceable.
_	Lee always expressed the opinion that she died of a broken heart.
_	On 21 August, Rabuka said he was of the opinion that Prime Ministers defeated at the polls should not stand again.
_	In addition, the Court was of the opinion that the clemency process could not be regarded as having been tainted by a reasonable suspicion of bias due to the Law Minister's remarks.
_	He also proffered the opinion that Etta's death was a necessary loss, in order to become more emotionally involved with the season.
_	He brought out many theological works and translations from the French; to some of the latter the letters E. A. are affixed, giving rise to the opinion that they were translated by Aggas himself.
_	Following the privacy-based approach most commonly used post-"Katz", the four-justice minority are instead of the opinion that the continuous monitoring of every single movement of an individual's car for 28 days violated a "reasonable expectation of privacy", and thus constituted a search.
_	The police management was of the opinion that this was a valid threat.
_	In January 1894 the Doncaster Liberal Council decided not to adopt him as their candidate for the next election, resolving:"That, after what has transpired between their member of Parliament and the executive, this meeting is of the opinion that Mr. C. J. Fleming, M.P. for the Doncaster division of Yorkshire, no longer retains the confidence of the Liberal party in the division.
_	The court martial minutes include a note by an Admiralty official that, "Their Lordships are of the opinion that Captain Layman is not a fit person to be entrusted with the command of one of H.M.'s ships."
_	The actor and writer Stephen Fry was of the opinion that the coverage was "mind-numbingly tedious", and BBC radio presenter Sue MacGregor expressed disappointment that the coverage had failed to provide sufficient historical context to viewers.
_	Roskill in his September 1894 report submitted to the Home Secretary was of the opinion that the explosion was caused by the blasting of timbers which ignited an accumulation of gas, which ignited the coal dust.
_	An Indian journalist commented in "Newsweek" on the importance of the Wikipedia article to the institute's PR campaign and voiced the opinion that "by letting this go on for so long, Wikipedia has messed up perhaps 15,000 students' lives".
_	Paul Zanker is of the opinion that the Old Drunkard depicts the comedic topos of the retired Hetaira.
_	Although for the most part Japanese academics remain uninterested in this text, some scholars are of the opinion that it may have been written in the Edo period.
_	Some were in the opinion that:
_	Writing in 1933, Cochran expressed the opinion that Robey had been a victim of a largely conservative and "snobbish" attitude from theatre managers, that the comedian was "cut out for Shakespeare", and that if he had been frequently engaged in playing the Bard's works, then "Shakespeare would probably have been popular."
_	Howe, who was the senior officer present and would lead the assault, was of the opinion that the hill was "open and easy of ascent and in short would be easily carried."
_	One of Weill's staff tells him that a competing company is opening a chain of 'dream palaces', where everyone can absorb the same dream simultaneously, but he is of the opinion that it will not work.
_	The Judeo-Christian Alliance has also promoted Van Zile's paper, entitled "Sabeel's One State Agenda", highlighting the opinion that Sabeel has failed to draw attention to the mistreatment of Christians by Muslim extremists in areas under the control of the Palestinian Authority.
_	Early in the 20th century, Theodore Gordon once was of the opinion that the Royal Coachman resembled some form of flying ant, while in the 1950s, Preston Jennings, a noted fly tier and angler thought the Royal Coachman resembled "Isonychia" mayflies.
_	John Larson, who carried out conservation work on the statue, is of the opinion that it was removed deliberately at some time before about 1660 and a coat of wax, probably beeswax, was applied to give it a plainer and a "uniform dull brown appearance".
_	Similarly the authors of the "Buildings of England" series express the opinion that Eccleston is the best of Douglas' estate schools.
_	Rashi expressed the opinion that the reference to "mother's milk" must exclude fowl from the regulation, since only mammals produce milk.
_	According to Shabbethai Bass, Rashi was expressing the opinion that the reference to a "mother" was only present to ensure that birds were clearly excluded from the prohibition; Bass argued that Rashi regarded the ban on boiling meat "in its mother's milk" to really be a more general ban on boiling meat in milk, regardless of the relationship between the source of the meat and that of the milk.
_	In Kurt London's "Film Music", he expressed the opinion that American film music was inferior to European film music because it lacked originality of composition; he cited the music of Max Steiner as an exception to the rule.
_	Some judges have expressed the opinion that mandatory minimum sentencing, especially in relation to alcohol-fueled violence, is not effective.
_	In "R v O’Connor", the High Court of Australia gave the opinion that when an offender is intoxicated, there will likely be a change in their personality and behaviour, which will then affect their self-control; that, while an offender may commit an act which is voluntary and intentional, it is not something that they would have done in a sober state.
_	If the Tribunal is of the opinion that the bill does not have this effect, the President is deemed to have assented to the bill on the day after the day when the Tribunal's opinion is pronounced in open court.
_	KFC chairman Richard Mayer was of the opinion that Reynolds had treated their restaurants division as a "hobby".
_	Early efforts to revise an established literary view of Lovecraft as an author of 'pulp' were resisted by some eminent critics; in 1945 Edmund Wilson expressed the opinion that "the only real horror in most of these fictions is the horror of bad taste and bad art".
_	Christopher Farley from the "Wall Street Journal" was of the opinion that Keys is making 21st century domesticity sexy, and is "an intriguing move for a pop-soul star".
_	Singh all held the opinion that with the fall of Khulna and Chittagong, the primary seaports, Pakistani forces isolated inside the Dhaka bowl would capitulate.
_	One such expatriate Australians Clive James, has been widely quoted (particularly on the back of any the sequence's British paperback editions) as holding the opinion that "The Dance...was the greatest modern novel in English since (James Joyce's) Ulysses."
_	Shortly after the statue's unveiling an article in the local press said that it "is a fine piece of creative sculpture", praising its "vigour and energy" and expressing the opinion that "it will form a fitting companion monument to the late Dr. Mond".
_	Pollard and Pevsner in the "Buildings of England" series are of the opinion that the church is the best building on the Speke estate, "though it is unshakeably redolent of a sports hall and boiler chimney".
_	Reviewers were divided on the quality of the game's visuals, with some feeling they were dated, and others of the opinion that they were strong.
_	I ordered the construction of a stable capable of accommodating 200 horses, and John Steane is of the opinion that it was intended to provide for the entire entourage of the Household, or possibly even act as a royal stud.
_	The Board was of the opinion that the children would only become good and proper members of "industrial society" if they were completely removed and not allowed to return.
_	On 21 June 1971, the ICJ reversed its earlier decision not to rule on the legality of South Africa's mandate, and expressed the opinion that any continued perpetuation of said mandate was illegal.
_	He was also of the opinion that, as a newspaper editor, he would no longer be able to speak with the same freedom if he were in office.
_	However, Gandhi was of the opinion that this would reinforce her anti-Sikh image among the public and arm her political opponents.
_	The inquest returned a verdict of accidental death, but the jury expressed the opinion that the Chief Engineer of the Company was indirectly to blame, as there was evidence of neglect in the upkeep of the track.
_	The Québec game officials did, however, put forward the opinion that a dynamic management of the water levels and flows of the Caniapiscau Reservoir could have avoided the high mortality observed in September 1984, either completely, or at least reduced it to levels observed in recent years.
_	Shere was of the opinion that while the two tower operators - who were characterised as completely reliable, competent, and somewhat embarrassed at their report - had genuinely seen something, the object did not display any performance capabilities beyond those to be expected of an ordinary private aircraft, and as there was no other obvious explanation, concluded that they had most likely seen such an aircraft.
_	Under s11A(1), the Ombudsman must consult with other ombudsmen if he forms the opinion that a complaint relates to a matter which could be subject to an investigation by them.
_	Marais was of the opinion that De Klerk would lose "every by-election in the run up to a general election" in which De Klerk and the National Party "would be smashed".
_	The youth counselors are of the opinion that they are the worst.
_	We are of the opinion that the film relies heavily on appeals to fear, prejudice and unworthy human emotions.
_	He had earlier expressed the opinion that bandhs and hartals were detrimental to the State's interests.
_	The ICRC has expressed the opinion that "If civilians directly engage in hostilities, they are considered 'unlawful' or 'unprivileged' combatants or belligerents (the treaties of humanitarian law do not expressly contain these terms).
_	The Samnites were of the opinion that their victory would ensure a permanent peace with the Romans; and indeed, peace did hold from the time of the surrender in 321 until 316 BC.
_	Šilhavý (1997) offers the opinion that "... the extremum principles of thermodynamics ... do not have any counterpart for [non-equilibrium] steady states (despite many claims in the literature)."
_	Connick expressed the opinion that the first job of stained glass was to serve the architectural effect, and he believed that his greatest contribution to glasswork was "rescuing it from the abysmal depth of opalescent picture windows" of the sort popularized by Louis Comfort Tiffany and John La Farge.
_	Based on these findings the National Trust formed the opinion that the building should be preserved in its present form and not reconstructed to its windmill form.
_	Rogan has stated the opinion that the revamping of "Eight Miles High" featured on "(Untitled)" represented the ultimate fusion of the original Byrds and the newer line-up.
_	However, Bernoulli himself was the opinion that his own kinetic theory of gases was only a speculation, and likewise he regarded Le Sage's theory as highly speculative.
_	The 11th-century St Anselm put forth the opinion that faith and rationalism were compatible and encouraged rationalism in a Christian context.
_	Some research scholars are of the opinion that these rock carvings belong to Neolithic and chalcolithic periods.
_	Vaishnava traditions are of the opinion that Vishnu is both unlimited and yet still capable of having specific forms, as to give arguments to the contrary (to say that God is incapable of having a form) is to limit the unlimitable and all-powerful Supreme.
_	The right to die is a concept based on the opinion that a human being is entitled to end his or her own life or to undergo voluntary euthanasia.
_	The architectural historians Richard Pollard and Nikolaus Pevsner are of the opinion that "the steeple is altogether and quite awkwardly too big for the church".
_	However, by the time this bird was last seen, most observers had formed the opinion that this bird was a first-winter Eurasian curlew.
_	"Mean Machines Sega" reviewer took a different position: he believed that the track editor adds "a whole new dimension", but raised the issue of whether players would want it if they already own the original game. "" reviewer gave the opinion that it introduces innovations that add to the game's interest.
_	They formed the opinion that the United States had no right to fight in Vietnam, not only because of the victims but mainly because of what they saw as an imperialistic foreign policy.
_	When Conant found out about the agreement, he expressed the opinion that he would feel more at home on the staff of the "Chicago Tribune", a newspaper renowned for its anti-British views.
_	Despite the verdict of the meeting, Lancashire's committee remained of the opinion that Mold bowled legally; the Lancashire president A. N. Hornby and several of Mold's teammates also publicly backed the bowler.
_	Also, at the press-conference in Moscow on 7 July 2011 on the results of Putin-Azarov talks, Prime Minister Putin said that Russia was against re-consideration of «the gas agreement of 19 January 2009» and, as he thought, criticism of that agreement by Ukrainian government had a «political constituent; an intention to impose the opinion that the predecessors had everything done badly».
_	In 1987 the opinion that the NADK was "the only effective fighting force" opposing the Vietnamese was more often expressed by Western observers.
_	He wrote the opinion that overturned the conviction of Andrea Yates trial where the panel wrote, "Dr Dietz's false testimony could have affected the judgment of the jury.
_	Historians are of the opinion that the last 18 verses of the Srirangam Inscription forms a separate poem composed by Kavi Bhushana as indicated at the end of the inscription.
_	The teams (excepting Ferrari and the other major manufacturers – Renault and Alfa Romeo in particular) were of the opinion that their rights and ability to compete against the larger and better funded teams were being negatively affected by a perceived bias on the part of the controlling organisation (FISA) toward the major manufacturers.
_	"New York Times" reviewer Frank Nugent was of the opinion that the cast was trying too hard, and "the general effect, consequently, is not so much that of an appeal to the humorous instinct of the onlooker as an attack upon it".
_	(Note, however, that Borlase was of the opinion that the saint's name had been inserted in the list of Breaca's companions by mistake.)
_	Their 19th-century biographer, Gyárfás István, in 1870 was of the opinion that they originally spoke Hungarian, together with the Iazyges population.
_	Dinicola was also of the opinion that the willingness to use characters like Anarky to scrutinize Batman's heroism, rather than simply assert it, allowed the game to ultimately prove and uphold Batman as a heroic figure in a way "City" could not.
_	If the court is of the opinion that it is proper to hear oral evidence in terms of HCR 6(5)(g), the court may determine which persons to call as witnesses; it may also determine the issues in respect of which oral evidence must be presented.
_	The architectural historians Pollard and Pevsner in the "Buildings of England" series express the opinion that this is one of the "very finest" churches designed by the firm of Paley, Austin and Paley.
_	In her trial, Sawyer's female neighbor testified in defense of Lanah's character, corroborating the opinion that Sawyer would not willingly go to bed with a man prior to marriage, however the neighbors testament was ignored due to the fact that she was a woman too, and could therefore not be trusted to have a sound legal opinion.
_	In 2002, Page was arrested on suspicion of inciting racial hatred in a speech he gave at a fair in Gloucestershire, but was later released as police were of the opinion that no crime had been committed.
_	The Jewish Encyclopedia contends that the opinion that the Old Testament commanded hatred of the enemy derives from a misunderstanding of the Sermon on the Mount, wherein Jesus said: "Ye have heard that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy neighbor and hate thine enemy.
_	Political analyst Theodore Couloumbis told Reuters that the incident could cost Golden Dawn votes, especially among women, though other experts were of the opinion that images of violence could play in their favour—a Facebook page dedicated to Kasidiaris picked up 6,000 'likes' within 24 hours.
_	Although Daines Barrington is of the opinion that it is of Spanish origin, a poem of Francesco Berni is the earliest known writing to mention the game; it affords proof that it was at least commonly played in Italy at the beginning of the 16th century.
_	However, at least one critic has expressed the opinion that the Statement, drafted by academic administrators, essentially gives academic administrators the right to determine the limits of such freedom.
_	"Mojo" described the album as "unreservedly recommended, but for the uninitiated and obsessives only", while Pitchfork Media offered the opinion that "these songs don't stray far from the original pieces, instead working as tasteful updates that add a dab of cohesion that was never needed in the first place."
_	All four were of the opinion that the formalities of institutional academia alone were not sufficient to undertaking philosophical and critical thought.
_	Hudson was of the opinion that the adults of this species first appear around February but are most abundant in April.
_	He was also of the opinion that it sounded like "Jam" from 1991, thus dated.
_	"Wisden " was of the opinion that Hall "probably never bowled faster or straighter."
_	In a letter to the same bishops Pope Siricius approves the sentence and also condemns the opinion that Mary did not always preserve her virginity.
_	By the end of 1942, the Armored Corps were of the opinion that the new M4 Sherman gave adequate solution for the present and the near future, while being reliable, cheap and much easier to transport and they had no need for a heavy tank.
_	I am of the opinion that she's dead.
_	A 2014 review presented the opinion that the genus is dubious.
_	We are all of the opinion that it does.
_	He was of the opinion that the people deserved to feel secure that law shall safeguard their cherished values and norms.
_	Walwyn had always expressed the opinion that Mercer was his ‘beau ideal’ as a stable jockey.
_	Some medical professionals hold the opinion that such total occlusion practice actually exacerbates the deterioration of sight in those who might still have a remainder of limited or partial sight.
_	Hudal maintained the opinion that a Faustian bargain among socialism, nationalism and Christianity is the way of the future.
_	Author Reebee Garofalo agreed, and expressed the opinion that the line "We're saving our own lives" was a "distasteful element of self-indulgence".
_	I am also of the opinion that we were not a thrash metal band, but a speed metal one."
_	Moreover, experts and the majority political players are of the opinion that the glacial water bodies are only tourist spots and don’t have any religious significance.
_	M. L. W. Laistner was of the opinion that "even if the "Historia Augusta" was propaganda disguised as biography, it is still a wretched piece of literature", while Ronald Syme noted that with respect to the author's Latin prose:
_	From all sides (there was) exaggeration, and while Michetti had abandoned himself to his flaws, drifting from his eagerness to become a colorist to a display that bordered on the baroque, much to the opinion that sometimes the thrill of his palette convulsed his criterion of artist.
_	Anjuman’s friends and supporters are of the opinion that Neia and his family believed her poetry to be a disgrace to their reputation.
_	The BBC expressed the opinion that the reason for the restriction was to protect Jacob from being proven wrong.
_	He soon realized that some of the umpires were of the opinion that they "don't have to know the right
_	If the "BPjM" is of the opinion that there is still a risk of harm to young people, it must begin the legal proceedings afresh.
_	In retrospect, Getzler expresses the opinion that the system of local justices would have fallen into further disrepute and ultimate decline and desuetude without these reforms.
_	The "Daily Express" ran a poll for readers to vote on what they believed Halfway's secret was: 39% of readers thought that Halfway was "ashamed" of something that happened in the Army; 26% of readers were in the opinion that Halfway had given his kidney to Aidan Maguire (Patrick Bergin) to repay him; 15% of readers believed that Halfway left the Army; 13% were convinced that he had been stabbed; and the remaining 7% of readers thought it was something else.
_	The team was of the opinion that the place "was used as a sacred site from Neolithic times to about the 4th century AD."
_	Most were of the opinion that the referee was not up to the standard required to officiate at a match at this level.
_	Neil Matterson had been Searle’s coach and was now of the opinion that he could beat Kemp and thus challenged for the World Title.
_	Tamekichi expresses the opinion that he won’t come back and when O-tane says she’s worried he’ll go hungry he tells her that the boy will scavenge from dustbins.
_	The Court noted, "... determinations of immunity under the CDA should be resolved at an earlier stage of litigation," having earlier noted in the opinion that the lower court had denied Dirty World's motion to dismiss, motion for summary judgment, motion to revise judgment, motion for judgment as a matter of law, as well as their motion for leave to file an interlocutory appeal.
_	A few authors of 20th-century books on Christian symbolism (such as Edward N. West in "Outward Signs: The Language of Christian Symbolism", 1989) have been of the opinion that the form of the diagram with one vertex down and the captions "PATER" and "FILIUS" in the two top nodes is more appropriate for Western Christianity with its Filioque, while the form of the diagram with one vertex up represents more closely the doctrine of the Trinity in Eastern Christianity (without the Filioque)—though this hyper-refined interpretation does not agree with 13th-century usage, nor with the use of versions of the diagram with one vertex up by modern Catholics and Protestants.
_	He explained: "He was of the opinion that, although the album was very strong, it might benefit the US audience to have a few additional cuts tailored more for the American ear.
_	During the following year Francesco discussed the techniques of Italian Renaissance painters with Joshua Reynolds, with Zuccarelli expressing the opinion that Paolo Veronese and Tintoretto painted on gesso grounds, while Titian did not.
_	Williams was of the opinion that the power base of Moddan, and his son Earl Óttarr, was in Caithness and Sutherland, not in Orkney.
_	Being the land of the Jewish people, the PM is of the opinion that Israel is thus entitled to principles that combine the nation and the state of the Jewish people and grant “equal rights for all its citizens, without discrimination against religion, race or sex.
_	Another reviewer lauded the educational information, but said Winget "uses a form of tough love that is verbally harsh, caustic, and confrontational" and expressed the opinion that psychological counseling was a missing element from the show.
_	Scholars that promote the opinion that a strong similarity exists between Li and Hong note that both rallied a large number of people behind a religious or spiritual cause in order to challenge the "status quo".
_	Wegener is also quoted with the opinion that considerations of the West German authorities on how to deal with the hostage situation had likely been mainly driven by the desire to prevent the country from becoming the focus for further acts of terror.
_	Some of the experts who dealt with the artefacts are even of the opinion that the burial grounds, at least in part, were already being used in Alamannic times, putting their beginnings as far back as the 5th century.
_	If they engage in arbitrage in reaction to a stock mispricing, and the mispricing persists for an extended period, clients of the money management firm can (and do) formulate the opinion that the firm is incompetent.
_	On 18 January 2013, the Supreme Court dismissed the Italian Government's argument with Justice Chelameshwaran was "of the opinion that sovereignty is not 'given' but it is only asserted.
_	Though he was of the opinion that the size of the Upper House ought not to be increased, in August Davidson approved the nomination of sixteen new members.
_	John Taylor Brown, writing in "Encyclopædia Britannica", expressed the opinion that Leighton's persecution and punishment "form one of the most disgraceful incidents of the reign of King Charles I".
_	At the inquest that followed, McKerral said; "I am of the opinion that Barclay and Bamford had an argument over working matters and that Bamford loaded the gun and shot Barclay.
_	Where on the trial of any person for infanticide the jury are of the opinion that the person charged is not guilty of infanticide, but that she is shown by the evidence to be guilty of child destruction, the jury may find her guilty of that offence.
_	The "New Sporting Magazine" offered the opinion that he would be a "formidable goer" as a four-year-old, but he did not contest any races in 1832.
_	Psychologists, notably B. F. Skinner, are of the opinion that promises of punishment seem to play little or no role in deterrence of adult behavior.
_	Richard Robert Cherry, a future Chief Justice of Ireland, speaking in 1911 was of the opinion that:
_	In the same interview, Gossage voiced the opinion that amphetamines are not "a performance-enhancing drug", though he admitted that using them was illegal at the time.
_	In a commentary on Francis Fukuyama's "The End of History and the Last Man", Roger Scruton calls Kojève "a life-hating Russian at heart, a self-declared Stalinist, and a civil servant who played a leading behind-the-scenes role in establishing both the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade and the European Economic Community" and states the opinion that Kojève was "a dangerous psychopath."
_	Salam also held the opinion that the Quran and the Islamic spirit of study and rational reflection was the source of extraordinary civilizational development.
_	Robert R. Faulkner is of the opinion that had Newman not been music director at Twentieth Century Fox, composers such as Bernard Herrmann, Alex North, and David Raksin, all of whose music was somewhat radical, might never have had such major careers in Hollywood.
_	"No one made any comment on this reply and I became very definitely of the opinion that at heart they agreed with me."
_	Buxton was of the opinion that Horsefield was "not a mere country herbalist, but an excellent scientific botanist", and the 1826 meeting presented Buxton with opportunities to meet a like-minded circle of men where previously his had been a solitary pursuit.
_	Publisher John Joseph Stockdale was of the opinion that there was a ghostwriter, Jack Mitford.
_	In more recent years, Stephen Thomas Erlewine of Allmusic expressed the opinion that "You Are Not Alone" was amongst some of the best songs Jackson ever released, calling the song seductive.
_	The Franciscan John Colgan, another 17th-century scholar, pointed out that Óengus and Maelruain could not have completed the "Martyrology of Tallaght" as it stands, as several entries are from periods after the death of both, but he also formed the opinion that the later entries had been made at Tallaght, where Óengus and Maelruain worked together, so justifying Ua Gormáin's use of the name "Martyrology of Tallaght".
_	and affirmed in Minister of Indian Affairs & Northern Development v. Ranville (1982) where Dickson J. held: " I was rather of the opinion that this troublesome notion of persona designata had been given its quietus in the recent Herman decision.
_	Oppenheimer and Gioffre both share the opinion that "Hard Again" is Muddy Waters comeback album.
_	One critic is of the opinion that Clarke "has dedicated his career to evoking a "sense of wonder" at the sublime spaces of the universe ..." Editor and SF researcher Mike Ashley agrees:
_	Following the 2017 election, both Prime Minister Theresa May and Leader of the Opposition Jeremy Corbyn expressed the opinion that she should be known as the "Mother of the House".
_	Peate was of the opinion that the Mari Lwyd was "no doubt a survival of a pre-Christian tradition" that had once been spread across Britain and other parts of Europe, and which – having survived the Christianisation of Britain – had been renamed "Mari Lwyd" in reference to the Virgin Mary during the Middle Ages.
_	James Dobie was of the opinion that the name 'Morishill' was derived via the old name 'Moreishiels' from the large shielings or temporary summer dwellings for shepherds erected on the site.
_	Australian botanist, Joseph Maiden, was of the opinion that Dennis Considen, a surgeon on the First Fleet deserves credit for being the first person to recognize the medicinal value of Eucalyptus oil extracted from "E. piperita" found growing on the shores of Port Jackson in 1788.
_	He is of the opinion that Kashmirs are not enemies of India or hold any grudge against its inhabitants.
_	The Swedish professor Ingvar Bergström, who had worked for "C-byrån" in Gothenburg during the war, was of the opinion that Holst had been murdered.
_	Also, the physicians attending the incapacitated President were of the opinion that he would never recover from the physical and mental consequences of the stroke and that accordingly he would never be able to resume the powers and duties of the office.
_	From these interviews he formed the opinion that the Christian clergy in many parts of Singapore were wary of inter-faith dialogue.
_	In 1887, Edwin Johnson expressed the opinion that early Christian history was largely invented or corrupted in the 2nd and 3rd centuries.
_	According to Farhad Nomani, "it is known that Ibn `Abas", a companion of Muhammad, "was of the opinion that the only forbidden "riba" was the pre-Islamic "riba"."
_	Alex Joffe of the "Wall Street Journal" expressed the opinion that the looting of antiquities during the 2011 civil unrest in Egypt made Hawass' quest to return Egyptian antiquities to Egypt "misguided or at least poorly timed."
_	However, Councilman Licata was of the opinion that Schell's proposal didn't go far enough because it did not consider scrapping light rail completely and focusing the money on carpool lanes and expanding the monorail.
_	Swinburne called for reintroduction of the 'Belt' or 'Tawse' into Scottish schools, expressing the opinion that corporal punishment would solve what he believed were endemic discipline problems.
_	On 23 June Fitzwilliam wrote to the Duke of Portland that he believed the government had moved to the Whig position and that "for my own part I am now ready, not only to adopt the opinion that a junction should take place, as your sentiment, but to advise it as the genuine offspring of my own judgement...[his only condition was that] as much weight and sway should be given to us as possible.
_	“We are of the opinion that the undertaker is well acquainted with the principles of this particular branch of Mechanics and very capable of carrying it into execution & therefore worthy of Public encouragement.”
_	In addition, many Leonardo experts, such as Carlo Pedretti and Alessandro Vezzosi, are of the opinion that the painting is characteristic of Leonardo’s style in the final years of his life, post-1513.
_	Flinders Petrie, a disciple of Charles Piazzi Smyth, is of the opinion that it was used earlier by the ancient Egyptians.
_	In the third edition of "Soviet Communism: A New Civilisation" (1941), for instance, the Webbs voiced the opinion that in 1937 "strenuous efforts had been made, both in the trade union organisation and in the Communist Party, to cut out the dead wood".
_	Jae-min is of the opinion that even with marriage, it should not affect how both of them are to lead their lives.
_	The BFU was of the opinion that NOSIG should not have been in the METAR, and that a SPECI would have been required.
_	Fine has described his general approach to philosophy as follows: "I’m firmly of the opinion that real progress in philosophy can only come from taking common sense seriously.
_	The investigatory chamber was of the opinion that no violation had occurred.
_	Hubbard expresses the opinion that "in this work, the city's half-timber revival reached its very apogee".
_	Le Jau was of the opinion that the freed slave named Wateree Jack purposefully led Barker and his men into an ambush on May 17, laid by a force that he said contained a "Body of Northern Indians being a mixture of Catabaws, Sarraws Waterees &c. to Number of 3. or 400".
_	Lord Scarman was of the opinion that blasphemy laws should cover all religions and not just Christianity and sought strict liability for those who "cause grave offence to the religious feelings of some of their fellow citizens or are such as to tend to deprave and corrupt persons who are likely to read them".
_	Some scholars are of the opinion that there is also an underlying personal conversation between Tulsidas and Lord Rama all through the text of "Ramcharitmanas".
_	He is of the opinion that recent testing of children in Australia that showed a decline in results in Australian children may be caused by iodine deficiency.
_	The right to renounce Nigerian citizenship is established in § 29 of the 1999 Constitution of Nigeria, which states that "any citizen of Nigeria of full age who wishes to renounce his/her Nigerian citizenship shall make a declaration in the prescribed manner for the renunciation", which the government is obliged to register except when Nigeria is physically involved in a war or when the President of Nigeria is of the opinion that the renunciation is contrary to public policy.
_	The 2 founders were of the opinion that ABA law school accreditation standards discouraged the evening study of law by working executives, who desired to advance their careers through adjunctive education in law, and by others, including disadvantaged minorities, who also did not have the luxury of attending law school without being concurrently employed, but, who, nonetheless, desired to contribute to society as legal professionals.
_	According to the book "Saturday Night: A Backstage History of Saturday Night Live", Morris was frequently unhappy during his tenure on "SNL" from 1975–1980, and expressed the opinion that he was usually typecast in stereotypical roles.
_	The Cleveland Indians had been negotiating to sign Aparicio, but Indians General Manager Hank Greenberg expressed the opinion that he was too small to play in the major leagues.
_	He also offers the opinion that being a one-off race meant the team did not get to practise under the competitive conditions of running in a heat and semi-final first.
_	Political observers who bolster the opinion that a permanent campaign has had a significant impact on recent presidencies argue that decisions by presidents have increasingly been made with considerations to their impact on voter approval.
_	The court expressed the opinion that in the field of internet services, the difference in the nature of services offered by businesses may not be of much consequence due to the method of operation on the internet.
_	The authors of the "Buildings of England" series express the opinion that the steeple is "well-proportioned".
_	For certain sexual offences, no committal hearing is required if the Public Prosecutor is of the opinion that there is sufficient evidence providing a foundation for a full and proper criminal trial.
_	Mirranay was strongly of the opinion that creation of a united, strong and prosperous Afghanistan is possible only if people of all ethnic backgrounds in the country are given the opportunity of participating in the social, political and economic life of the Afghan society
_	He has expressed the opinion that the 2009 Christmas Day attempted airplane bombing, the 2009 Fort Hood shooting, and the 2010 Times Square car bombing attempt have not prodded the United States into the appropriate action, but rather have resulted in politically correct denial by U.S. government authorities, and inaction by most American Muslims.
_	Gabriele Marcotti gave the opinion that "FIFA is pretty much changing the rules halfway through the qualifying tournament."
_	Having interfaced with the Russians and watched a number of incidents at close quarters including the deaths of two civilians Bellamy formed the opinion that "it seemed abundantly clear to us that the Russians had been given carte blanche to carry out any excess in Berlin as a means of punishing and totally subduing the population."
_	At the time the money was gifted there was a minor local furore as some Levenshulme residents expressed the opinion that it was "immoral" for the then urban district council to accept the money from Carnegie as they believed the money to be "tainted".
_	The writer elucidates the opinion that the Church has deviated by its stringent rules to the point where it no longer serves Jesus Christ, or as put in his words in one of the interviews:
_	By the end of 1966, most of the Cultural Revolution Group were of the opinion that the Red Guards had become too much of a political liability.
_	Well, it's hard to know really, given that he's essentially just being himself", but comes around to the opinion that "Grandma's House is sharply written, with some nice lines and a bit of edge to it."
_	In the same essay Duncan Black Macdonald (1911) is credited with the opinion that "fruitful investigation of the Prophet's life (should) proceed upon the assumption that he was fundamentally a pathological case."
_	Lea left Slade after Holder's departure from the band in 1992, being of the opinion that Slade was all four of them or nothing.
_	Shiga was of the opinion that as a work of literature it should move readers directly, not by indirectly conveying ideology.
_	The police and the government were of the opinion that the death penalty deterred offenders from carrying firearms and it was for this reason that such offences remained punishable by death.
_	However, since only four of the nine Supreme Court Justices joined the opinion that required a defendant to do more than place his products in a "stream of commerce," some lower courts still rule that doing so is adequate for a court to exercise personal jurisdiction.
_	Jagger was of the opinion that the Stones' then manager, Allen Klein, was not paying them everything they were due.
_	After watching the movie, the plaintiff was of the opinion that it is based on the story of his play.
_	Gordon's brother, H. W. Gordon, was of the opinion that the British officers could easily have escaped from Khartoum up until 14 December 1884.
_	At a meeting of representatives of the main county cricket clubs in 1888, one representative expressed the opinion that a "batsman who defended his wicket with his body instead of with his bat should be punished".
_	Others, including William L. Shirer and Alan Bullock, are of the opinion that the NSDAP itself was responsible.
_	On the basis of these policies, historians have argued that "Given the hostility toward Chinese expressed by many colonial officials and the lack of physical and social integration, it is not surprising that most Malays formed the opinion that Chinese were only transients in Malaya with no real attachments to the country."
_	They expressed the opinion that there had been no breach of 6-1 (7-5 on fair trial and 8-4 on timely proceedings), no breach of 6-2 (9-3), and no breach of 8-1 or 8-2 (4-4, with the President using a casting vote).
_	It belongs to an elderly man Scholes (Moore Marriott), who is of the opinion that it is a stony, barren and useless plot, and is happy to sell for what seems on the surface a generous price.
_	The second "preliminary executive" () of the Confessing German Evangelical Church was of the opinion that the confirmations were not to be delayed.
_	Metternich, of the opinion that France should not be dismembered, was happy with the result:
_	Entry into this category requires that the peers of the candidate be of the opinion that the actions of the person in question were above and beyond the limits of reason.
_	Many are of the opinion that these three figures had been excluded from national history, even though they had contributed to the fight for independence between 1945 till 1949 in Indonesia.
_	Lenin was of the opinion that taking power should occur in both St. Petersburg and Moscow simultaneously, parenthetically stating that it made no difference which city rose up first, but expressing his opinion that Moscow may well rise up first.
_	Attorney-General Sir Hartley Shawcross expressed the opinion that Stanley could not be prosecuted as the notoriety he gained from the tribunal would inhibit a fair trial.
_	The Prime Minister replying to Mr Denman in the House of Commons on 21 May, said that in view of the formation of an Administration embracing the three main political parties, H.M. Government was of the opinion that the provision of the Ministers of the Crown Act, 1937, relating to the payment of a salary to the Leader of the Opposition was in abeyance for the time being, as there was no alternative party capable of forming a Government.
_	In 1987 the opinion that the NADK was "the only effective fighting force" opposing the Vietnamese was expressed by foreign observers.
_	However, some authorities in the early twentieth century held the opinion that most equines called tarpans, in fact, were domestic or feral horses, not a separate species.
_	"The subject has been discussed in the Institution of Civil Engineers, and every eminent engineer was of the opinion that the Government inspector was clearly wrong".
_	Haldimand, who was of the opinion that the negotiations were conducted in good faith, and some of the Vermonters continued to correspond through the winter, but with the British in a weak position, and Vermont in a position that appeared strong, nothing of substance came of the exchange.
_	However, some authorities are of the opinion that use of antibiotics is contra-indicated once abscesses have begun to form, as they pre-dispose to lymphatic spread of the infection (so-called bastard strangles) which has a much higher mortality rate.
_	The Central Bureau of Investigation, the main Indian investigating agency, is of the opinion that the acts of violence were organized with the support from the then Delhi police officials and the central government headed by Indira Gandhi's son, Rajiv Gandhi.
_	He was of the opinion that ‘no amount of legislation will prevent homosexuals from being the subject of dislike and derision, or at best of pity’.
_	Nevertheless, he was of the opinion that the sentencing judge should not have imposed a punishment part of such severity on such a young offender.
_	Not surprisingly given the then low status of the Welsh language, the panel were of the opinion that the record was just a strange gimmick.
_	Our attitude gives rise to the opinion that we want war at any price."
_	Art historian André Grabar placed it in the 14th century, scholar Nikola Mavrodinov dated it to the 13th century, while archaeologist Krastyu Miyatev is of the opinion that both theories are equally likely.
_	Most critical reviews of his poems are of the opinion that they fall short of his other writings.
_	When the captain on the raider intimated to the captain of the Rangitane that he was going to Nauru again, the captain of the Rangitane expressed the opinion that the cruisers would have been warned, and that the raider would be running into trouble.
_	Sr. was of the opinion that bankruptcy was good for the ABA since it removed most of the top management that got the ABA into dire straits in the first place:
_	According to Venn, a Simon Bradstreet attended Emmanuel during this time, receiving an M.A. degree, but genealogist Robert Anderson is of the opinion that this was not the same individual.
_	"Despite the opinion that line training destroys the airline pilot industry (“Pay to fly”), line training is in itself necessary [...].
_	President Nixon was of the opinion that:
_	If an inspector is of the opinion that activities are being carried on, or are likely to be carried on, involving the risk of serious personal injury, he may serve him with a "prohibition notice" (section 22):
_	With no personal experience or scientific measurements, they relied merely upon earlier, non-scientific accounts citing "millions of birds" and the current paucity of resident specimens to arrive at the opinion that the bird population had been devastated by the feral pigs.
_	The total of the considered claims receivable amounted to £241,965, 10s. and 5d., but the commissioners were of the opinion that following a more thorough enquiry into the claims they were unable to make, the amount to be paid by the government would likely not go beyond £100,000.
_	Mishra is of the opinion that while the MCLI works are high-quality and the translations are good, there are portions where cultural elements are missing.
_	Indeed, Frederic himself was of the opinion that Clements would have been ranked among the world's top ecologists had she spent less time assisting his career.
_	In February 2011, Rankin expressed the opinion that "in America the Jewish zealots are so powerful.
_	The commission was of the opinion that counties needed to have a population of between 200,000 and one million in order to provide effective services.
_	He formed the opinion that the Prussian forces did not exceed 18–20,000 men, and gave orders for the 2nd Brigade (Pirch II's) to attack.
_	The Ľubochňa congress was of the opinion that the name of the all-Czechoslovak party to be formed had to be decided at a national founding party congress of the new party.
_	Blackburn CLP was the first local party to expel a Militant activist, in 1983, and the constituency MP Jack Straw was of the opinion that dealing with the group was necessary if the party was to win the next general election.
_	One is inclined to the opinion that no case occurred in which the Pentateuchal provisions became effective.
_	Suchit Wongthet () expressed the opinion that Boromrachathirat's arrival in Ayutthaya with troops was apparently to "seize power by means of military force (called "coup" in our days)" and Ramesuan returned to Lop Buri just to accumulate more power and wait for an opportunity to strike back.
_	In 2004, during an HIV outbreak in the industry, she stated that she had only performed with men who wore condoms, although gave the opinion that "working without condoms in the industry is less dangerous than going home with someone who you just met randomly in a bar."
_	In 1921 Charles Reilly, Professor of Architecture at the University of Liverpool, was of the opinion that at the time it was "one of the best buildings in the town".
_	He offers the opinion that nearly every song could have been a hit and points specifically to "(If We Just) Stick Together" as one that should have been a huge one.
_	Koch was of the opinion that Vollmer (and others) were beholden to him for their careers and should therefore be obedient to him.
_	Some of his work was shown to, and appreciated by, contemporary artists such as van Gogh and ; the latter expressed the opinion that if Hugo had decided to become a painter instead of a writer, he would have outshone the artists of their century.
_	Historian Richard Kohn is of the opinion that the purpose of these communications was not to foment a coup or military action against Congress or the states, but to use the specter of a recalcitrant army's refusal to disband as a political weapon against the antinationalists.
_	The Act still confirmed the absolute powers of censorship enjoyed by the Lord Chamberlain but still slightly restricted his powers so that he could only prohibit the performance of plays where he was of the opinion that "it is fitting for the preservation of good manners, decorum or of the public peace so to do".
_	Not only his granddaughter, the writer Daphne du Maurier, was of the opinion that his depictions brought to life again old Passy and the Rue de la Pompe: "Kicky … was a happy little boy – or so he believed, when fifty years later he wrote about his childhood in Peter Ibbetson – and the scents and sounds of pre-imperial Paris, the rumble of wheels on cubbled stones, the crack of a whip, the white dust at the corner of the Rue de la Pompe, the chestnut trees in flower – even the small burnt bread, black coffee, and tobacco on the warm spring air – rise from the pages of his novel …"
_	In contrast, David Thompson was of the opinion that the "unfamiliar cast acquit themselves well in a simple naturalistic style."
_	Developments at that time in the Black Metal scene (brotherhoods, federations) caused Andras and Dagon to withdraw from the scene and stage since they shared the opinion that the true evolvement of this genre can solely be found in loneliness of the individual.
_	Several participants of the congress expressed the opinion that the greatest service that the scholarly world could render to the Persian-speaking people would be the publication of a critical and reliable edition of the Shahnameh.
_	He was of the opinion that Israelites from Assyria had gone into the North Caucasus and from there, with the permission of the Assyrian king into the Crimean peninsula.
_	Sergius Bulgakov, however, was of the opinion that the filioque did not represent an insurmountable obstacle to reunion of the Eastern Orthodox and Roman Catholic churches.
_	The court is of the opinion that “manufacture” denotes “a non-living mechanistic product or process” and does not imply a conscious, sentient living creature.
_	In 1995 Hunt "et al." published the opinion that the family is synonymous with the Barapasauridae.
_	Thio Li-ann has expressed the opinion that in Singapore free speech is not a primary right, but is qualified by public order considerations couched in terms of "racial and religious harmony".
_	Louis Ginzberg (in his "Geonica") is of the opinion that the Babylonian recension (see below) is the work of Yehudai Gaon and that Simeon Kayyara expanded it into what is now known as the Spanish recension.
_	During the quasar controversies of the 1970s, these same astronomers were also of the opinion that quasars exhibited high redshifts not due to their incredible distance but rather due to unexplained "intrinsic redshift" mechanisms that would cause the periodicities and cast doubt on the Big Bang.
_	Magician John Mulholland wrote that Harry Houdini had expressed the opinion that no one could be considered an accomplished magician until he had mastered the cups and balls.
_	The Ukrainian historian Yaroslav Hrytsak shares the opinion that Franko’s political or ideological point of view on the Jewish topic in his journalistic work can be assigned to the “progressive - liberal - anti-Semitism”.
_	Some time later, on the recommendation of some local Madeiran musicians who were of the opinion that he had excellent vocal quality, he went to Italy with the intention of studying classical music with two of the masters of the "bel canto", Giovanni Laura and Ercole Pizzi.
_	He expressed the opinion that it will be "accepted" in Europe.
_	The art historian Manfred F. Fischer is, however, of the opinion that the lion next to the "Bavaria" statue is not only conceived as Bavaria’s heraldic animal, but along with the drawn sword is meant to be a symbol of defensive potential.
_	He expressed the opinion that adding more bandwidth was more effective than any of the various schemes for accomplishing QoS they examined.
_	Stanley (1973) is of the opinion that Indian participation was limited to those recruited by Lorimier, who went as far as Gananoque to recruit.
_	He concludes with the opinion that "Any realistic resolution to the Iranian nuclear program will require an approach that encompasses Military, Economic, Political interests and differences of the West vs Iran.
_	Voltaire's story (in his "Letters on the English Nation") that the Duchess used to go to Wycherley's chambers in the Temple disguised as a country wench, in a straw hat, with pattens on and a basket in her hand, may be apocryphal, for disguise was superfluous in her case, but it shows how general was the opinion that, under such patronage as this, Wycherley's fortune as poet and dramatist was now made.
_	Marrat was of the opinion that the building was not particularly old, being built of brick and roofed with flat tiles, and that the Saxon window arches were the exception and perhaps indicated an earlier use for the building.
_	They invited Lucy Stone to help, but Stone declined to be part of the project; she was of the opinion that Stanton and Anthony would not fairly portray the divisive split between NWSA and American Woman Suffrage Association (AWSA).
_	He is of the opinion that Stephen Prothero expresses "a colossal indifference to the courage and circumstances of those fighting for the same democratic freedoms and human rights that he himself enjoys."
_	Strawhorn was of the opinion that the stone was part of a stone circle and also thought that some of the other stones were used in the construction of the Puddleford steps.
_	He expressed the opinion that the project was a "major hit" in the United Kingdom.
_	Some historians, including Antony Beevor and Benoît Lemay, are of the opinion that Manstein had some Jewish ancestry.
_	In 2005, in light of accusations of steroid use against the three players who had, by then, hit more than 61 home runs in a season (Mark McGwire, Sammy Sosa and Barry Bonds), the North Dakota Senate wrote to Major League Baseball to express the opinion that Roger Maris' 61 home runs should be recognized as the single season record.
_	But the CMS Committee was now of the opinion that, although many Indians might have previously received ‘Lutheran orders’, the time for a change had arrived.
_	He gave the opinion that it was an undignified way to make a living and that "celebrity worship is the lowest common denominator in popular culture".
_	"Why the chancellor is missing the point", on the flaws in the tax system and the importance of the rule of law in taxation, in which he expressed the opinion that "tax avoidance is not a moral issue" and described tax itself as "legalised extortion".
_	Both were of the opinion that religious faith was used to perpetuate inequalities on the basis of birth and ideas of purity and pollution.
_	Wilhelm Ludwig Abeken looked for it at Montefiascone, at the southern extremity of the lake; while Karl Otfried Müller believe it was at Orvieto, and adduced the name of that place in Latin, "Urbs Vetus", the old city, as an argument in favour of his view; but British explorer and writer George Dennis was of the opinion that there was no reason to believe that it was so far from the Roman city, and that it lay on the summit of the hill, above the amphitheater at Bolsena, at a spot called "Il Piazzano".
_	The biographer of the Princess, Noel Botham, was also of the opinion that Bindon had an affair with her.
_	One newspaper obituary gave the opinion that Hart had been unfairly criticised in several of his decisions (and had been subsequently vindicated) and should have been given credit for the Overland Telegraph Line rather than Sir Henry Ayers.
_	However, the Federal Government of Nigeria through the office of The Minister of Information and Culture Lai Mohammed debunked the opinion that the TSA policy was not intended to loot the Nigeria treasury.
_	Historians, such as Philip Shaff, have the opinion that: "Irenaeus described a form of Basilideanism which was not the original, but a later corruption of the system.
_	Dr. K. P. Sinha, who has done considerable research on Bishnupriya Manipuri, disagrees with the theory and is of the opinion that the language was originated through Magadhi Prakrita.
_	In the literature is often held the opinion that the Palm Beach is the convertible version of the Monteverdi Berlinetta.
_	A. and A. Macdonald were of the opinion that this man was the son of Alexander MacAlister of Loup.
_	As she herself argued decades later: "I was the only one to express the opinion that [...] we are dealing with an innovative movement, just like I was the first one in history to sketch out Symbolism in articles for "Viața Românească"".
_	Rationalist skeptics of the trials came to the opinion that the use of torture had resulted in erroneous testimony.
_	Ehrhard inclines to the opinion that he wrote other scriptural commentaries.
_	Figueirdo and Treuherz are of the opinion that it was built in the early 17th century for Hugh Bennet.
_	They expressed the opinion that the lyrics used were unsuitable for a teenage audience that might not understand the song's context, adding that the song was too ambiguous for some listeners to understand.
_	He has always maintained the opinion that "in many ways it is more important to be heard than to get paid for it," and the CFZ, his music and films have always been disseminated along broadly anarchist and libertarian lines.
_	During a subsequent German investigation, an officer identified as "Sniper No. 2" stated: "I am of the opinion that I am not a sharpshooter."
_	To him, the profit was his, and his alone, and privately he had also ventilated the opinion that the tax policy of the Norwegian Labour party made it necessary to remove funds from Norway.
_	The Bakersfield Californian was among the newspapers of the time to criminalize the Japanese-American population, stating, "We have had enough experiences with Japs in times of peace to emphasize the opinion that they are not to be trusted."
_	Some historians are of the opinion that the AbuGhoshes came from East Europe.
_	Neal Robinson, a scholar of Islamic studies, is of the opinion that there is no evidence that the style of Quran has changed in a consistent way and therefore style may not always be a reliable indicator of when and where a chapter was revealed.
_	Benjamin also highlighted the styling and aesthetic of the track's music video, citing its "tongue-in-cheek presentation" as proof of the opinion that "HyunA is easily one of the baddest females in K-pop."
_	The financial benefits to the church and its charitable activities are obvious; while some parishioners hold the opinion that the church should steward its funds more carefully and not need to involve itself in hosting such a large public event, the parish has generally embraced the opportunity to work cooperatively and to expose the broader Seattle community to their form of Christianity.
_	Some authorities are of the opinion that the subfamily Prionodontinae, which consists of two extant species of Asiatic linsangs in the genus "Prionodon", should be regarded as a family in its own right.
_	The name is derived from the opinion that this is the area in which a batsman struggles most to determine whether to play forward or back, or to leave the delivery.
_	The German Government, for their part, are also of the opinion that the agreement at which they have now arrived with His Majesty's Government in the United Kingdom, and which they regard as a permanent and definite agreement with effect from to-day between the two Governments, will facilitate the conclusion of a general agreement on this question between all the naval Powers of the world.
_	A spokesman for Human Rights Watch was of the opinion that: "The Sri Lankan government has apparently given its security forces a green light to use dirty war tactics."
_	The Truth Commission is of the opinion that entire tribes in Maranhão were completely eradicated and in Mato Grosso, an attack on thirty Cinturão Largo left only two survivors.
_	Manchester United manager Sir Alex Ferguson was of the opinion that "every player and manager in the world" thinks that "technology can play a part" to help referees, but recognised that it was FIFA who had to be convinced.
_	From the bishop's reply to Lord Westbury's answer to his letter, it is apparent that Lord Westbury had expressed the opinion that the 113th canon of 1603 simply meant that the "clergyman must not "ex mero motu" and voluntarily and without legal obligation reveal what is communicated to him in confession".
_	Joe was of the opinion that living on the street would result in the dog's death.
_	When the grant of a lord mayor was made to Liverpool and Manchester in 1893, Sir Albert William Woods, Garter Principal King of Arms, was of the opinion that ...the chief magistrates of those cities on which the dignity was conferred should be able to use the prefix of "right honourable" in the same way as London had done from time immemorial.
_	It appeared from the judgment of the court "a quo" that it had been of the opinion that the principles of "stare decisis" as a general rule did not apply to the application of section 39(2) of the Constitution.
_	Robert Spitzer, a lead architect of the DSM-III, has held the opinion that the addition of cultural formulations was an attempt to placate cultural critics, and that they lack any scientific motivation or support.
_	In an essay in the website The Conversation, the writer was of the opinion that Garner "fails to address the broader issues of gender inequality and male violence".
_	On the other hand, influential philosophers such as René Descartes (1596–1650) and Immanuel Kant (1724–1804) were of the opinion that there cannot be any ethical duties whatsoever toward animals—though Kant also observes that "He who is cruel to animals becomes hard also in his dealings with men.
_	He evidently holds the opinion that a cup of [coffee] given in his office, and a packet of biscuits as a gift for her small son, will ensure him appearing as a hero in said book!
_	Many residents, including the governor, Joseph Blake, were of the opinion that the party should settle on the Pon Pon River, at New London.
_	He was of the opinion that the military had a secret fleet of flying wing airplanes.
_	President Fintan Patrick Walsh was of the opinion that the manner of the strike threatened the existing arbitration system necessitating their defeat.
_	Major General Brown had the opinion that a frontier fort of this nature should be built for permanency and independence, since the distance from any other military posts would make assistance difficult to obtain if any battles would break out.
_	In the context of the socio-economic and political realities of the country as well as development initiatives by the civil society organizations in Pakistan, we are of the opinion that unless rights agenda led by people’s movements around rights and the issues contributing to the collectivism and interestedness in development initiatives based on the basic values of liberties and liberations of individuals and of collectives in the social, economic and cultural realms is not made a core strategy of development in the country, it will become almost impossible to achieve the destiny of the socially, economic and culturally liberated and empowered man, women, children, youth, religious and ethnic minorities and vulnerable classes.
_	A periodical can be prohibited if it is considered to be frequently or usually indecent or obscene, or if the Board is of the opinion that an unduly large proportion of space in the periodical is given to matters related to crime.
_	Milton Friedman held the opinion that the Smoot–Hawley tariff of 1930 did not cause the Great Depression, instead he blamed the lack of sufficient action on the part of the Federal Reserve.
_	The unqualified auditor's opinion is the opinion that the financial statements are presented fairly.
_	In an adverse auditor's report the auditor must explain the nature and size of the misstatement and must state the opinion that the financial statements do not present fairly in accordance with US GAAP.
_	Magistrates from the Civil and Labour Chambers of the High Tribunal of the Court were of the opinion that the Attorney General should not be subject to the same norms as those of the high courts in the absence of any statutory law that would address the matter.
_	He compared it rather unfavourably to the village of Saint-Denis near Paris, and was of the opinion that the royal abbey there was ten times as important as the Khan's palace.
_	NTU expressed the opinion that spending reforms should be dealt with, instead of just increasing the debt limit.
_	The 1905, "New International Encyclopedia" expressed the opinion that with "Hitherto" (1869) "the period of her best work ends."
_	The use of the composite "hataf segol" in cases where the name is to be read, ""elohim"", has led to the opinion that the composite "hataf patah" ought to have been used to indicate the reading, ""adonai"".
_	Woodward is of the opinion that "a plain tressure is a diminutive of the orle, and is depicted half its thickness".
_	He is bold enough to express the opinion that the Book of Samuel was not written by the prophet himself, but later ("Commentary on I Sam." ix.9).
_	While Nehru perceived the Hindu Mahasabha to be the greatest threat to the nascent republic, Rajagopalachari held the opinion that the Communists posed the greatest danger.
_	H.J.A. Sire, a historian who has written a history of the Order, is of the opinion that the siege represented an overextension of Ottoman forces, and argues that if the island had fallen, it would have quickly been retaken by a massive Spanish counterattack.
_	Rousseau advocated the use of supermajority voting on important decisions when he said, "The more the deliberations are important and serious, the more the opinion that carries should approach unanimity."
_	(a) be of the opinion that the person meets all of the eligibility criteria
_	ECWR has pursued the passage of anti-harassment laws, but HarassMap was of the opinion that existing laws were not implemented properly.
_	She expressed the opinion that most people would find the work "kind of dull".
_	Gianfranco Soldera is a strong advocate of the opinion that any wine declared with Montalcino on its label should be a 100% Sangiovese.
_	The Committee has never upheld the opinion that all the Associations should adhere to the same forms and methods; on the contrary, it fully recognizes the necessity of an individual growth based on the local conditions and the influences of varying circumstances.
_	Nicholas Cabasilas was of the opinion that the functional epiclesis in the Roman Rite is instead the prayer "Supplices te rogamus", which, like the explicit epicleses in the Byzantine Rite, is placed after the anamnesis and oblation:
_	Erik Hage held the opinion that by this time Morrison had become famous enough to be insulated from constructive criticism, resulting in some of the love songs to Janet Planet on the album containing: "obvious lyrical platitudes (truly some of his worst poetry since the revenge songs for Bang Records) and less-than-inspired arrangements."
_	Some western scholars and observers have expressed the opinion that Siamese slaves were treated better than English servants.
_	Arab traveler ibn Fadlan also reported of this belief, writing around 921 he recorded that "Some hold the opinion that Gog and Magog are the Khazars".
_	The "Vossische Zeitung" newspaper warned its readers that "the government is of the opinion that the situation is such that a danger to the state and nation existed and still exists".
_	The English archaeologist George E. Bean was of the opinion that the name was "allochthonous", meaning that it had originated somewhere else.
_	The great majority of military historians, including Peter Fleming, Derek Robinson and Stephen Bungay, have expressed the opinion that it had little chance of success and would have most likely resulted in a disaster for the Germans.
_	Nat Segaloff observes that cinematic trends presented in "Sorcerer" were later abandoned by the studio system, an opinion mirrored by Phil Mucci, who holds the opinion that "Sorcerer" stands for a cinematic style that is unlikely to be seen again".
_	The Court of Appeal upheld the conviction, but it also gave the opinion that "To introduce Bayes' Theorem, or any similar method, into a criminal trial plunges the jury into inappropriate and unnecessary realms of theory and complexity, deflecting them from their proper task."
_	"Frieze" is of the opinion that it is "less a history of persecution than it is an invocational litany or an aggrieved magical treatise on the failures of patriarchal liberalism and industrial socialism to adequately recognize and protect the lives of gay people."
_	While team owner Daniel Snyder expresses the opinion that the court decision is a victory for the team, the Executive Director of the NCAI asserts that the name remains a slur, and the decision that grants it First Amendment protection does not alter any of the arguments against its continued use.
_	The historian J. Bottéro was of the opinion that the gods were not viewed mystically, but were instead seen as high-up masters who had to be obeyed and feared, as opposed to loved and adored.
_	The Irish military historian Daniel Florencio O'Leary was of the opinion that with the truce "Buenos Aires has implicitly withdrawn from the struggle", and that "the Buenos Aires Government's pacts with the Spanish, were to the detriment of the American cause".
_	Gibson later expressed the opinion that the film did not go far enough in correcting the historical record.
_	Gene Healy, author and vice president at the libertarian Cato Institute, expressed the opinion that the signs generally focused on opposition to government bailouts, Obama's proposal on health care reform, and the appointment of presidential "czars".
_	This downbeat view of the elephant due to its connections with the trails more grievous moments is likely what has given the 20th-century historians the opinion that the elephant was mostly a bad experience.
_	Crowley stated that in June 1909, when the manuscript of "The Book of the Law" was rediscovered at Boleskine, he developed the opinion that Thelema represented objective truth.
_	Hughes expresses the opinion that this church is Sharpe's "pièce de resistance", it contains "a mongrel mix of Gothic styles".
_	That factor, together with what the Court perceived as the oppressiveness to the defendant of the contract, led the Court to conclude that "we are clearly of the opinion that it [the contract] is of such a character that the plaintiff has no right to call upon a court of equity to give it the relief it has sought to obtain in this suit."
_	Sam Seabourne ventures the opinion that Internet privacy will be a major social issue in the next two decades.
_	"From the circumstances and symptoms detailed by him, and comparing them with the medical testimony of all the witnesses, we are conclusively of the opinion that Captain Hall died from natural causes, viz., apoplexy; and that the treatment of the case by Dr. Bessel was the best practicable under the circumstances."
_	Some observers are of the opinion that this new law imposes the toughest toy-making standard in the world.
_	Some expressed the opinion that pornographic films would continue to extend their access to US theaters, and the mainstream film industry would gravitate toward the influence of porn.
_	A few stated the opinion that, while a BFTS-enhanced guitar was clearly superior when recording alongside electronic keyboards, it generally rendered their tone "sterile" or "thin."
_	In 2008, Garnaut was of the opinion that nuclear was not obviously necessary in Australia's low carbon energy future.
_	He is of the opinion that the majority of South African vineyards should be planted to more Mediterranean and Rhône style varietals, as opposed to the Bordeaux ones that have typically been favoured.
_	The "Motion Picture News" wrote during production that "I am off the opinion that it will be one of the usual war dramas.
_	After the race Easterby was somewhat critical of Hide, offering the opinion that the horse would be better suited to more exaggerated waiting tactics.
_	As he was of the opinion that no British director was capable of making a good musical, he insisted on having an American at the helm, and the task fell to Wesley Ruggles, who produced as well.
_	("Furthermore we are of the opinion that factory farming has to be ended."), referring to Cato the Elder's famous conclusion of his speeches with Carthago delenda est.
_	Within the DPJ there is the opinion that such cases do not fit with the idea of ‘‘Kodomo teate’’.
_	Some scholars are of the opinion that probably the custom of dedicating girls to temples became quite common in the 6th century CE, as most of the Puranas containing reference to it have been written during this period.
_	As he began to study both the historical roots of the separation and the modern divisions of Middle Eastern churches he came to the opinion that the schism was unjustifiable.
_	In his "Poverty of Historicism", he identified historicism with the opinion that there are "inexorable laws of historical destiny", which opinion he warned against.
_	Although modern Croatian linguists sometimes squabble about the range and actual value of his opus (some are of the opinion that Croatian owes more to the period of Baroque Slavism in early 17th century (with central authors like Bartol Kašić, Jakov Mikalja and Ivan Gundulić), or to the Ragusan writers of the late 15th century/early 16th century- crucial writers being Džore Držić and Šiško Menčetić) — no one denies Relković's popular appeal that was, at least, the final touch that helped neo-štokavian dialect to prevail as the basis of the Croatian language.
_	Vincent 's biographer Marc Edo Tralbaut, however, was of the opinion that the younger woman was, consciously or unconsciously, a representation of Kee Vos Stricker.
_	Some of the crew of "Sheffield" were of the opinion that the missile exploded, others held the view that it had not.
_	Some members of the CC were of the opinion that the division into counties should be maintained, because Romania didn't have the territory of the USSR to be divided into "regions".
_	Plutarch reports that back in Rome, Cato pronounced the opinion that they ought to deliver up Caesar to the Barbarians, thus purging away the violation of the truce in behalf of the city, and turning the curse therefor on the guilty man.
_	"I am of the opinion that you can do me no effectual service but by coming directly to this place."
_	We are all of the opinion that it does."
_	If the court should be of the opinion that the law is with the defendant, then judgment to be entered in favor of the defendant non obstante veredicto.
_	MTR HK made the opinion that the rail system was compromised due to the DOTC's poor maintenance.
_	Because the parties had kept their finances rigidly separate, Baroness Hale was of the opinion that, taking their entire course of conduct into account, the appeal by Mr Stack should be dismissed and the Court of Appeal's order of a 65/35 split in favour of Ms Dowden should stand.
_	Bottomly expresses the opinion that it would be the second-best thing to a conviction.
_	This is the consequence of the amendment of the Copyright Act of Japan in 2006 which strengthened the punishment based on the opinion that gravity of the criminal punishment against infringement of intellectual property right should be equivalent to that of robbery provided in the Penal Code of Japan.
_	Where the older "École de l'exégese" held that law was synonymous to legislation and that the practice of law was the mere application of statutes, the "École scientifique" was of the opinion that law was a complex entity with many sources, including socio-economic factors.
_	Kifer was an admirer of Henry David Thoreau, and was of the opinion that Thoreau "based his philosophy on ageless truths from the past and looked into the future".
_	Before this event he had been a great advocate of Hindu-Muslim unity and was of the opinion that the "two nations are like two eyes of the beautiful bride, India".
_	"The Times" the next day printed the opinion that "Lord George-Brown drunk is a better man than the Prime Minister sober."
_	At a meeting in 1913, SECR chairman H. Cosmo Bonsor expressed the opinion that the time was not right for the company to incur the heavy expenditure that electrification would incur.
_	Because of this inscription, and other reasons, several historians and archaeologists have expressed the opinion that the tomb cannot be that of Simon the Just.
_	Marinus was of the opinion that the World Ocean was separated into an eastern and a western part by the continents of Europe, Asia and Africa.
_	However, Canadian folklorist Marius Barbeau was of the opinion that the song's origin was France.
_	More recent commentators are of the opinion that the names "Perizi" and "Perazi" are identical, and that the Bible has included under the name "Perizzites" all stocks dwelling in unwalled towns.
_	Christian Züchner, relying on stylistic comparisons with similar paintings at other well-dated sites, expressed the opinion that the red paintings are from the Gravettian period (c. 28,000–23,000 BP) and the black paintings are from the Early Magdalenian period (early part of c. 18,00010,000 BP).
_	Many critics held the opinion that while starting anew was frustrating, the combat was rewarding.
_	Peter Wilby writing for "The Guardian" was of the opinion that an article by Letts about Harriet Harman was misogynistic.
_	Her husband, Sir James Mackintosh, was one of the few people that Sharp felt able to discuss metaphysics with and he expressed the opinion that Richard Sharp had made a greater influence on his thinking than almost any other person.
_	Todd McCarthy, who called the film "undeniably impressive", was of the opinion that it was influenced by "Mean Streets", "Goodfellas" and "The Killing".
_	Recent research, however, sometimes expresses the opinion that the local Roman administration, supported by Germanic foederati, remained capable of action until the middle of the 5th century, possibly even until the end of the Western Roman Empire in 476/480.
_	Little Russians had not the opinion that they are "sacrificing" the interests of their local homeland to the Great Russians or that they have to abandon their identity in favour of the Great Russian.
_	Many of the local population have now the opinion that there is nothing more beautiful than the support of his club in their own town or region, so no matter where and no matter in which league the club plays.
_	The commission was of the opinion that counties needed to have a population of between 200,000 and 1 million to provide effective services.
_	Pohl was of the opinion that at least a few horses were brought from Greenland by the Norse on their further voyages of exploration.
_	He was of the opinion that using the army divisions for CI would be playing into Pakistani hands.
_	The writer was of the opinion that Sheriff Behan wanted the requisition from Governor Fremont with the "object was to have them assassinated...
_	Whenever the Board of Parole considers the release of a committed offender who is eligible for release on parole, it shall order his release unless it is of the opinion that his release should be deferred because:
_	On August 22, the "Newark Sunday Call" wrote, "National League papers are unanimous in the opinion that 'Jack' Rothfuss is one of the 'comers' of the big league.
_	General J. S. Dhillon expressed the opinion that "experience in Ladakh had shown that a few rounds fired at the Chinese would cause them to run away."
_	I am not of the opinion that the world – that is, the material bodies or celestial globes that God has created (among which is the one on which we live) – has to have an end, or return to chaos or nothingness from which it came forth."'
_	Writer Dieter Zenglein is of the opinion that the naming of "Bruckhen" and "Brugel" (another name used for the place in the "Weistum") is likely to have nothing to do with the village of Brücken, but rather with named rural areas (common in Germany even now).
_	In negotiating the ways of the new society of the 20th century, however, Kolani gives the opinion that modern women now act in nearly all ways like men, and he doesn't approve of any of it.
_	So he started his new lessons in Professor Picard's class who introduced different philosophical doctrines, "letting his students free to choose the opinion that was the closest to their personal ideas".
_	I venture to express the opinion that [Chamberlain] will find among the projects and plans which he will be called upon to discuss none containing a more Socialistic principle than that which is embodied in his own scheme, which, whether it can properly be described as a scheme of protection or not, is certainly a scheme under which the State is to undertake to regulate the course of commerce and of industry, and tell us where we are to buy, where we are to sell, what commodities we are to manufacture at home, and what we may continue, if we think right, to import from other countries.
_	BCal was furthermore of the opinion that this would allow it to increase its scheduled capacity to about 20% of all UK scheduled airline capacity while permitting BA to continue in its role as the dominant UK scheduled carrier, which would still have accounted for 70% of total scheduled capacity.
_	When he initially proposed this, Scriabin was of the opinion that at least eight hands would be necessary, and the composer was reportedly somewhat disconcerted when he realized that his piece could be reduced in this way.
_	A member stated: "Given the significant and real progress you have made over the years, your case management team is of the opinion that the probability that you commit a crime after your release is low."
_	Some are of the opinion that this temple was built around the same time Sri Someshwara temple was built due to its connection with Sage Mandavya.
_	As the magistrates' courts only have the power to impose a six-month custodial sentence or a £5,000 fine, the court has the power to commit defendants to the Crown Court for sentencing — this can be done when they are of the opinion that either the offence, or the combination of the offence and one or more offences associated with it, was so serious that greater punishment should be inflicted than the magistrates' court has power to impose, or, in the case of a violent or sexual offence, that a custodial sentence longer than the court has power to impose is necessary to protect the public from serious harm.
_	Some paleontologists were of the opinion that the original specimens were not diagnostic beyond themselves and, therefore, that the name "C. bauri" could not be applied to any additional specimens.
_	Some authors are of the opinion that swaddling is becoming popular again, although medical and psychological opinion on the effects of swaddling is divided.
_	He describes others in his situation as expressing the opinion that being limbless beggars in England would be preferable to their current circumstances.
_	Later research has established the opinion that Henot was the victim of a conspiracy by the authorities of the city.
_	Wood was not impressed by his replacement for the series, Brian Armstrong, and was of the opinion that he had hired several unsuitable actors.
_	He, like many of his contemporaries, was of the opinion that women were by nature sexually uninterested.
_	Matthew Cassel of "The Electronic Intifada" in the context of the "Bush shoeing" incident has expressed the opinion that the Western media overplayed the phenomenon as being "Arab" in particular.
_	Lead guitarist Jonny Greenwood has expressed the opinion that the album has been somewhat underrated since release.
_	Padma is of the opinion that there is no "issue of Tibet" that the Dalai Lama says, and questions the Lama's ability to judge the situation in Tibet since he has not been in Tibet since 1959.
_	F.B. Pinion is of the opinion that "Agnes Grey" "is almost certainly a fictionalized adaptation of "Passages in the Life of an Individual"".
_	Earlier, Vassiljev, at the same radio station, had expressed the opinion that dogs, children and the elderly should not be allowed into the Riigikogu building as "the most sacred place in the country".
_	Unlike earlier laws, this did not accept the existence of magic, and took the opinion that there never had been any witches, and it therefore came down heavier on the cunning folk, who were claiming to perform genuine magical spells.
_	The sociologist Wolf Lepenies has discussed the "ignorabimus" with the opinion that du Bois-Reymond was not really pessimistic about science:
_	G. K. Chesterton, one of Dickens's critics in the early 20th century, expressed the opinion that Mr Boffin's pretended fall into miserliness was originally intended by Dickens to be authentic, but that Dickens ran out of time and so took refuge in the awkward pretence that Boffin had been acting.
_	Singh was of the opinion that cooperative farms would not succeed in India.
_	Enthusiasts such as Philip Robinson (author of "Ulster-Scots: a Grammar of the Traditional Written and Spoken Language"), the Ulster-Scots Language Society and supporters of an Ulster-Scots Academy are of the opinion that Ulster Scots is a language in its own right.
_	Their Lordships are accordingly of the opinion that the features of unfairness and abuse of monopoly power which underlay the decision in the "British Leyland" case cannot be said to be plainly and obviously present in this case.
_	Quine ends with the opinion that "because of the confusion of propositions with sentences, and of attributes with their expressions, Russell's purported solution of the semantic paradoxes was enigmatic anyway."
_	Since Giovanni Giolitti, Prime Minister of Italy, had refused to “interfere with either party”, "squadristi" leaders organized punitive and vigilante “reprisals” under the opinion that they had “to replace an absent or a timid public authority,” but went far beyond the normal type of official action taken to legally discipline criminal acts.
_	He had the opinion that females should also be given education, and therefore founded a girl school in 1632.
_	Most economists hold the opinion that the tariff act did not greatly worsen the great depression:
_	McMillan was of the opinion that Labour's leadership was too conservative and cautious, especially on financial issues.
_	Sawyer was of the opinion that one could distinguish between the true Israelites, from whom the Anglo-Saxons were descended, and "false" Jews.
_	However, a contemporary biographer of William Wentworth, Susan Ostberg, is of the opinion that Wentworth arrived in Boston in July 1637 when a group of men arrived from Lincolnshire, including Anne Hutchinson's "brother" (actually her brother-in-law, Samuel Hutchinson).
_	However, most Muslim scholars are of the opinion that Islamic al-Shura should consist of:
_	He continued to show the same zeal and severity as before, and with so much success that Lord Clarendon, writing in his praise, expressed the opinion that "if Bancroft had lived, he would quickly have extinguished all that fire in England which had been kindled at Geneva."
_	At that time, given his diarrhoea and nausea, Sparrow had "persuaded him to lay up, telling him that he was killing himself with work", and, as Sparrow remarked to the coroner, whilst "persons labouring under the symptoms such as I have described the deceased to have suffered, are sometimes the victims of an uncontrollable suicidal impulse", he had formed the opinion that "the deceased's mental faculties were very much impaired", that "his mind was giving way, and that he was in a very different condition from what he had been in all his life before", and "was fearful of permanent insanity, rather than of any act of [suicide]".
_	Fur clothing has become the focus of boycotts on the opinion that it is cruel and unnecessary.
_	The "Mr. Loverman" video was parodied on the satirical ITV1 puppet show "Spitting Image", and by Marlon Wayans of "In Living Color" (an American comedy television series) in a video called "Mr. Uglyman", which played upon the opinion that Shabba is somewhat unprepossessing.
_	Kowal, despite suggesting a name for Jupiter XIII, was of the opinion that Jupiter's irregular satellites should not be named at all.
_	The first of these studies, laid down by the Fortification Committee of 1819 ()—which was largely influenced by the committee's secretary Johan Peter Lefrén—led to nothing more than the opinion that the large rivers up north—especially the Ångerman River—would benefit the defence and that no major fortifications were to be built.
_	A third reviewer, in a favorable appraisal, expressed the opinion that lyrical concerns aside, "Apparitional"-era Blitzkid was not sonically dissimilar to such (non-horror punk) notable punk rock peers as Bouncing Souls, NOFX, and AFI
_	This statement cannot be relied upon, as Simeon Kayyara in fact lived in the century following Yehudai Gaon; and Halevy is of the opinion that the names were inadvertently switched, though this reading creates as many problems as it solves.
_	The Committee was of the opinion that such an offer would be a timely counter-move by the Federation Government to offset the propaganda value of the Communists' negotiation proposal and to convince neutral opinion that the Government was not seeking to prolong the shooting but was prepared to make a positive proposal to end it.
_	Hence the direction of the column, as seen in the distance, was well calculated to alarm the troops of the French extreme left; as also to excite surprise in the mind of Napoleon, who having formed no expectation of the arrival of any French troops in the field by any other direction than that from Gosselies upon Saint-Amand, or perhaps from Quatre Bras upon Brye, also participated in the opinion that the column in question, under its attendant circumstances and general disposition, could be no other than that of an enemy.
_	Jay Warner is of the opinion that the obscure "So You Will Know" is a finer record even than these.
_	In 1689, the governor and council proposed that a sugar mill should be put up on Milan's former plantation, and ventured the opinion that if sugar cane should prove successful on the Company's plantations, it would prove more profitable than cotton or tobacco.
_	"NME" writer Larry Bartleet was of the opinion that the singer was "thrillingly honest sucker-punch" on the song's lyrics aimed at Jay-Z.
_	"I am of the opinion that you can do me no effectual service but by coming directly to this place."
_	Lucy and Edward express the opinion that Gerda, having been discovered holding a gun near John after the shooting, is his murderer, while Henrietta insists that Gerda deserves a chance to defend herself.
_	I remain of the opinion that the safest legal course would be to secure the adoption of a further resolution to authorise the use of force...
_	Some scholars are of the opinion that the word originated from the style of tying the hair knot on the head.
_	The second position is relatively new and is of the opinion that people must accept that the dingo has changed and that it is impossible to bring the "pure" dingo back.
_	Qafiḥ sharply opposed these "minhagim" being of the opinion that, in addition to the stupidity of the matter, they are Biblically forbidden because of "darkhei haEmori".
_	Some experts are of the opinion that the Adamclisi monument is a more accurate portrayal of the situation, the "segmentata" used rarely, maybe only for set-piece battles and parades.
_	The commander of 13th Motorised Infantry Division, General Paul Otto, was of the opinion that the Polish forces had become so demoralized that they were incapable of combat, and that a single German battalion would be enough to disarm the Poles and take them to a Prisoner of War camp.
_	The Court was of the opinion that the master and officers of the ship did all that was possible to save the vessel and they were not to blame for her loss.
_	In an interview in the "Le Parisien" he voiced the opinion that no man should refuse to allow his wife to be examined by a male doctor.
_	Daultana was of the opinion that the unity of India could not be preserved and that Muslims of the Punjab should unite with their co-religionists across India in the demand for Pakistan.
_	One historian is of the opinion that the MacAdam Shield Shovel must be recognized for what he feels it represents: a serious attempt to improve the well-being of Canadian troops.
_	Nasution was of the opinion that Suharto should deliver an accountability speech before going on to run for president.
_	Editorial comment from Spain's "El País" was of the opinion that Kirchnerism is "using methods similar to those of dictatorships to keep its power" by revisiting the "Papel Prensa" case.
_	House expressed the opinion that, if such a Conference met, it would secure peace on terms not unfavourable to the Allies; and, if it failed to secure peace, the United States would leave the Conference as a belligerent on the side of the Allies, if Germany was unreasonable.
_	Brown expressed the opinion that the principle behind "The System" (essentially confirmation bias or survivorship bias) is what is behind belief in spiritualism or homoeopathic and alternative medicine.
_	On September 2, Secretary Dulles said during a press conference in Washington, that all the countries bordering Syria were of the opinion that Syria would become a communist state if nothing had been done within the next 60 days.
_	and if in addition the physician is of the opinion that the person,
_	He gave the opinion that the implementation of the design was not possible, primarily because of the large number of tubes necessary.
_	Three colleagues were of the opinion that a third-rate submission by a known writer would be accepted by editors over a first-rate work by an unknown.
_	He was chosen to direct "Mathilda", the sequel to "Léon", but expressed the opinion that the film was unlikely to be made.
_	This resulted in some Kirk/Spock slash fans to dislike Uhura, including Henry Jenkins who expressed the opinion that in the 2009 film, Uhura's character is largely there to be the "love object" in "some kind of still to be explored romantic triangle" between Kirk and Spock, and to explicitly "discourage" slashers.
_	Margaret A. Weitekamp and Christine Scodari expressed the opinion that the portrayal of Uhura's character in the reboot is a step forward in terms of the representation of women of color.
_	Based on this summary of the case law, the judgment rejects the notion set out in the earlier judgment concerning Fujitsu's Application that the UK Courts should be guided by the case law of the EPO since the judges were of the opinion that EPO case law was too unsettled.
_	The justices were of the opinion that the words on the sign were insulting and caused distress to persons who were present and that the defendant was aware of that fact.
_	Should the cleric feign, rather than honestly intend, the second marriage, in order to accomplish the carnal union, some are of the opinion that he does not incur the irregularity, the marital intent required by the Innocentian law not being verified; others more commonly affirm that irregularity is contracted.
_	Act of 1966, which excludes all manufacturers who label their packages with proper warnings from requirement or prohibition, led the majority of the court to the opinion that:
_	In the preface of this drama which is a well-known literature in Iran – Professor Said Nafici – is expressing the opinion that this drama is the best example ever written in the history of Iranian literature.
_	This would also help alleviate the financial problems of depopulation due to limited job opportunities, high unemployment and aging and make introduction of new information technology more affordable With the tax burden at around half of GDP, a survey July 2008 found that 81% of Danes are of the opinion that the public sector can deliver more service for the same money, harnessing the advantages of the recent reform.
_	Geeta's aunts see Bindiya with Ashok and come to the opinion that she's his wife.
_	The last complaint would be reinforced by the opinion that Spain has ranked poorly amongst the developed countries in the quality and results of its education.
_	Conflict between different religious groups is rare, in part because there are so few non-Muslims; however, some Muslim leaders occasionally express the opinion that minority religious groups undermined national unity and complain that laws and regulations give preference to religious minorities.
_	Contrary to the opinion that there was no serious scholarship about the Holocaust before the early 1960s, the CDJC had been active going back to the 1940s and 50s, although their efforts were little noted even by historians and were almost totally unknown to the public.
_	Gorsuch concurred with the opinion that "The only statutory element separating innocent (even constitutionally protected) gun possession from criminal conduct in §§ 922(g) and 924(a) is a prior felony conviction.
_	Additionally, Moses appears at the Hall of the Super Best Friends in the episode "200", where he offers the opinion that it would be acceptable for the Islamic prophet Muhammad to appear in Southpark in a U-Haul, if the U-Haul has no windows.
_	The answer to the second question, which concerned Quebec's right under international law to secede, gave the opinion that the international law on secession was not applicable to the situation of Quebec.
_	Eddington was of the opinion that this was the wrong way around because there were not enough early morning departures and late-evening arrivals that could have attracted a greater number of locally based business and leisure passengers requiring same-day-return facilities.
_	Taylor is of the opinion that the battle's outcome simply provided a convenient excuse and that the sackings took place to "demonstrate that the army command was doing something to counteract the poor public opinion of the conduct of the campaign".
_	They considered a powerful bowling attack to be vital to the team's success, more so than a strong batting line-up, and expressed the opinion that Hirst should concentrate on one discipline rather than dividing his energy.
_	With regard to the problems between Flemings and Walloons, De Man is of the opinion that "Good governance = Flemish governance".
_	Some are of the opinion that Agastaya or Agattiyar was the head of the Talaiccankam, however, this is unlikely as the first mention of him is from Ptolemy and no Sangam work refers to him.
_	In addition, in books, websites, and articles, he has expressed the opinion that anti-Semitism is racism and is against the Quran.
_	Some authors have the opinion that the information here found refers to the whole region instead referring only to the town.
_	"The Sydney Morning Herald" concluded with the opinion that his message was confusing and amounted to "eating roos and crocs is bad for tourism, and therefore more cruel than eating other animals".
_	In fact, he had informed himself sufficiently to hazard the opinion that broad gauge was the future.
_	The excavations disproved the opinion that the Peryn Chapel was erected right on the site of the pagan shrine according to the Old Russian tradition of erecting churches on the places of pagan shrines.
_	However, it is Coquin, who once again, has conducted the most thorough investigation of the issue, and he is of the opinion that the Coptic version is a translation of an earlier Greek original.
_	Pfirsich was of the opinion that a commander should not merely lead his troops but protect them, and arranged with local Allied commanders that there would be no fighting in that area (although newcomers did not always accept this "modus vivendi").
_	He is among a set of individuals not allowed to travel to the United States because the Department of the Treasury is of the opinion that they are "undermining democratic processes" in Zimbabwe.
_	Earlier there were several tram routes in Zhytomyr, but all excepting one were canceled during a period of domination of the opinion that a tram is a bad kind of transport.
_	Remini expresses the opinion that Jackson was typically in control of his temper, and that he used his anger, along with his fearsome reputation, as a tool to get what he wanted.
_	Kottwitz is of the opinion that what counts on the field of battle is victory, and that there is nothing with which to reproach the Prince.
_	Ferry is also of the opinion that, unless "Melbourne" was both in "Voyager"s radar blind spot and obscured by exhaust from the destroyer, it was unlikely that the bridge crew would think they were not to starboard of the carrier.
_	After such a comparison, Dawson "et al." (2006) were of the opinion that the Laotian rock rat belongs to a previously described family which had only been known from fossils, the Diatomyidae.
_	For the reasons set forth below, I am of the opinion that federal courts do have the power to award damages for violation of 'constitutionally protected interests' and I agree with the Court that a traditional judicial remedy such as damages is appropriate to the vindication of the personal interests protected by the Fourth Amendment.
_	White accepted the position that the Eighth Amendment to the United States Constitution required that all punishments be "proportional" to the crime; thus, in "Coker v. Georgia" (1977), he wrote the opinion that invalidated the death penalty for rape of a 16-year-old married girl.
_	Many people are of the opinion that appraisers come in two types: aggressive and conservative.
_	, among other LGBT theorists, has voiced the opinion that the intersex theory is an attempt to impose "cisgender male" characteristics onto
_	The U.N. Working Group is of the opinion that “there is, since, after the initial conviction, the person exhibits, for reasons of conscience, a constant resolve not to obey the subsequent summons, so that there is ‘one and the same action entailing the same consequences and, therefore, the offence is the same and not a new one’”
_	At the same time, three judges of the ECHR - Dmitry Dedov, Helen Keller and Georgios Sergidez - expressed the opinion that it was necessary to consider a possible political background of the case.
_	Hankey formed the opinion that nobody important amongst the British generals thought a major German attack likely.
_	Many of Crouwel's peers were of the opinion that the design was too experimental and that it went too far.
_	Kamaraj, President of the Madras Provincial Congress Committee was of the opinion that the UDF should be allowed to form the Government as he had predicted the weak coalition might eventually fall apart.
_	Many authorities are of the opinion that women are included in the minyan for Kiddush Hashem and Hillul Hashem.
_	Journalist Jack Newfield was of the opinion that the address was a suitable epitaph for the senator, who was assassinated two months later.
_	Judge Dickerson stated that he was of the opinion that the Long Island Sound was not on the high seas.
_	Józef Czechowicz, the leading light of the Lublin avant-garde, went so far (in a private letter) as to express the opinion that Łobodowski deliberately fostered around himself an atmosphere of sensation and scandal in which to move his wings, and that not only in the political sphere but in the literary and social domains as well.
_	A. R. Rajaraja Varma, who heavily contributed to the development of Malayalam grammar, is of the opinion that Malayalam originated from ancient Tamil.
_	The radio industry trade publication "Gavin Report" offered the opinion that "blue-eyed soul has gone too far".
_	"Guardian" columnist Owen Jones is also of the opinion that the BBC is biased towards the right owing to numerous key posts being filled by Conservatives.
_	However, he has the opinion that "...my personality is very well suited to doing four-panel comic strips, and I really enjoy creating this one."
_	Mattenklott worried about the impact on the relations between the army and the civilians and wrote to the Army Group South in September, expressing the opinion that the German troops should not give promises to the population for ameliorating the situation if they were unable to keep them.
_	The Committee was of the opinion that a total view of rural development must be taken in which PRIs must play a central role in handling people's problems.
_	In a state department briefing during the recall, however, Newbegin expressed the opinion that there was no credible opposition in Haiti to Duvalier, and thus that the recall would have little positive effect.
_	In 1999 Feral House published the biography "Sex and Rockets: The Occult World of Jack Parsons" by John Carter, who expressed the opinion that Parsons had accomplished more in under five years of research than Robert H. Goddard had in his lifetime, and said that his role in the development of rocket technology had been neglected by historians of science; Carter thought that Parsons' abilities and accomplishments as an occultist had been overestimated and exaggerated among Western esotericists, emphasizing his disowning by Crowley for practicing magic beyond his grade.
_	At his last staff meeting, on February 22, Doolittle expressed the opinion that once such matters as courts-martial had been wound up, the "skeleton" of the Twelfth--"the name only"--would have either to be returned to the States for a reincarnation or be decently interred by War Department order.
_	Schrijver and others were of the opinion that the relatively unimpressive performance of Dutch naval ships was due to the backwardness of the admiralty shipyards that built most of the Dutch naval ships in both design methods and construction methods.
_	Various jurists, including Chief Justice Arthur Chaskalson, expressed the opinion that the Constitution should not be treated as an ordinary act of Parliament, because it was enacted by the Constitutional Assembly rather than by Parliament and because it was supreme over all other law.
_	Moreover, Rousseau advocated the opinion that, insofar as they lead people to virtue, all religions are equally worthy, and that people should therefore conform to the religion in which they have been brought up.
_	He also said, "We are of the opinion that, if a historical occurrence conforms to the truth, this truth will be revealed all the more clearly if there is more research into it and more discussion about it".
_	In the Talmudic debate over Sinai and Oker Harim, Yosef was of the opinion that Sinai is preferable.
_	Lyautey was briefly of the opinion that the event would cause the loss of the whole of Morocco.
_	Rank was of the opinion that birth is connected with an overwhelming experience of fear of the fetus.
_	The same meeting expressed the opinion that the CUP "should exclusively undertake occasionally the publication of a first-class book of general interest and even one of some magnitude".
_	In the article, he expressed the opinion that since President Obama was "sired by a Kenyan father, born to a mother attracted to men of the Third World and reared by grandparents in Hawaii," he "has no natural instinct or blood impulse for what [America] is about."
_	Churchill was now of the opinion that the project should be abandoned, but de Gaulle insisted and a telegram from Spears to the Prime Minister stated, “I wish to insist to you personally and formally that the plan for the constitution of French Africa through Dakar should be upheld and carried out.
_	At the time he was of the opinion that "if his ideas are useful, they will spread through personalized channels of communication.”
_	Apart from the lapse of time which affects memory the court was also of the opinion that even if the evidence on this point was false it may not be a basis for culpability unless it is shown that such evidence was deliberately made with knowledge of its falsehood.
_	Regarding the Devadasi concept, some scholars are of the opinion that the custom of dedicating girls to temples probably became quite common in the 6th century CE, as most of the Puranas containing reference to it were written during this period.
_	Rabbeinu Chananel was of the opinion that the Beth din shel Kohanim also oversaw the appointing and rotation of the 24 priestly divisions.
_	Some electricity finance experts are of the opinion that it will weaken the public sector discoms and can damage power sector industry in the country.
_	The collection was commented on by the art historian George Vertue and also by Horace Walpole who offered the opinion that the portraits were "rubbish, but celebrated".
_	Thus, due to this facet of domain names, the court expressed the opinion that it would be difficult to protect them effectively under national laws.
_	Others like Eric Obermiller are of the opinion that Asanga wrote these five treatises himself.
_	The French were of the opinion that d'Avalos would be forced to attempt a relief of the besieged city, at which point he could be forced into a battle; but as such pitched battles were viewed as very risky undertakings, Enghien sent Blaise de Lasseran-Massencôme, seigneur de Montluc, to Paris to ask Francis for permission to fight one.
_	Bhatt is of the opinion that either the author of was Govinda Bhattathiri and the author of Nauka some other writer who is not yet known, or Govinda Bhattathiri did not write .
_	Rumor had it that the station at one time was KOMO-FM, but actually the original KOMO-FM never went on the air - the Chief Engineer at KOMO was of the opinion that FM would never amount to much.
_	He was of the opinion that a person should be converted to Christian faith only from conviction.
_	The tanna Rabbi Eliezer ben Hurcanus holds the opinion that the prohibition of orlah does not apply outside the land of Israel at all.
_	In general, many viewers hold the opinion that My Kitchen Rules is viewed less for the cooking and skill side of the show than for the gossip and conflict which certain contestants are encouraged to cause.
_	Each of JONAH’s experts proffers the opinion that homosexuality either is a disorder or is not a normal variation of human sexuality.
_	In his "Treue Bote" (Prague, 1831) he declared himself against the transfer of the Sabbath to Sunday, but expressed the opinion that, considering the requirements of our time, synods might mitigate the severity of the Sabbatical laws, especially in regard to traveling and writing.
_	Commentators on the Qur'an, like Ibn Kathir are of the opinion that this verse could also be referring to the poor-due mentioned in Sura 6:141 which states ""pay the due thereof on the day of their harvest."", as well as that it could be that what is meant here by Zakaat is purification of the soul from Shirk and filth, as in Sura 91:9-10 which says ""Indeed he succeeds who purifies himself (Zakkaha).
_	The commentators are hence of the opinion that probably both meanings are intended, purification of the soul as well as purification of one's wealth, because that is also part of the purification of the soul, and the true believer is one who pays attention to both matters.
_	Nevertheless, the Committee were "of the opinion that further evidence was necessary, to form a correct decision" and postponed the matter "until the first Wednesday of the next session."
_	Drowned in Sound's Billy Hamilton offered the opinion that while "there’s very little here that couldn’t slot seamlessly into any of the group’s output", "The Hungry Saw" was "something that can be unequivocally relied upon to produce the goods."
_	This court is of the opinion that a sin committed past the gates of hell is no sin at all.
_	In contrast to Matheson's opinion about the name "Ljótr", the 20th-century historian A. Morrison was of the opinion that the name may not be as rare as some people have thought.
_	"The A.V. Club" writer Todd VanDerWerff, who holds the opinion that by the start of the 2000s "The Simpsons" had declined in quality compared to its earlier years, praised "Moe Baby Blues" for being as good as the better episodes of the series.
_	The fourth season of the show saw a further decline in viewing figures, but still remained in the top 20 (#17 in the Nielsen chart); some believing Shelley Hack was to blame, others are of the opinion that the change in format from team oriented episodes to episodes that focused on only one angel caused the rating decline.
_	Bracton was of the opinion that a gift of land to the Church could be voided by the heirs, but not the lord.
_	Modern literary historians, however, increasingly embrace the opinion that "The Golden Rump" may have been secretly commissioned by Walpole himself in a successful bid to get his Bill for theatrical licensing passed before the legislature.
_	When proposing the policy, Tun Dr. Mahathir was in the opinion that Malaysia's progress is declining in the age of globalisation, and he had hoped that this policy gives a competitive edge to the nation, following the footsteps of Singapore and India which are moving forward because of their utilisation of the English language.
_	Just as the President has the power to nominate two Anglo Indians to the Lok Sabha, similarly, the Governor has the power to nominate one member from the Anglo Indian community as he/she deems fit, if he/she is of the opinion that they are not adequately represented in the Assembly.
_	David Dudley Field, as Thayer's attorney gave the opinion that if no successor has been elected, the incumbent should hold over.
_	In the late 1920s, in Italy, Mussolini was of the opinion that the Pilchard merchants were charging more than they should.
_	Beatrice is of the opinion that she would only get second grade service over there due to her color.
_	Experts did not agree: the "Financial Times" cited "security experts familiar with facial recognition software" that the person who stood trial was not Gu, whereas a facial recognition expert contacted by "Slate" was of the opinion that the woman most likely was Gu.
_	John Jamieson was of the opinion that "cockernonnie" signified a snood, or gathering of the hair in a band or fillet.
_	Cutter ex-manager Merill Boyce expressed the opinion that the company should be responsible and pay damages.
_	At the time of the incident, CNN was of the opinion that the president would face a tough battle to get the support of the nation's young people in his re-election bid.
_	In a related article in "The Guardian", author Jason Webster is also of the opinion that the Sufi Way, as it is known, is a natural antidote to fanaticism.
_	In contrast to Vonck, who was of the opinion that the Belgian people themselves had to fight against the Austrian despot, Van der Noot had more confidence in obtaining foreign support.
_	By 1986, the mayor of Fouke, Virgil Roberts, and former Miller County Sheriff Leslie Greer, were of the opinion that the alleged Fouke Monster tracks were man-made.
_	StRaten-generaal was of the opinion that its proposal hasn’t been examined objectively, and felt at least the suspicion of bias hanging over this report.
_	But some scholars, most notably A. L. Basham and Thomas Hopkins, are of the opinion that Heliodorus was not the earliest Greek to convert to Bhagavata Krishnaism.
_	Many ring-wise veterans share the opinion that Breese might have battled his way to the top of the welterweight class had not the war interrupted his career.
_	Madhuri is of the opinion that Rahul should be sent to a special school, which Raj strongly detests.
_	Some players, such as Norman Corbett, have expressed the opinion that the War ruined their careers.
_	Anne Duggan of King’s College, London, is of the opinion that "Laudabiliter" is a falsification of a genuine letter, now lost.
_	A December 13, 1917 Boston Globe article states, "Speaking of referees one of the veteran Philadelphia magnate says that he was of the opinion that the referees of today do not compare to those seven or eight years ago, when such well known officials as Philip Bishop, Edward Waldern, James Danby and David Gould held the indicators."
_	He expressed the opinion that it was less cruel to feed and work dogs correctly before shooting them, than it would be to starve and overwork them to the point of collapse.
_	He was of the opinion that "the conference must comply 'with all applicable laws regarding affirmative action and equal opportunity in all its activities and programs and does not discriminate against anyone protected by law because of age, creed, color, national origin, race, religion, sex, handicap, veteran, or other status'.
_	Mesmer held the opinion that hypnosis was a sort of mystical force that flows from the hypnotist to the person being hypnotized, but his theory was dismissed by critics who asserted that there is no magical element to hypnotism.
_	In the light of the virulence of the plague that had subsided only seven years previously, Wycliffe's studies led him to the opinion that the close of the 14th century would mark the end of the world.
_	Page and Clapton were both of the opinion that the tracks they recorded were merely rehearsals rather than complete songs, but representatives of Immediate Records soon approached Page informing him that they legally owned the publishing rights to all recordings he made as per the terms of their contract.
_	Benjamin also highlighted the styling and aesthetic of the track's music video, citing its "tongue-in-cheek presentation" as proof of the opinion that "HyunA is easily one of the baddest females in K-pop."
_	Mason and Deane JJ, in dissent, rejected the notion that functions, such as those granted under s 20 of the "Telecommunications (Interceptions) Act 1979 (Cth)" to provide for the ability of judges to issue telephone taps, could be exercised constitutionally by 'judges' as defined by s 18 of the Act. Mason and Deane JJ were of the opinion that conferring non-judicial functions could not be granted to a Chapter III court without undermining the doctrine in "Boilermaker's Case" and the separation of powers prescribed by the Constitution as 'a safeguard of individual liberty'.
_	The Yugoslavs were of the opinion that the joint-stock companies favored in the Soviet Union were not effective in Yugoslavia.
_	They were both of the opinion that the monarchy could only survive with the removal of the Kaiser and his son the Crown Prince and the setting up of a Regentship under the nominal rule of the young son of Crown Princess Cecilie.
_	Traditional rabbinic Judaism, however, has always been of the opinion that belief in immortality of at least most souls, and punishment and reward after death, was a consistent belief back through the giving of the Torah at Mt. Sinai.
_	Beary research scholars are of the opinion that Beary ornaments were largely influenced by Jain ornament patterns.
_	Simon Rockman, writing in a ZDNet blog, was of the opinion that teens will have "better things to do", despite what happened in the 1980s.
_	Chowdhury is of the opinion that Muslims should not learn patriotism from other citizens of the country or from the government.
_	Stock research analyst John Taylor expressed the opinion that Nintendo "checked off an awful lot of boxes with [the Switch]".
_	He emphasised that Ukraine's position proceeds from the opinion that the decision on recognising Kosovo or not requires timing for most of the world's countries.
_	The "Dictionary of National Biography" records that "a distinguished lecturer on materia medica" has expressed the opinion that the most valuable of Fothergill's writings are "An Essay on the Action of Digitalis," written in his early life, and "The Antagonism of Therapeutic Agents, and what it teaches", published in 1878.
_	But Carmack (1968) is of the opinion that they were probably bilingual Nahuatl and Chontal Maya speakers who were influenced by Toltec culture and arrived as conquerors rather than merchants.
_	Mulligan puts in a brief appearance in "Wandering Rocks", where he meets Haines at a bakery and vocalises the opinion that Stephen Dedalus is insane.
_	Timeform awarded Pearlyman a rating of 174 for the season, and were of the opinion that he was, "one of the best winners of the Queen Mother Champion Chase in the thirty year history of the race".
_	The actor was of the opinion that the storyline was about Aahil and Sanam but the former character did not fit in the third season.
_	The Central Bureau of Investigation, the main Indian investigating agency, is of the opinion that the acts of violence were organized with the support from the then Delhi police officials and the central government headed by Indira Gandhi's son, Rajiv Gandhi.
_	I am quite clear in the opinion that children born in the United States of alien parents, who have never been naturalized, are native-born citizens of the United States, and, of course, do not require the formality of naturalization to entitle them to the rights and privileges of such citizenship.
_	Erlang does not make use of the underlying OS's threads and processes for managing its own process pool and thus does not suffer from these limitations".and in the underlined part above (formatting added), expresses the opinion that the founding technologies make the difference in scalability.
_	Andrei Gromyko, the Minister of Foreign Affairs passed along a letter to Kissenger which stated that "we resolutely decline such an interpretation", in regards to the opinion that this piece of legislation would lead to more "Soviet citizens" being allowed to leave compared to previous years.
_	They retreated after forming the opinion that ice conditions might be more stable for a springtime expedition, after the consolidation of the winter snows.
_	Rao is of the opinion that "Kabbigara Kava" was written for multiple reasons.
_	He was of the opinion that "The UK is the creative capital of the World" and it was "about time that the UK creative sector was recognised for its achievements".
_	"The Virginian-Pilot" gave the album a positive review, also expressing the opinion that "Morphine" sounded "eerily like 'State of Shock'", and continued, "'Scream Louder' a remix of his hit duet with sister Janet, is better than the original only because it takes away the overpowering guitar twangs."
_	However, he now finds fault with Sitchin's hypothesis after deeper analysis, stating that: "I am now firmly of the opinion that these gods personified the falling sky; in other words, the descent of the gods was a poetic rendition of the cataclysm myth which stood at the heart of ancient Near Eastern religions."
_	The first record of Svinninge and Gislinge dates from the 14th century, but some hold the opinion that the area has been settled since the Viking Age.
_	In Canada, author David Vaver criticized the decision of the above court, expressing the opinion that "whether scenes taken by an automatic surveillance camera are authored by anyone is doubtful: the person responsible for positioning the camera is no Atom Egoyan.
_	"Khomeini is supposed to have written a letter to the Chairman of the assembly of Leadership Experts on 29.4.89 in which he emphasised that he had always been of the opinion that the marja'iyat was not a requirement for the office of leader.
_	In his book "I'm Not the Only One" (2004), Galloway expresses the opinion that Kuwait is "clearly a part of the greater Iraqi whole, stolen from the motherland by perfidious Albion", although Christopher Hitchens pointed out that the state existed long before Iraq had a name.
_	This was met with mixed reactions as his trainer Murray Baker was of the opinion that the best was yet to come from the champion colt and others were surprised that his stud fee was so modest given his achievements.
_	"The Guardian"s Paul Rees expressed the opinion that asking forwards to take kicks at goal "is demanding something not only unnatural but untried and it turned a rousing semi-final into a pantomime, an unnecessarily demeaning way of settling the issue."
_	The Community were of the opinion that 8 Brothers were required for the good running of the College so Gustave Rey drew up plans for a house with 9 bedrooms en suite.
_	In 2014, following the Russian annexation of Crimea and amidst pro-Russian unrest in Ukraine, Johnson expressed the opinion that the United States should not get involved in Ukraine due to a lack of risk to American national security.
_	However opinion within the council was still firmly of the opinion that a new hall was needed.
_	The critic Theodor W. Adorno, in his book "In Search of Wagner" (written in the 1930s), expresses the opinion that the entire concept of the leitmotif is flawed.
_	Atilano gave the opinion that in her song "Diamante" could be heard echoes of a very young Sarah Geronimo.
_	Although earlier editors of this work of semi-hagiography expressed the opinion that "its value is not great either from the literary or from the historical point of view," it is now recognized as quite valuable, not only for the light it directly sheds on its subject, but also as representing an important phase in the development of medieval history writing.
_	Lewis offered the opinion that it was all bad, an artistic failure because "I lost the magic".
_	John Roberts voiced in his dissent the opinion that mandatory life sentences "could not plausibly be described" as unusual when a majority of states endorse them.
_	Despite a veto urged by Attorney General Buddy Caldwell and 116 law school professors who warned that the bill undermined some of the state's claims against BP for the 2010 spill—and the opinion that the bill did not even kill the lawsuit—
_	The Duchess of Argyll was of the opinion that 'the daughter of a private gentleman, however accomplished, was not qualified to be allied to her' even though she herself had been a mere Miss Gunning and Irish at that.
_	Holopainen thought that he was very uncertain about the lyrics of "Erämaan viimeinen", because he is of the opinion that writing in Finnish is rather hard, and has said that "Finnish [could] quickly sound really cheesy."
_	Kierkegaard was of the opinion that faith is something different from other things: unexplainable and inexplicable.
_	Peter Hoskin has expressed the opinion that "muscular liberalism" will be the new "ism" which Britain will follow to tackle growing religious terrorism and extremism, subsequently adapted by all European countries including Commonwealth Nations.
_	At a public meeting in Henley town hall on 26 March 1839, Captain Edmund Gardiner proposed "that from the lively interest which had been manifested at the various boat races which have taken place on the Henley reach during the last few years, and the great influx of visitors on such occasions, this meeting is of the opinion that the establishing of an annual regatta, under judicious and respectable management, would not only be productive of the most beneficial results to the town of Henley, but from its peculiar attractions would also be a source of amusement and gratification to the neighbourhood, and the public in general."
_	Government waste is the opinion that the government does not spend money in an acceptable manner.
_	Mick Brown, writing in "Literary Review" is of the opinion that "Irwin brilliantly conjures the mood of the late Sixties, with its blind innocence, fanciful enthusiasms and blissful music."
_	Wine writers Stephen Brook and Stephan Reinhardt are of the opinion that the best wines from this estate are usually produced from the Graacher Domprobst parcels.
_	Regarding digital audio equipment, Blyth is of the opinion that "companies that take great care over their analog stages, use the best internal digital format and write the best DSP code end up with the best sounding product."
_	The court was of the opinion that what was done by that court was within its jurisdiction.
_	Bracton was of the opinion that a gift of land to the Church could be voided by the heirs, but not the lord.
_	He was one of thirty-eight men of the 145 of the 17th Lancers that came out of the charge led by Cardigan, and was always of the opinion that no one sounded the charge at all.
_	In the fifth edition of "On the Origin of Species" published in 1869, Charles Darwin added a "Historical Sketch" giving due credit to naturalists who had preceded him in publishing the opinion that species undergo modification, and that the existing forms of life have descended by true generation from pre-existing forms.
_	They represented the opinion that dingoes have changed and that it is not possible to bring the “pure” dingo back.
_	The new government was also of the opinion that a competent FAMP force would remove the need for any outside British intervention in the region.
_	Somerville expressed the opinion that at the time mathematical science was at a low ebb in Britain, because reverence for Newton had prevented local scientists from adopting the calculus, while outside of Britain astronomical and mechanical science had reached a high degree of perfection.
_	Hinkle, a columnist for the "Richmond Times-Dispatch", has expressed the opinion that "lining up speakers by race and gender might not seem fair on an individual level", and suggests that proponents of the progressive stack care more about class struggle than individual concerns.
_	To counter this argument, the tobacco industry was increasingly forced to fall back on calculations made by a network of employed academics, who were paid to write op-ed articles for their local newspapers expressing the opinion that smokers already 'paid their way'.
_	Their management were of the opinion that the band should try something new and change their sound, so the band and their manager Gary Kurfirst agreed that David Byrne of Talking Heads would be a good choice for the album's producer, due to his previous musical experience and history of touring together with the B-52's.
_	This, among other indications, has led to the opinion that the Tatars were identical with the Shiwei.
_	The text then goes on to quote Vyasa, Garga and Sandilya in terms of their opinions on what is "bhakti", giving the opinion that all three are correct but declaring in conclusion that "bhakti consists of offering one's every act to the Supreme Lord and feeling extreme distress in forgetting Him".
_	Hedenius was of the opinion that Christianity violates these rules and is therefore irrational.
_	Mr. Wardell, R.M., was of the opinion that it was because they were jealous of the Waikato tribes.
_	The article includes several "ad hominen" arguments against specific art bloggers, and ventures the opinion that art blogs "have no readers".
_	"Blender" described Jackson as the "late 20th century's preeminent pop icon", while "The New York Times" gave the opinion that he was a "musical phenomenon" and that "in the world of pop music, there is Michael Jackson and there is everybody else".
_	In Geoffrey Bolton's "History of the O.U.C.C.", the author offers the opinion that the Cambridge side relied on the bowling of Woods, and although the rain initially softened the ground too much for his fast bowling, "when it had dried, he was irresistible."
_	Farrell-Roberts was of the opinion that in his works, Hutton dismissed Margaret Murray's theories about the Witch-Cult using Norman Cohn's theories, which she believed to be heavily flawed.
_	Thornley, writing in "The Irish Times", was of the opinion that France was the better team on the night, with Joubert being reluctant to award penalties against New Zealand in the last quarter of the match.
_	However the 20th century Lutheran scholar Robert Preus was of the opinion that König went overboard with the scholastic method by overloading his small book, "Theologia Positiva Acroamatica" with Aristotelian distinctions.
_	Some are of the opinion that one Khipar, a popular personality, was residing in this area and gave his name to the village.
_	He was of the opinion that full blooded i.e. white, Dutch officials were better suited to persuade native nobility to comply with the ‘Cultivation System’.
_	His thinking, influenced by his aristocratic background, was a radical shift from the opinion that Indos were the ideal intermediaries towards the indigenous rulers.
_	In 2012, he was convicted of untrue statements to investors and sentenced to house arrest and community service; Justice Dobson was of the opinion that Jeffries believed his statements but the law required accuracy not belief.
_	Even Nissen, who was of the opinion that the priests failed to come, notes, "Even if Mozart did not receive the last rites, he would have received extreme unction."
_	Political observers who bolster the opinion that a permanent campaign has had a significant impact on recent presidencies argue that decisions by presidents have increasingly been made with considerations to their impact on voter approval.
_	They further expressed the opinion that Wolff was a unique character in the "Adventures of Tintin", suggesting that he is akin to a character from a John le Carré novel.
_	Sir Alan Cunningham and Wavell were of the opinion that South Africa could not field two divisions for lack of resources.
_	It was noted in the 6th century, but Henry Barclay Swete was of the opinion that it probably did not long survive the capture of Caesarea by the Saracens in 638, though a modern historian would attribute more destruction to its previous capture by the Sassanid Persians.
_	Scholars usually are of the opinion that this inscription does not relate to the poet: a military career would not fit well with the pronounced anti-militarism of the "Satires" and, moreover, the Dalmatian legions do not seem to have existed prior to 166 AD.
_	The College and its alumni were of the opinion that the flyover would not, in any way, decongest the traffic plying through that road.
_	A majority of the cardinals and nearly all the members of the commission were of the opinion that the Order of Knights Templar should be granted the right to defend itself, and that no proof collected up to then was sufficient to condemn the order of the heresy of which it was accused by Philip's ministry, without straining canon law.
_	Hering and Goodspeed were of the opinion that the tubing and the large steel sphere in the basement indicated the use of normal forces and possible deception, and Hering said in his signed statement that Keely had probably lied and deceived, and was satisfied that he had used highly compressed air to power his demonstrations.
_	The NKPJ is strongly against Titoism but is of the opinion that Tito's Yugoslavia was a socialist state until 1990.
_	Despite liking the work, Aldridge was of the opinion that the short stories were unpublishable, and asked Rankin to write a novel.
_	Ormandy has the opinion that Verizon's certification methodology is at fault here.
_	Mikhail Gromov once voiced the opinion that the isoperimetric inequality was known already to the Ancient Greeks.
_	The Asian Legal Resource Centre is of the opinion that the massacre at Depayin clearly amounts to a "widespread or systematic attack directed against [a] civilian population, with a knowledge of the attack" (article 7.1 of the Rome Statute of the International Criminal Court) and is therefore a crime against humanity.
_	One member of the council, Yevgeny Bobrov, reported the opinion that the "vast majority of the citizens of Sevastopol voted in favor of unification with Russia in the referendum (50–80%)" and that "in Crimea, various data show that 50–60% voted for unification with Russia, with a turnout of 30–50%".
_	Ng expressed the opinion that while the two third party characters included in "Super Smash Bros. Brawl", Solid Snake and Sonic the Hedgehog, were highly popular characters, Travis is an unlikely character due to being far less recognizable.
_	The declaration indicates that the EPO search examiner is of the opinion that Macrossan's application contains nothing of technical merit, but only commonplace technical features (i.e. a computer) for implementing a business method.
_	William Carew Hazlitt was of the opinion that this author is to be distinguished from the writer of 'Pelops.
_	However, the majority of scholars are of the opinion that ten women may not recite the additional form of "zimun be-Shem", which is obligatory when ten men are present.
_	A majority of European leaders, and the US President Obama have expressed the opinion that Greece should remain in the monetary union.
_	On March 20, 1957, the court ruled in favor of Simkins, stating in the opinion that the city of Greensboro could not escape its legal duties to provide equal privileges to all citizens to enjoy city functions.
_	Aaron was perhaps the only conservative rabbi of that period who expressed the opinion that it was better to pray in the vernacular than to mutter Hebrew prayers without understanding their meaning.
_	The AFL's match review panel were later of the opinion that "any exaggeration of the contact that was made to Rance was not excessive" and decided not to penalise him for the fall.
_	Despite noting Anselm's importance in establishing the Feast of the Immaculate Conception, Southern was of the opinion that the young Anselm "was not a very bright young man" and owed his position "entirely to the fame of his uncle".
_	James Tomison, who became a keeper in 1861, wrote of the bird migrations visible from the tower: "Hundreds of birds are flying about in all directions, crossing and re-crossing one another's flight, but never coming into collision, all seemingly of the opinion that the only way of escape out of the confusion into which they have got is through the windows of the lantern".
_	Ji voiced the opinion that Gandhi's home state should stand out as a beacon of economic progress and human development, and that its social ethos and climate must be congenial for industry and investment to flourish.
_	Hanafi is of the opinion that the spirit of 20th century could not be understood without acknowledging the work of Faiz, Rashid and Miraji.
_	BOAC chairman Gerard d'Erlanger and managing director Sir Basil Smallpeice resigned, defending the opinion that the airline was a profit-making company, not a sponsor of indigenous aircraft.
_	"Radio City"s reputation has grown since its release, with many critics and listeners of the opinion that it is not only the definitive power pop album but one of the finest rock-music albums.
_	Blackburn, doing therapy on Tom's new fingers, expresses the opinion that something Tom did made Vengerov act preemptively to punish him.
_	Leempoels had an idealistic view of the role of the artist and expressed the opinion that it is the artist’s mission to make the world better or wiser.
_	With regard to racial differences he used standard phraseology; for example, in a debate with Afrocentrist Frances Welsing and on Firing Line with William F. Buckley Jr.:My research leads me inescapably to the opinion that the major cause of the American Negro's intellectual and social deficits is hereditary and racially genetic in origin and, thus, not remediable to a major degree by practical improvements in the environment.
_	These conclusions led him to the opinion that politics were “evil”.
_	Horton's biographer, Rear Admiral William S. Chalmers, cites the opinion that a new regulation, which required the post holder to be an officer who had served aboard submarines in the Great War, was forced through for the sole purpose of ensuring that Horton was on a very short list of qualifiers for this post, almost ensuring his rapid transfer to Aberdour, so great was the desire of some within the Admiralty to have Horton revitalize the submarine arm.
_	Falck came to the opinion that the Bf 110 was just a little too big for Ostermann and had him transferred to the Messerschmitt Bf 109 equipped I./"Jagdgeschwader" 21 (JG 21) on 7 April 1940.
_	The citation in the National Heritage List for England expresses the opinion that the church is among Shellard's best works.
_	In view of the evidence of a highly prosperous city unearthed at Adam, Prof AM Shastri is of the opinion that Adam itself represents the Asikanagara of Hathigumpha inscription.
_	Policy makers, scholars and corporate figures are of the opinion that the views and ideas presented in the book can be usefully adopted for the formulation of policies by political parties and the government.
_	In a review for "Melody Maker" Phil McNeill expressed the opinion that in "Off the Wall" Jackson sounded comfortable, confident and in control.
_	He then lost control and crashed, that led to the opinion that no controlled flight was achieved.
_	However, the founder of the Moscow Helsinki Group Yuri Orlov has the opinion that Snezhnevsky was a criminal in the political abuse of psychiatry rather against his will, the real criminal was Georgy Morozov, the director of the Serbsky Institute, who has collaborated with the KGB since his students days.
_	Israr Ahmed, a Pakistani Islamic theologian, philosopher, and one of the noted Islamic scholar also holds the opinion that this surah was revealed in the 5th or 6th year of revelation and cites Fakhr al-Din al-Razi and Abdul-Qadir Gilani in reference.
_	During the Warren Court (1953–1969), the first notable court to face the cases of such kind, justices Potter Stewart, Byron White, and Arthur Goldberg shared the opinion that only hardcore pornography was not protected by the First and Fourteenth Amendments.
_	Proponents of comprehensive schools often hold the opinion that it is unfair to compare gymnasia and Realschulen with comprehensive schools.
_	De Does was of the opinion that harmony on the printed page had been the most powerful in the early Renaissance incunables, and that they present a stronger, more regular overall image.
_	While DW publicly denied this to be linked to a recent letter of complaint from the CCB, opinion pieces in Bulgarian media outlets were predominantly of the opinion that the bank had put pressure on the broadcaster.
_	In the letter, "S" stated the opinion that ""the politicians of this disgraceful island, ever ungrateful, for an illustrious Faialense family.""
_	Rancourt has expressed the opinion that the grading issue was a pretext for his dismissal.
_	However, Griffiths holds the opinion that asking the question of which set of histories will "actually occur" is a misinterpretation of the theory; histories are a tool for description of reality, not separate alternate realities.
_	Pearson expressed the opinion that the case of Dr. Christopher Nugent (died 1775) was one of hysteria, and recommended the omission of bleeding in such cases, the administration of wine, and the application of caustics in regions distant from the bite.
_	The Board was of the opinion that the children would only become good and proper members of "industrial society" if they were completely removed and not allowed to return.
_	Many were of the opinion that it would be in all their interests to have a successful franchise in New York City.
_	Members can vacate the office by resigning in the form of writing addressed to the President or can be removed from office by the President when both the Prime Minister and the Leader of the Opposition have formed the opinion that such member is "physically or mentally incapacitated and is unable to function further in office or is convicted by a court of law for any offence involving moral turpitude or if a resolution for the imposition of civic disability upon him or her has been passed in terms of Article 81 of the Constitution or is deemed to have vacated his or her office under paragraph (7) of Article 41E".
_	For many years, scientists were of the opinion that such young stars were present only in very distant star-forming regions like the Orion nebula, but with the advent of new all-sky survey techniques this has proved to be incorrect.
_	A Reader's Guide" (London, 1998), Andrew Calcutt and Richard Shephard are of the opinion that
_	It wasn't until the 1970s when there was massive public investment in agriculture that India became free of famine, although Roy is of the opinion that improvements in the market efficiency did contribute to the alleviation of weather-induced famines after 1900, an exception to which is the Bengal famine of 1943.
_	Wohlleben is represented by lawyer Nicole Schneiders, who during her studies in Jena in the years 2000 and 2001, according to her own information, was a member of the NPD "for a short time", because she was of the opinion that "a defensive democracy does not need a party ban".
_	Gray was one of the few Supreme Court appointees in the latter half of the 19th century who had not previously been a politician, and he maintained the opinion that law and politics were entirely separate fields.
_	The Ju 87's principal designer, Hermann Pohlmann, held the opinion that any dive-bomber design needed to be simple and robust.
_	Despite the general view at the time that education was not as important for girls, he was of the opinion that it was just as important for them to receive an education, if not more:
_	Its appearance caused a great stir among the Catholics of France, for the solution of the case was equivalent to the revival of one phase of Jansenism, the opinion that the pope has not the power to decide on questions on doctrinal fact, i.e. whether a certain book contains or does not contain errors against faith.
_	While accepting that a group of rebels did lead an uprising against Norman rule at Ely, Davies was of the opinion that this witch “belongs firmly to the realm of fiction.
_	Hardy considered some physicists, such as Einstein, and Dirac, to be among the "real" mathematicians, but at the time that he was writing the "Apology" he also considered general relativity and quantum mechanics to be "useless", which allowed him to hold the opinion that only "dull" mathematics was useful.
_	In general, urban planners, local politicians, residents of Jane-Finch, and others today are of the opinion that the OHC and North York erred seriously, contributing to rapid population growth in the area without anticipating its negative consequences.
_	The dissent was of the opinion that the standard for manslaughter should be "objective forseeability of the risk of death", and that the objective standard should take into account the experiences of the accused and their particular "human frailties".
_	The court works with the following principle: if the court is of the opinion that conduct which at present does not fall within the definition ought to fall thereunder because it is "analogous" to conduct falling thereunder, that both types of conduct (that which falls thereunder and that which does not fall thereunder) relate to the same right or rights protected in the Bill of Rights, and that both types of conduct deserve the same punishment, then a court is free to extend the definition of the crime by holding that the conduct which formerly did not form part of the definition should now indeed form part of the definition.
_	"Time Out", however, had the opposite reaction to Crowther, thinking that Brooks was "adept at maintaining the tension", while of the opinion that Grant looked "as though he'd rather be holding a dry martini than a scalpel."
_	Some gynecologists gave the opinion that women were less "marriageable" if they were less "feminine", as the husband would be unhappy in his marriage.
_	After the plant had started flowering later, Sweet realised his species was in fact identical to that of Andrews, but remained of the opinion that it belonged to "Pelargonium", and so created the new combination "Pelargonium luridum" in 1826.
_	On 27 May 1789, while a colonel in the Duke of York's regiment, he was involved in a duel with Frederick, Duke of York, who had expressed the opinion that "Colonel Lennox had heard words spoken to him at Daughbigny's, to which no gentleman ought to have submitted", effectively an accusation of failing to respond to an insult in the way that a gentleman should.
_	Though many were of the opinion that the color in Hill's photographs was added by hand-tinting, he received support from some in the scientific community, most notably Samuel F. B. Morse, inventor of the telegraph.
_	She later expressed the opinion that the college should become a constituent school of London University.
_	Some news media, such as the BBC, expressed the opinion that the restriction was to protect Jacob, who was considered "Indonesia's king of palaeoanthropology," from being proven wrong.
_	They were of the opinion that Hergé's depiction of the exploitation of Native Americans was an "astonishing piece of narrative".
_	He formed the opinion that the position was untenable because of German air superiority.
_	The song attracted some criticism from the British gay press, who were of the opinion that it was wrong for Morrissey to utilise polari when he was not openly gay; in an interview the previous year he had nevertheless acknowledged his attraction to both men and women.
_	Others are of the opinion that ChVK Wagner is really a unit of the Russian Ministry of Defence in disguise, which is used by the Russian government in conflicts where deniability is called for.
_	The other similarly common misapprehension or criticism of duck and cover that is frequently encountered is the opinion that prompt ionizing radiation effects would still kill those who duck and cover, regardless of any preventive measures taken.
_	Even prior to performing the song live, the group was unanimous in the opinion that "Hand in Glove" was their strongest song to date.
_	It was of the opinion that this side was one of India's strongest to play, but Rusi Modi, Vijay Merchant, Mushtaq Ali and Fazal Mahmood all missed the tour, which crippled India, because Modi and Merchant were India's most reliable batsmen on all types of pitches and surfaces.
_	Just after World War II, there was a great increase in men looking for jobs, and Munn was of the opinion that in the case of jobs in the library field, these men were “simply looking for a secure and not too difficult job.”
_	(The late British composer and pianist John McCabe, in his booklet note accompanying his boxed set of recordings of Haydn's complete solo keyboard music, was of the opinion that it was possibly inspired by the death of Maria Anna von Genzinger (1754-93, called "Marianne") [p. 23].
_	One reviewer in a TV documentary about the film expressed the opinion that Woods's demeanor during sex scenes was in keeping with her pseudonym, being reminiscent of a deer caught in car headlights.
_	"The Times" and "The New York Times" both express the opinion that the film, and the singing voices of Gaynor and Farrell, are all tolerable if not exactly worthy of praise.
_	Dagestanian historian R. Magomedov stated that:Russian professor of oriental studies, the Doctor of Historical Sciences I. Zaytsev, also shared the opinion that the Shamkhalate was a Kumyk state with the capital in the town of Kumuk (written thus in medieval sources).
_	The psychiatrist is of the opinion that Liyana is a figment of Aravind’s imagination and exists only in his mind.
_	Chief Justice Marshall said; "The court has bestowed its best attention on this question, and, after mature deliberation, the majority is of the opinion that an Indian tribe or nation within the United States is not a foreign state in the sense of the constitution, and cannot maintain an action in the courts of the United States."
_	Grosser also holds to the opinion that Israel's politics inherently invoke anti-semitism.
_	The New Haven Colony was established by the Puritan colonist Theophilus Eaton, who was of the opinion that the policies of the Massachusetts Bay Colony were too lax in enforcing Puritan standards.
_	Zaehner is of the opinion that the Zurvanite priesthood had a "strict orthodoxy which few could tolerate.
_	He has also received a great deal of press coverage for the opinion that certain changes need to be made to the Utah alcohol laws.
_	On his promise to freeze property taxes for seniors, Pantalone expressed the opinion that the loss of this revenue could be made up elsewhere, saying:
_	He also held the opinion that the female sex would eventually perform better in endurance events than the male, if all social barriers were dealt with that currently enhinder this.
_	However, Ruth Fischer and Franz Pfemfert were of the opinion that Maslow was murdered by the NKVD.
_	Hudson was of the opinion that the species could be found in the northern parts of the North island.
_	For his part, Kuroda maintained a public silence on the issue; privately, however, he expressed the opinion that morally, at least, he had won the day.
_	When the time arrived for taking a decision about the caliphate, Amr bin al-A'as convinced Abu Musa al-Ashari into entertaining the opinion that they should deprive both Ali and Muawiya of the caliphate, and give to the Muslims the right to elect the caliph.
_	Jaime Abello Banfi, the friend and associate of Gabriel García Márquez, reports that García Márquez and Kapuściński, unbeknownst to each other, shared the opinion that the way to good journalism led through poetry (on account of the fact that it inculcates both the conciseness of expression and its aptness).
_	""That while the Committee think it desirable that the Island should be acquired for the Corporation if it could be obtained at a reasonable price, they are of the opinion that in view of the sum now named, it would be useless to enter into any negotiation for its purchase.""
_	Barry had voiced the opinion that, at the start of the Civil War, while the Republican side was stronger, they should have taken over Dublin and the major cities and forced a new confrontation with the British.
_	He still retained his place on the ecclesiastical commission, but gave further offence to the king by expressing the opinion that his proceedings in the case of Magdalen College could not be legalised by any exercise of his dispensing power, and by voting against the inhibition of the recalcitrant fellows from the exercise of their clerical functions.
_	Modern scholars are of the opinion that this is a case of mistaken identity and that Dante did not mean Pope Anastasius, but his namesake and contemporary Emperor Anastasius (Emperor of Byzantium, 491–518).
_	Some controls experts have voiced the opinion that within the next 10 years networking solutions positioned between AS-Interface and Ethernet will not be used in any new installation.
_	The official Air Technical Information Command report on the crash stated that they were of the opinion that Captain Mantell lost consciousness due to oxygen starvation.
_	Tom Hoggins of "The Daily Telegraph" felt that "Flower" would "reignite the 'video games as art' debate" and was of the opinion that it was a "wonderful work of art" in addition to a game.
_	The Greek physician Dioscorides and the Roman historian Pliny are most often mentioned in this context, and in assessing this classical literature, Barton and Castle expressed the opinion that Dioscorides's description of "staphis agria" was consistent in most respects with the plant they knew as "Delphinium staphisagria".
_	"Blabbermouth"s Don Kaye gave the opinion that "a handful of songs" on "Christ Illusion" "are either too generic or the arrangements are too clumsy to work well", and specifically singled out the track: "I'm looking at you, 'Jihad' and 'Skeleton Christ'."
_	On 3 March 1966, the Minister for Housing and Local Government, being ""of the opinion that the proposals of the Commission ... are not apt for the purpose of securing effective and local government in the area"" formally rejected the commission's scheme, and substituted his own proposal.
_	Some Sufis consider under the term "Nafs" the entirety of psychological processes, encompassing whole mental, emotional and volitional life; however, the majority of Quranic-based Sufis are of the opinion that Nafs is a "lower", egotistical and passionate human nature which, along with Tab (literally, physical nature), comprises vegetative and animal aspects of human life.
_	Although several people expressed the opinion that Mike Jeffrey had set Hendrix up in an effort to control him and create dependency, Shapiro and Glebbeek dispute this theory based on Jeffrey's severe risk of significant financial shortfall had Hendrix been convicted.
_	Although Kearny was of the opinion that future more accurate models would "indicate there will be even smaller reductions in temperature", including future potential models that did not so readily accept that firestorms would occur as dependably as nuclear winter modellers assume, in "NWSS" Kearny did summarize the comparatively moderate cooling estimate of no more than a few days, from the 1986 "Nuclear Winter Reappraised" model by Starley Thompson and Stephen Schneider.
_	'The leading scholars of the Holocaust are of the opinion that the Nazis did not make soap,' he says.
_	The decision was not accepted with universal jubilation; the proposed club dinghy was to be the 'Firefly' many members were of the opinion that a dinghy would be unsafe on the lake and that catastrophe was inevitable.
_	The architectural historian Nikolaus Pevsner was of the opinion that the Norman features, including the south door and some windows, date from about 1170–90, and that the tunnel vault in the lowest stage of the tower is also from this period or "a little later".
_	Most Saudi scholars hold the opinion that it is permissible for a woman to show her eyes.
_	In "At the Sign of the Wicket", F. S. Ashley-Cooper gives the opinion that the Hambledon Club was founded in or about 1750, but there is no evidence to support this view and the club's origin is unknown.
_	Although Virginia expressed the opinion that her father was her favourite parent, and although she had only just turned thirteen when her mother died, she was profoundly influenced by her mother throughout her life.
_	Two experts have given the opinion that the mandible is "Australian" in physical type, and that the skullcap measurements are the closest to Ainu people or Tasmanians.
_	Christians are of the opinion that the Israeli–Palestinian conflict has led to the diminishment of their population.
_	Others, like Abe Ata are of the opinion that American Christians have "turned their backs" on them by supporting Israel.
_	"The Guardian"<nowiki>'s</nowiki> "Organ Grinder" reviewer was full of praise for Myles' performance in "Everything Changes", expressing the opinion that, through her portrayal of Gwen Cooper, she managed to outshine Captain Jack.
_	Outside experts initially voiced the opinion that both Facebook and Zynga would be immune to legal action under provisions of the Communications Decency Act (CDA).
_	The expedition report was presented to Martin Conway, a prominent politician and mountaineer, who expressed the opinion that the summit had been reached.
_	The original TrueCrypt developers were of the opinion that the exclusive purpose of the TPM is "to protect against attacks that require the attacker to have administrator privileges, or physical access to the computer".
_	Early in the 20th century, Theodore Gordon once was of the opinion that the Royal Coachman resembled some form of flying ant, while in the 1950s, Preston Jennings, a noted fly tier and angler thought the Royal Coachman resembled "Isonychia" mayflies.
_	The editor of Debrett's told "Time" magazine that Dillon was unquestionably next in line for the baronetcy: "I have always been of the opinion that a person has all rights and privileges of the sex that is, at a given moment, recognized."
_	If the employer is of the opinion that the union is no longer representative, it may refer matter to the Commission for Conciliation, Mediation and Arbitration, requesting that it withdraw the organisational rights.
_	During an interview with CNBC in December 2017 he expressed the opinion that insider trading is not a crime - "I think insider trading is a non-crime".
_	Watt had expected to succeed Kirk and was of the opinion that the role was his of right as Kirk's deputy.
_	In March 2009 he dissented from other Court of Appeal judges, in giving the opinion that the Gibraltar Government's housing allocation policy discriminated against same-sex couples.
_	The historian C.H. Firth, writing in the DNB in 1889, was of the opinion that the main cause of the failure at Hispaniola and the reason for the imprisonment of the two generals was the lack of cordial co-operation on the part of both.
_	In April 1729, the Deeping Fen Adventurers received a letter from Captain John Perry, expressing the opinion that the only way to improve the drainage was to improve the river outfalls, and proposing the construction of scouring sluices on the river at Spalding, on Vernatt's drain at its outfall, and on the River Glen at Surfleet.
_	Ibn Qayyim Al-Jawziyya is of the opinion that: ""Both of them - fornication and homosexuality - involve immorality that goes against the wisdom of Allah's creation and commandment.
_	Laflèche was of the opinion that "the true Catholics could not get a hearing at Rome because of Pâquet's obstructiveness, and in Quebec, Archbishop Taschereau, deceived by the same man and by the university, was helping to defeat the Catholic forces and to swell the ranks of the Freemasons and anti-religious forces."
_	Rashi and the Tosafot on Talmud Bavli Pesachim 46a are both of the opinion that one is required to travel the distance of 4 "mil" to pray with a minyan.
_	Alcuin's friendships also extended to the ladies of the court, especially the queen mother and the king's daughters, though David Bromell is of the opinion that Alcuin's relationships with these women never reached the intense level of those of the men around him.
_	Belfast-born flute-maker Samuel Colin Hamilton is of the opinion that military flute and fife bands, which were widespread in Ireland in the 19th century, played a role in familiarising Irish society with the flute as an instrument that could be used in dance music.
_	In 1907, Professor Berthold Laufer, who was a German American anthropologist, stated in his history of spectacles 'the opinion that spectacles originated in India is of the greatest probability and that spectacles must have been known in India earlier than in Europe'.
_	Coming from an African culture, Kamwangamalu is of the opinion that almost every element in a language programme is capable of conveying a cultural message of some sort":
_	In the "Buildings of England" series, Hartwell and Pevsner express the opinion that the church is the ""chef d'oeuvre"" of Paley's works.
_	In his book about the architectural practice of Sharpe, Paley and Austin, Brandwood expresses the opinion that the building is "Paley's masterwork as an independent church architect".
_	Okagbue writes that the most useful control against such abuses is the power of the court to refuse to allow the case to proceed where it is of the opinion that there is not enough evidence to support the charge.
_	Nick Assinder, a political correspondent at the BBC, expressed the opinion that he believed Darling to be "on borrowed time".
_	This left many mathematicians uneasy, such as Ronald Rivest (himself one of the holders of the patent on the RSA algorithm), who expressed the opinion that research proceeded on the basis that algorithms should be free.
_	He did not appear for his final examination deliberately in order to help a poor but meritorious student to secure a job, as in those days only the first or second ranked students could get a Government job and Hariprasanna's classmates were of the opinion that he was to stand first or second.
_	In affirming Judge Leighton's ruling, Judge Richard Dickson Cudahy wrote in the opinion that while, "It is often written that striking similarities alone can establish access, the decided cases suggest that this circumstance would be most unusual.
_	Except for the use of terms like “mimeographed” and “teletype,” little about the drama seems dated, unless one is of the opinion that corporate politics and boardroom bloodletting no longer exist...
_	He holds the opinion that well-known scientists should be convinced to join the cause and form pressure groups against pseudoscience.
_	G.W. Tryon was of the opinion that this was a more highly colored adult of "Drillia putillus" (synonym of ["[Clavus putillus]]" ) with the peripheral row of tubercles whitish.
_	In addition, former Governor-General of New Zealand Sir Michael Hardie Boys expressed the opinion that Byng had been in error in not re-appointing King as prime minister on the defeat of Meighen in the vote of confidence.
_	Phillips had long held the opinion that aircraft were no threat to surface ships, and so he took Force Z, consisting of HMS "Prince of Wales", HMS "Repulse", and four destroyers (HMS "Electra", HMS "Express", HMAS "Vampire" and HMS "Tenedos") to intercept the Japanese without air cover.
_	The elders are of the opinion that the former name of Paika was Kottachery (kotta=basket; chery=place where people gather), and it was a thriving market in the past.
_	However, this decision was overturned by the House of Lords as their Lordships were of the opinion that the Federation would only have standing if it was "a case of sufficient gravity", there was "some exceptionally grave or widespread illegality", or a breach of statutory duty due to "some grossly improper pressure or motive".
_	David Brooks and Charles Krauthammer, have expressed the opinion that the song, rather than being biting satire, was "a supreme display of elite snobbery reveling in the humiliation of the hoaxed hillbilly."
_	Ephraim and Itzig refused and were of the opinion that the bankruptcy of Gotzkowsky was inevitable.
_	Darwin was firmly of the opinion that biotic interactions, such as competition for food and space—the ‘struggle for existence’—were of considerably greater importance in promoting evolution and extinction than changes in the physical environment.
_	The LTA was given the perpetual right to organize the World Grass Championships which led to a refusal by the United States Lawn Tennis Association (USLTA) to join the ILTF as they were of the opinion that this title should be given to the Davis Cup.
_	G.W. Tryon was of the opinion that this species is a synonym of "Turbo (Turbo) japonicus" , which in turn is a synonym of "Turbo cornutus"
_	In 1983, at a lecture in Los Angeles, Bezmenov expressed the opinion that he "wouldn't be surprised" if the Soviet Union had shot down Korean Air Lines Flight 007 in order to kill Larry McDonald, an anti-communist Democratic member of the United States House of Representatives.
_	For example, at one time, the Greeks held the opinion that 1 (one) was not a number, but rather a unit of arbitrary length.
_	It did not happen anywhere else and William Simpson was of the opinion that if Cardinal Griffiths had not asked the question there would have been no trouble.
_	Being of the opinion that the Court could not apply the "Indian Act" in the case at bar without infringing the appellant's rights under the "Canadian Bill of Rights", Justice Thurlow declared the impugned provision inoperative.
_	BAM was of the opinion that, given the parameters of its business plan, they didn’t have sufficient means to pay for this additional cost.
_	Carrying 91 pounds he finished second of the twenty-four runners, beaten one and a half lengths by the 1880 Epsom Derby winner Bend Or. His performance prompted the "Daily Telegraph" to express the opinion that Foxhall was the best three-year-old seen in public that year.
_	The origins and classification of the Fulani remains controversial; one school of thought is of the opinion that the Fulani cattle are truly long-horned zebus that first arrived in Africa from Asia on the east coast; these are believed to have been introduced into West Africa by Arab invaders during the seventh century, roughly about the same time that the short-horned zebus arrived into East Africa.
_	On language issue Khalap is of the opinion that Marathi, Konkani with Davnagari script and Konkani with Roman script, all three should be official languages of Goa and that primary education should be in mother tongue with one paper of English.
_	But I eventually came to the opinion that it simply didn't work out that way he concluded.
_	The 19th-century historian Joseph Anderson was of the opinion that "Rekavík" likely refers to Rackwick on the island of Hoy, Orkney; or possibly, but less likely, to Rackwick on the island of Westray, Orkney.
_	Igbo historians such as Emeka Esogbue (of Ibusa origin) and C. N. Ugochukwu (Nnewi origin) share the opinion that groups who left Benin with Ezechima and journeyed Eastward might have settled in Igbuzo considering the geographical location of the town.
_	Cambridge historians, Marxist and nationalist historians of India and even the nationalist historians of Pakistan are of the opinion that Jinnah and Punjab Muslim League at first mobilised the strong support of the urban elite, rural landed aristocracy, Pirs and Sajjada-Nashins who subsequently won over the Muslims of Punjab for the cause of the Muslim League and Pakistan.
_	Novikov discussed the possibility of closed timelike curves (CTCs) in books he wrote in 1975 and 1983, offering the opinion that only self-consistent trips back in time would be permitted.
_	Leon Hurley, writing for "GamesRadar+", was of the opinion that, while the "gore and guts" were sparingly effective, a number of his most favorite moments had to do with investigating the "beautifully designed" Baker house.
_	They are also of the opinion that various political reforms, such as moves towards popular elections, have been unfairly nipped in the bud.
_	Nevertheless, it still has to answer people who are of the opinion that the seminars’ content should be taught by teachers rather than outsource the training.
_	She believes the text may refer to the construction of the narthex only rather than the whole church, because she is of the opinion that the narthex may have been added after the building of the rotunda.
_	Timeform expressed the opinion that Wince was unlikely to stay beyond seven furlongs.
_	He also said, "We are of the opinion that, if a historical occurrence conforms to the truth, this truth will be revealed all the more clearly if there is more research into it and more discussion about it".
_	They also say that society promotes the opinion that fat bodies can't be attractive.
_	The council thought the fund should be used for improving school facilities while he was of the opinion that the money should be provided to smart students unable to afford fees.
_	In April 1729, the Deeping Fen Adventurers received a letter from Captain John Perry, expressing the opinion that the only way to improve the drainage was to improve the river outfalls, and proposing the construction of scouring sluices on the river at Spalding, on Vernatt's drain at its outfall, and on the River Glen at Surfleet.
_	She had informally come to the opinion that Mankiewicz, a gifted screenwriter neglected for many years, had been the actual guiding force behind "Citizen Kane".
_	Kellner and Campos (2000) and Machado and Kellner (2005) both expressed the opinion that the fossils come from two different genera, and that the fossil of "Angaturama" was clearly more laterally flattened than "Irritator".
_	Upon hearing an advance copy of the full album, AbsolutePunk CEO Jason Tate was of the opinion that the album was similar in style to the band's self-titled second album, while Thomas Nassiff expressed that "throughout the album, Gilbert and Klein combine for even more crunching, downward-aiming, dominating guitar riffs than ever."
_	However, Burton Watson is of the opinion that Lu Jiuyin did not exist in reality and that his preface to Hanshan's poems is nothing more than myth.
_	Glidewell maintains the opinion that in the United Kingdom, QCs should be appointed following the recommendation of a panel chaired by a retired Law Lord or a Lord Justice of Appeal.
_	Gro Steinsland, a historian of Norse paganism, is of the opinion that in effect it was economic resources as much as local tradition that led to the development of dedicated hofs: in the richest areas, actual temples developed, while in poor areas, the spaces that people had were what they used for blót.
_	Among those concerned with Army operations, incidentally, not a few were of the opinion that the inferiority of anti-submarine radar devices was a cause for Japan's defeat.
_	Goldschmidt is of the opinion that different fundamental innovations and their economic stimuli do not exclude each other, they mostly vary in length, and their benefit is not applicable to all participants in a "market."
_	On the other hand, Drs. Boechari, epigraphical expert of the Indonesian National Research Centre for Archaeology and lecturer at the University of Indonesia, was of the opinion that the engraving dates from no later than the 12th century, has a closer affinity to the Sumatran than the Javanese writing style, and that the language may not be Old Javanese but Sanskrit, which was in common use in Sumatra at that era.
_	Wright is of the opinion that the extant building dates from the period of Henry II given that it bears several Romanesque architectural features which were phased out by the end of the 12th century.
_	Some rabbinic authorities are now of the opinion that it is imperative for Jews to ascend in order to halt the ongoing process of Islamization of the Temple Mount.
_	Coroner Brown said, "The evidence has now reached the point where I am of the opinion that a prima facie case of murder, in that each was an accessory before or after the fact, has been established against two known persons whose identity I must not publicly reveal in accordance with the prohibition under section 19 of the Coroners Act."
_	He also expressed the opinion that Uribe's offer to the FARC was not serious.
_	Amnesty International, in a report dated June 1, 2010, included the opinion that "As a form of collective punishment, Israel’s continuing blockade of Gaza is a flagrant violation of international law."
_	In the prior case, the court below was directed to permit the plaintiff Peugh to redeem the property by the payment of the loan, with interest at six percent per annum, and, as it appeared that the defendant had taken possession of the property, it was said in the opinion that he "should be charged with a reasonable sum for the use and occupation of the premises from the time he took possession in 1865, and allowed for the taxes paid and other necessary expenses incurred by him."
_	A scene shows Elizabeth dreaming of making love with Dudley, but the plot of the series follows the opinion that she resisted these urges, and remained a virgin.
_	Jon Garelick with the "Boston Phoenix" was of the opinion that the subculture of the docks (second season) was not as absorbing as that of the housing projects (first season), but he went on to praise the writers for creating a realistic world and populating it with an array of interesting characters.
_	In the light of these considerations I am now of the opinion that the maintenance of a stable general level of money-wages is, on a balance of considerations, the most advisable policy...
_	Though no one involved in the bombing of Dresden was ever charged with a war crime, some hold the opinion that the bombing was one.
_	The court was unwilling to extend the traditional defence of qualified privilege as it was of the opinion that Parliament's intention in enacting section 14 was clear: it is wholly untenable that the speech made at an election rally is privileged when the same speech published by or on behalf of a candidate for the election is not.
_	Hanafi is of the opinion that intellectual extremism had crept into writers in their endeavor to get closer to power centres.
_	Petrie was of the opinion that it was an "old Anglo-Irish song" and argued that the Scottish versions were most likely developed from it.
_	However, the Minister for Law said the Government was of the opinion that as the right to vote is an implied right in the Constitution, it was unnecessary for the Constitution to be amended to expressly mention the right.
_	He was of the opinion that a storm of demons is followed by the spread of heresy (Protestantism).
_	Boal was of the opinion that only the oppressed are able to free the oppressed.
_	Several eminent players have, however, held to the opinion that it is quite trustworthy."
_	One scholar expressed the opinion that "Rydberg's views" concerning resemblances of Thor and Indra were carried to extremes, therefore receiving "less recognition than they deserved."
_	His friends have expressed the opinion that he was asexual, and Lawrence himself specifically denied, in multiple private letters, any personal experience of sex.
_	On the same day, KL Infra's board announced to Bursa Malaysia that it had formed the opinion that it was not solvent and would not be able to pay all its debts in full within a period not exceeding twelve months.
_	Karen Fricker of "Variety" expressed the opinion that the musical had "remarkably high production value" but was too long.
_	In response to an inquiry forwarded by Pepin the Short, Zachary rendered the opinion that it was better that he should be king who had the royal power than he who had not.
_	Skinner was of the opinion that "Castle Quest" was "the best arcade game" on the BBC Micro and would qualify as "the best game" were it not for the existence of "Elite".
_	Jazani had the opinion that prison is a piece of the activity outside and therefore must reflect the policies of the group.
_	A modern review of the album by James Chrispell for Allmusic stated the opinion that people either loved or hated the album.
_	Chrispell also gave the opinion that Grand Funk Railroad were the most popular live act of their time and said that the concerts were powerful.
_	His report said "I am also of the opinion that the cavalry force that was in Tazewell, under General Williams and Colonel May, was sufficient to have captured the enemy, if it had been properly managed."
_	Mathews expresses the opinion that Holdstock’s writing is an impressive mixture of poetic style and sensitivity.
_	Akbar with his kingdom oriented strategies sent many proposals to Mewar as Akbar was of the opinion that Mewar is the biggest hurdle in the path of expanding the domain of his kingdom.
_	This conclusion is however controversial, with professor of history at the University of Louisville Ann Taylor Allen giving the opinion that Weikart's talk about "Darwinism" is not based on any careful reading of Darwin himself but on vague ideas by a variety of people who presented themselves as "Darwinian."
_	It had published the opinion that someone ought to prevent her from performing such a dangerous act, and Ernst came to ask them how he could do just that.
_	Hammarström (2010) is of the opinion that the few lexical similarities with Murkim are likely to be loans, and that Lepki should probably be considered a language isolate; he did not have access to any Kembra data.
_	Margaret Thaler Singer expressed the opinion that any experts the public would be referred to by the "New CAN" would be cult apologists.
_	I am firmly of the opinion that the result of the recent action by the police will have the right effect upon the natives."
_	Of the actors in her production, the reviewer Peter Thomson was of the opinion that, "they meant what they said" and Goodbody had "coaxed the play into their hands and they respected it".
_	A dedicated career woman who once expressed the opinion that "marriage isn't much good for a career woman", nevertheless she married four times.
_	Several commentators writing in The Guardian and The British Medical Journal, have expressed the opinion that the new organisation is simply a re-branding of the Prince's "Foundation," describing it as "Hamlet without the Prince".
_	Zeno had defined distress as the opinion that one is in the presence of evil.
_	Atkyns shared in the opinion that papists should be sternly dealt with; yet, to judge from his writings and his later life, it is inconceivable that he could have shared in the passion of the time.
_	Although the company was registered by a Moscow-based company Global Wealth Management Center, Gudkov in his tweet expressed the opinion that the owner of the company is his namesake from Houston, the USA.
_	D. W. Winnicott was of the opinion that psychopathology was in large part generated by an overvaluation of the false self, at the expense of the true self which was linked to the individual's own creativity.
_	William Siborne was also of the opinion that however excellent, or even perfect, this plan of operation may appear in theory, still there were other circumstances, which, if taken into consideration, put the outcome in jeopardy for the French.
_	Frijns said he was delighted to finish in a points-scoring position but felt the event was "one of the more bizarre races of my career" and was of the opinion that luck was on his side.
_	Some Fijians who survived were of the opinion that this failure of quarantine was a deliberate action to introduce the disease into the country.
_	In private conversation, he would offer the opinion that the Beatles should go back across the Atlantic at a slow walk, but no amount of posturing could turn back the clock."
_	Many experts are of the opinion that the Power Balance bracelet is nothing more than a placebo.
_	He was a strong advocate of freedom of expression and expressed the opinion that the refusal of Hindi writer-editors to publish good, but controversial, literature, had directly lead to the flourishing of little magazines that would publish such works.
_	Many present at the time, as well as many historians since, have voiced the opinion that Jacka deserved a second Victoria Cross for the Pozières action.
_	Zada is of the opinion that we need the Sufis' moderate and flexible thinking to counter polemics and fanaticism in all its forms.
_	It slides smoothly into a startling falsetto that's used very daringly." 1982 saw the release of "Thriller", and "Rolling Stone" was of the opinion that Jackson was then singing in a "fully adult voice" that was "tinged by sadness".
_	Dr. Susheela P. Upadhyaya, a research scholar in Beary bashe and Beary folklore is of the opinion that the Indian west coast came under Islamic influence long before any other part of India was influenced by Islam or Muslims.
_	Abdul-Qadir Gilani an influential Islamic Sufi religious figure, teacher, preacher and writer however holds the opinion that the demand for torment referred in the 1st ayah of this surah was made by Prophet Muhammad himself for the disbelievers due to the increasing Persecution of Muslims by the Meccans.
_	Other Congressmen were of the opinion that the District could not be immediately returned without the consent of the residents and the legislatures of Maryland and Virginia.
_	Gill's politics are unclear: historian Anson Morse is of the opinion that his popularity was not sufficient to head the ticket of either the Federalists or the Democratic-Republicans.
_	The parlement judges were of the opinion that their role included active participation in the legislative process, which brought them into increasing conflict with the ever increasing monarchical absolutism of the "Ancien Régime", as the "lit de justice" evolved during the 16th century from a constitutional forum to a royal weapon, used to force registration of edicts.
_	However, she added that as she learned more about the case, she became doubtful it was as severe an example of voter intimidation as it first appeared to be, and was of the opinion that "the incident was not of sufficient importance to be the primary focus of our yearlong project."
_	Charles Hedley (1922) was of the opinion that this species is unknown to Australian conchologists ; apparently it resembles "Vexitomina metcalfei" .
_	In contrast to Greer, Louise Ferrier met with director Kidron to discuss the film at length, and expressed the opinion that Kidron was "certainly working to make it authentic."
_	A city does not automatically revert to town status if the population drops below 5,000; this only occurs if the city council requests it, the majority of electors vote to revert to town status, or the minister is of the opinion that the reversion to town status is in the public interest.
_	More precisely, he was of the opinion that if the US were to disarm unilaterally, "the Soviet leaders may well try to make [the US] a slave state.
_	One week later, Chris Elliott expressed the opinion that the newspaper should have rejected the language used in the advert and should have negotiated with the advertiser on this matter.
_	The UKPO have also expressed the opinion that the end result would normally be the same.
_	At an early point in the original 1947 version of "Miracle on 34th Street", a doctor expresses the opinion that Kris Kringle is of no harm to anyone despite his insistence that he is Santa Claus.
_	Readers sympathetic to the passage may be connecting it to the opinion that Beethoven's music is in some way "phallic" or "hegemonic," terms often used in modern feminist studies scholarship.
_	and if in addition the physician is of the opinion that the person is apparently suffering from mental disorder of a nature or quality that likely will result in,
_	The British staff were of the opinion that the German breakthrough consisted of small detachments of light reconnaissance troops, and therefore using these lightly armed and largely untrained troops against them did not seem unreasonable.
_	In order to understand the Prometheus myth in its most general context, the Late Roman author Censorinus states in his book titled "De die natali" that, "Pythagoras of Samos, Okellos of Lukania, Archytas of Tarentum, and in general all Pythagoreans were the authors and proponents of the opinion that the human race was eternal."
_	Contemporary chroniclers are of the opinion that since Purandar Singha had passed his childhood through economic hardships during his father’s exile in Bengal, he was very much attracted to money and wealth.
_	Sudeykin was an avid supporter of using agent provocateurs inside the revolutionary movements not only to catch the active members but also to instigate quarrels and disputes, spread false rumours, and transmit the opinion that all the leading revolutionaries were spies or provocateurs.
_	Some historians believe that slavery may have existed from the very first arrival of the Negro in 1619, but others are of the opinion that the institution did not develop until the 1660s and that the status of the Negro until then was that of an indentured servant.
_	Julius W. Adams, Principal Engineer of the Lexington and Danville Railroad offered the opinion that excessive speed and roughness of the tracks had caused the locomotive to derail on the first section of the bridge damaging the floorboards.
_	Jan-Dirk Müller is of the opinion that the poem in its written form is entirely new, although he admits the possibility that an orally transmitted epic with relatively consistent contents could have proceeded it.
_	On 16 November 1992, the Supreme Court, in its verdict, upheld the government order, being of the opinion that caste was an acceptable indicator of backwardness.
_	With reference to Bonaire's 2004 referendum, the organization is of the opinion that such an arrangement was never the choice of the people.
_	On 6 October his initial request for bail was refused by the Federal Department of Justice and Police; a spokesperson commented, "we continue to be of the opinion that there is a high risk of flight."
_	At the scene of the crime, Meldrick and Frank are confused by the fact that no one saw the shooter or even heard a gunshot, and a witness expresses the opinion that it must be "one of those black kids who go around shooting off guns."
_	In keeping with his ethnonationalist beliefs, McNallen endorsed a 1993 Declaration of War Against Exploiters of Lakota Spirituality, expressing the opinion that white people should resurrect the religions of their European ancestors rather than adopting the belief systems of Native Americans.
_	He is also of the opinion that "no available translation is reliable."
_	Former Canadian Ambassador to the United States Michael Kergin wrote that Canada is of the opinion that the Alaskan pipeline should be built without subsidies and without the route being determined by legislation.
_	Pascal Lamy, director general of the World Trade Organisation, expressed the opinion that all Post-Soviet states should pay market prices for their energy needs in order to improve the efficiency of their economies.
_	He had accepted that his periodic depressions would never be entirely cured, and had long held the opinion that suicide was a reasonable choice in some circumstances.
_	Former ANC leader Oliver Tambo’s daughter Tselane Tambo was of the opinion that Zuma deserved Murray’s portrayal of him.
_	George F. Taylor was of the opinion that a sacrifice would be made when certain areas of the temple became illuminated.
_	He defended the opinion that monogamy would hinder a Darwinistic reproduction-logic and procreation-selection, which would have a devastating effect on society in a cultural-biological way and therefore monogamy should be combated.
_	Halil Inalcik is of the opinion that among Inner Asian peoples there was no rule of succession, but notes that the first Ottoman sultans were all eldest sons and finds parallels between this tendency to make the eldest son the next king and the steppe customs of making the eldest son of the eldest line sovereign, giving the eldest son the largest share of the inheritance and the most important part of the realm, and ranking the tents in order of importance from the father's to the eldest son's and then to the eldest brother's sons; according to him, these customs were particularly common among the Kazakhs.
_	Agreeing with these findings, Brigadier Bastin on behalf of the General Officer Commanding in Chief concluded in the final report dated 14 February 1947 that ""I am of the opinion that the explosion was caused by some person or persons unknown.
_	Roger Ebert expressed the opinion that the film "in only 75 perfect minutes achieves the profundity of an epic", also mentioning that "not often have I been more deeply touched".
_	In the article, Ukrainian psychiatrist Semyon Gluzman expressed the opinion that Slyusarchuk skillfully took advantage of poor security; if he had chosen a lower-profile specialty, he might have succeeded.
_	If, under this finding of facts, and under the acts of Congress and acts of assembly offered in evidence, and the postal regulations in evidence, the court should be of the opinion that the plaintiffs, as widow and children of deceased, are entitled to recover, then judgment to be entered on the verdict in favor of the plaintiffs.
_	The clergy, on the other hand, had never reconciled itself to such oversight, and on the contrary was of the opinion that the Church had a right to oversee public policy.
_	Kiddush is not usually recited at the third meal on Shabbat, although Maimonides was of the opinion that wine should be drunk at this meal as well.
_	The letter expressed the opinion that the proposed reforms were "underpinned by an unbalanced promotion of partisan political views" in that they emphasised an Anglocentric "national triumphalism" and thus contravened the Education Acts of 1996 and 2002.
_	Mr. Blades is of the opinion that no connection between the schoolmaster and the abbey can be established.
_	In a 2007 "Beat the Blizzard" webzine's article, the writer Jan Lindsø states that "[m]any metal fans are of the opinion that Christians should 'not be allowed' to use the black metal aesthetics musically since they do not inherit this evil and perhaps misantropic "[sic]" trait that many people say is necessary in order to be convincing as black metal musicians".
_	Franklin C. Williams, Jr. is of the opinion that as Odin and Dubuis were both French Vincentians from the area of Lyons, that they probably sailed together.
_	Historians are of the opinion that 'Kaviyoor' means overflow land, because the Manimala river flooded every year and surpass to the vast punja (rice field).
_	Born into the Stroh Brewery family in Detroit, Rose Stroh Melchers was of the opinion that, “people who were educated and had a profession did not operate hotels."
_	That the opinion that a superior demon can cast out an inferior is erroneous and derogatory to Christ.
_	In his 2005 monograph, Brunette gives the opinion that "Happy Together" marked "a new stage in [Wong's] artistic development", and along with its successor – "In the Mood For Love" (2000) – showcases the director at "the zenith of his cinematic art."
_	Critics were mostly unified in the opinion that the game paid fan service to those who follow the series.
_	The British officials and doctors were of the opinion that Shivaji VI was suffering from an incurable ‘madness’.
_	Daugherty expressed the opinion that the 92nd was meant to keep German troops occupied in Italy, preventing them from being deployed to fight against the Soviet Army in eastern Europe, or against the Allied forces moving against the German frontier along the Rhine.
_	The popular founder of Reform Judaism, Abraham Geiger, was of the opinion that the Sadducee ("Tzadoki" in Mishnaic pronunciation) sect of Judaism drew their name from Zadok, with the leaders of the sect proposed as the sons of Zadok.
_	Both men shared the opinion that visual representations yielded more knowledge than did concepts.
_	One of Weiss' conclusions is the opinion that the Talmud was a continuous process from the time of the Amora'im until the time of the Geonim.
_	They are of the opinion that it is "not on a par" with Pearson's Church of St. Agnes elsewhere in Liverpool, and state that it is "simple, reasonable and serious, but devoid of Pearson's great enthusiasm".
_	Šilhavý (1997) offers the opinion that "... the extremum principles of [equilibrium] thermodynamics ... do not have any counterpart for [non-equilibrium] steady states (despite many claims in the literature)."
_	The Sheriff and the State of Florida appealed the District Court’s decision to the Fifth Circuit, resulting in the opinion that is the subject of this Article.
_	Inferred from the Cayambe pottery in use in the region, archaeologist examining the area are of the opinion that Cayambe culture has prevailed "as some peoples decided after many years of resistance and warfare to simply lay down their arms or become allies with the Inca."
_	Clement of Alexandria was of the opinion that Brimo was only a title of Demeter at Eleusis.
_	She was not impressed by Brian Armstrong, his fill-in, and was of the opinion that he hired unsuitable supporting actors.
_	Not all share the opinion that several Hung Kuen styles exist, because Hung Ga has its origin in the famous southern shaolin temple.
_	In October 2015, Siegfried Broß, a former judge of the German Federal Constitutional Court and the Patent Division of the Federal Court of Justice, expressed the opinion that the procedure followed by the President and the Administrative Council did not comply with the rule of law and had been conducted in a manner comparable to criminal proceedings, and that confidentiality requirements had not been adhered to.
_	These special agents are of the opinion that the referred-to individual was not Lee Harvey Oswald.
_	But she stated the opinion that because she lacked the medical expertise to evaluate the position of the camp's medical authorities she lacked jurisdiction to rule on the petition.
_	Phillip was of the opinion that only free settlers with the assistance of convicts will be able to create an environment in which a country could support its inhabitants.
_	Historians are of the opinion that the French created the town by amalgamating various smaller localities in the area.
_	The CBI is of the opinion that the acts of violence were well organized with support from the officials in the Delhi police and central government at the time, headed by Indira Gandhi's son, Rajiv Gandhi.
_	The official cause of death was stated as suicide, but neither Holst's family nor many of his colleagues from the resistance movement have accepted this and are of the opinion that he was liquidated.
_	NGOs are of the opinion that the Environmental impact assessment for the TPP Kostolac B3 is inadequate since it excludes the expansion of the Drmno open-cast mine, does not mention expected levels of emissions to air from heavy metals and does not consider alternative locations or alternative technologies.
_	Many modern writers on the case express the opinion that rural English society was infected with backward racialist attitudes, and that this would have been particularly true of a village like Great Wyrley.
_	Having initiated several reforms relating to the employees' conditions and competency investment, some at great financial cost, many maintain the opinion that he is the best director of the company they have experienced.
_	Finnish Communist Arvo Tuominen expressed the opinion that the war was not Kuusinen's idea.
_	Thus, Rohl is of the opinion that none of these three foundations of the conventional Egyptian chronology are secure, and that the sacking of Thebes by the Assyrian king Ashurbanipal in 664 BC is the earliest fixed date in Egyptian history.
_	However, as noted above, it may also be initiated by a liquidator was originally appointed pursuant to members voluntary winding-up where the liquidator has subsequently formed the opinion that the company is actually insolvent.
_	In January 2009, Käßmann expressed the opinion that it might be better to tear down former and unused churches than to allow them to be used for purposes that could damage their image.
_	Li Shizhen was likewise of the opinion that "P. japonicum" was, although medicinal, not toxic in itself, maintaining that the hallucinogenic properties of the drug were probably a result of its adulteration with material derived from "Aconitum" or "Euphorbia" species.
_	While some other philosophers have expressed the opinion that political liberalism is the peak or end-stage of historical development (see Francis Fukuyama's "End of History" thesis), Walford claims the opposite.
_	Wagner later gave the opinion that perhaps it would be better to cut the overture at opera performances to the Pilgrim's Chorus alone – "the remainder – in the fortunate event of its being understood – is, as a prelude to the drama, too much; in the opposite event, too little."
_	The Board is of the opinion that certain changes in design are required to enable PT-69 and boats of the PT-20 Class to carry safely their military loads in rough weather."
_	If the court is of the opinion that the probabilities of success are not in favour of either party, or are only in favour of the plaintiff, it is established practice to grant provisional sentence.
_	If the Tribunal is of the opinion that the bill does not have this effect, the President is deemed to have assented to the bill on the day after the day when the Tribunal's opinion is pronounced in open court.
_	Dungannon priest Father Denis Faul was of the opinion that the soldiers should have been charged with conspiracy.
_	Two experts have given the opinion that the mandible is "Australian" in physical type, and that the skullcap measurements are most nearly like the Ainus or Tasmanians.
_	Later, he held the opinion that there was no other meaningful mathematics whatsoever, regardless of interpretation.
_	In an early statement the German industry expressed the opinion that the current stimulation plan is insufficient to reach the defined goal of 1 million [electric vehicle|electric vehicles] in Germany by 2020.
_	However, given the comparison in size between the two vessels it would be fair to assume that Capt. Thomas would expect the "Fenella" to be able to assist the "Satanella" during the course of the action, by producing assistance by way of power, and that he was now of the opinion that it was not the intention of Capt.
_	W.W. Greg was of the opinion that the Ghost was a figment of Hamlet's overwrought imagination.
_	By 1858, the Commissioners of Education and others were of the opinion that the legacy was hindering the development of education in the schools contributed to.
_	According to Ministry of Personnel, Public Grievances and pensions, an anomaly (a deviation from the common rule, type, arrangement, or form; an incongruity or inconsistency)for the purposes of examining the 7CPC, includes the following two cases: "(a) where the Official Side and the Staff Side are of the opinion that any recommendation is in contravention of the principle or the policy enunciated by the Seventh Central Pay Commission itself without the Commission assigning any reason; and (b) where the maximum of the Level in the Pay Matrix corresponding to the applicable Grade Pay in the Pay Band under the pre-revised structure, as notified vide CCS (RP) Rules 2016, is less than the amount an employee is entitled to be fixed at, as per the formula for fixation of pay contained in the said Rules".
_	Other people may have the opinion that it is a corruption of "Mare Giallo" which refers to when the sea turned yellow due to floating tufa rock dust following a volcanic eruption many centuries ago.
_	Some reviews have expressed the opinion that more research is needed to determine what effect the phytoestrogens in soybeans may have on infants.
_	He expressed the opinion that "in these days Kent possesses so few genuine popular customs of this kind that we cannot afford to be indifferent to those still in existence.
_	Finally, the Court was of the opinion that rules of customary international law cannot be incorporated into the meaning of the word "law" in Article 9(1) as this is not in accordance with the normal hierarchy of Singapore law, which envisages that customary international law may only be adopted into the common law if it is not inconsistent with existing domestic laws.
_	There is the opinion that these kinds of things give a glimpse on the varied and complicated influences that went into forming the world of yōkai.
_	Indeed, the older brethren seem to have been of the opinion that M'Crie's eloquence and speech was carried to such an undue length that it was in danger of glorifying himself more than the Word of God.
_	On the other hand, William Tell refused the invitation to come to the Rütli as he was of the opinion that the strong shall act on his own and was skeptical about any common actions.
_	The resolution offered the opinion that free citizens of Morocco were not subject to laws governing blacks and slaves.
_	Later that month, ecclesiastical lawyer Walter Phillimore gave the opinion that Mirehouse had committed no offence known to the canon law of the Church of England and could not be disciplined.
_	The DfT were of the opinion that this refers to recovering a vehicle after an accident or breakdown, but the regulation does not explicitly state this.
_	In later talks, Allen expressed the opinion that while many women were in fact voting and speaking out on issues, there was a generational shift taking place.
_	Pierson held the opinion that Christians could disagree on the mode of baptism and whether it should be administered to infants or believers only.
_	This is a form of propaganda in which green strategies are used to promote the opinion that an organization's aims are environmentally friendly.
_	Akunis is also of the opinion that one of the ways to reduce prices is to abolish monopolies and duopolies, breaking up centralizations and encouraging competition in the Israeli market, also by reducing custom fees on imported products.
_	Conversely, some judges in other jurisdictions have held the opinion that the mandatory early disclosure of alibis is unfair, possibly even unconstitutional.
_	Attorney General Anand Ramlogan responded by saying that the government had consulted with legal experts who expressed the opinion that Carmona met this requirement.
_	There have been numerous protests and direct actions since 2004 voicing the opinion that EDO MBM should close or convert its factory to civilian use.
_	Tauler had the opinion that demons were lascivious and thus they wanted to have sexual intercourse with humans to satisfy their lewdness.
_	Orthodox Marxists held the opinion that capitalism’s collapse was imminent, which would result in a revolutionary conjuncture.
_	Maxwell then hears the opinion that "Infinity is God.
_	She is very strong and fast, but also a little clueless, failing to get a few analogies and is of the opinion that “being a human must suck”.
_	Van Alphen was of the opinion that children should be able to learn playfully.
_	For example, the Data Protection Commissioner shall investigate any complaint made to him about the contravention of the Data Protection Acts, unless he is of the opinion that it is frivolous or vexatious and the head of a government department may refuse access to records under the Freedom of Information Act if the request is frivolous or vexatious.
_	In relation to the latter, an Austrian family was of the opinion that it alone had the right to fish in broad portions of the bay.
_	Orion's work was published as "Never Again the Burning Times: Paganism Revisited" by Waveland Press in 1995, although would be heavily criticized in published reviews written by both Luhrmann and T.O. Beidelman, both of whom were of the opinion that Orion's Pagan beliefs had clouded her critical interpretation.
_	One of some reasons that lead to the opinion that this statue is the symbol of the Adi Buddha (or Vairochana as one of some personifications of Adi Buddha) is the interpretation of its imperfect form.
_	In November 1980, "CBS-TV" reported that medical evidence had been reexamined, and that Hill's defense lawyer, Richard Haynes was of the opinion that Joan Robinson Hill may have died as a result of toxic shock syndrome, a condition associated with the use of tampons.
_	He is of the opinion that the Fukushima 50 are victims of unsafe working conditions, not heroes, as they are depicted in the media.
_	Then he applied to R. Papa who forbade him, and so did R. Huna, who both were in the opinion that the Halachic ruling applies to this case as well, since they were concerned that the old synagogue will be pulled down without any new synagogue being built in its place.
_	Even though Gul Khan had joined Mir Ghaus Bakhsh's party, he was of the opinion that the Baloch should not be pushed into another term of turmoil by pitting them against the Martial Law Regime but rather they should be educated, trained and made ready for the future conditions that might change the situation and geography of the subcontinent.
_	Clay was of the opinion that the German economy was vital for European recovery, and had tried to use loopholes in the occupation directive JCS 1067 to pursue a less harsh deindustrialization policy in the US occupation zone than others in the US desired.
_	Sergei Bulgakov, however, was of the opinion that the "Filioque" did not represent an insurmountable obstacle to reunion of the Eastern Orthodox and Roman Catholic churches.
_	Both of them also shared the opinion that the balance in this coalition may, with the largest, centre oriented, party (CDA) being smaller than the combined two leftwing parties (SP-PvdA), complicate the formation of such a cabinet On December 8 the informateur announced a brief postponement in the negotiations as a result of an apparent stalemate.
_	Vladimir Lenin expressed the opinion that what one could call the "old party guard", a "thinnest layer", had a "huge, unshared prestige".
_	Prior to 1678 most Scottish witches tried under a Privy Council commission were convicted and executed; Pitcairn shared the opinion that Gowdie and Breadhead were executed and most modern day academics, like historian Brian P. Levack, agree it would be the likely outcome.
_	In 2000, Kos and Gogala expressed the opinion that it was likely that the "Maua" as it was then constructed was interlineated with the genus "Purana" as the criteria used by Distant in separating them were not reflective of "the phylogenetic relations of the species included."
_	Bradley is of the opinion that:
_	Some years later, Kissinger expressed the opinion that the Cyprus issue was resolved in 1974, a position very similar to that held by Turkish prime minister Bulent Ecevit, who had ordered the invasion.
_	Aland was of the opinion that every work within historical research stands on its adherence to reliability and accessibility.
_	Ash also formed the opinion that McCarthy was truly convinced in the validity of his invention but that this conviction was a case of "prolonged self-deception."
_	The president of the Dingo Conservation Association Barry Oakman was in an interview in the year 2003 of the opinion that without appropriate measures the “pure” dingo would be extinct in the wild in 30 years, in New South Wales possibly in less than 10 years.
_	Still, the House of Lords has remained reluctant to overrule itself in some cases; in "R v Kansal" (2002), the majority of House members adopted the opinion that "R v Lambert" had been wrongly decided and agreed to depart from their earlier decision.
_	As these 1944 decisions prevail, a number of legal scholars have expressed the opinion that the original Korematsu and Hirabayashi decisions have taken on renewed relevance in the context of the War on Terror.
_	However, a majority of the Justices were of the opinion that the individual mandate did not fall under these powers.
_	Widerøe, de Havilland Canada and the initial investigation commission were of an opinion that this was irrelevant for the accident, while Transport Canada and the Swedish National Defence Research Institute were of the opinion that this caused a weakening in the structure.
_	The great majority of them, including her husband Francis Stephen of Lorraine, were of the opinion that the old alliance with the sea powers, England and Holland, should be maintained.
_	The Monarchist Party of Russia supports Prince Nikolai as the heir of the Russian throne, since they are of the opinion that Maria Vladimirovna Romanova and Nicholas Romanov are not dynasts.
_	On February 28, 1947, about a month before he signed EO 9835, Truman wrote to Pennsylvania Governor George Earle, "People are very much wrought up about the Communist 'bugaboo' but I am of the opinion that the country is perfectly safe so far as Communism is concerned–we have too many sane people."
_	The Cape Colony Government was also of the opinion that small, highly mobile, mounted commandos, recruited from local people (such as the white farmers, Mfengu and Khoi who lived in the border regions) were best suited to the more irregular warfare in the mountainous frontier.
_	He expressed the opinion that Wan Ahmad would not be able to continue the struggle at Kuantan, and that he could expect no further help from Terengganu.
_	The governor’s office was flooded with letters from an outraged Kurmi-kshatriya public and was soon obliged to rescind the allegation in an 1896 communique to the police department "His Honor [the governor] is ... of the opinion that Kurmis constitute a respectable community which he would be reluctant to exclude from Government service."
_	The Allmusic review of the album by Bruce Eder has the opinion that the production on the album was well done, but that the original performances were still better.
_	In view of police methods of the time and Hannan's book expressing the opinion that the law sometimes must be ignored by detectives, it is not not unlikely it had not been obtained as Hannam suggested.
_	The General was of the opinion that the negotiations could not be called off until it was clear whether or not allied help was actually coming.
_	In the early years, a majority within the Society held the opinion that ASMP should be a labor union and bargain collectively for wages and working conditions.
_	While most parties agreed with the House of Lords' motive in making the decision, there were many who were of the opinion that the decision involved "post facto" criminalization, since the House of Lords were imprisoning spouses for doing what was once, according to the law, their right.
_	By 1944, full-length articles on Fitzgerald's works were being published, and the following year, "the opinion that "Gatsby" was merely a period piece had almost entirely disappeared."
_	The court was of the opinion that if not for national security interests, the application to protect a procedural legitimate expectation through judicial review would have been granted.
_	Foster was therefore of the opinion that this door should be closed if possible in order that the body of Robert Kelly could be brought up.
_	Some were of the opinion that if a plot adjoining the church ground on the western side was purchased there would be enough space to construct a new Church.
_	But is it true that the Mu'tazila are of the opinion that everything can be known through reason and therefore that revelation is unnecessary?
_	Duncan Cooper of the Fader concludes that "In any case, the album's origins and officialness (sic) seem like something of a technicality" adding the opinion that "Jai Paul seems to be getting paid for it." despite the record company's claims otherwise.
_	The "Evening Bulletin" wrote on April 2 that "Scarcely one man in ten thousand can be found who does not agree with us in the opinion that the evidence for the defence was sufficient to create a doubt of the unhappy man's guilt", while four days later, the "Massachusetts Ploughman" claimed that "We have scarcely met a man of intelligence, since the evidence has all come out, who did not profess to believe in Webster's guilt."
_	Pittard was also of the opinion that the descriptive methods in vogue during his times were ineffective in the study of humans.
_	Bulgarian historian Ivan Bozhilov is of the opinion that John was not seeking political refuge in Serbia.
_	Raknes was of the opinion that what Reich had discovered was what others before him had described, but then using other names, such as animal magnetism, chi, and prana.
_	On CNN, Cantor expressed the opinion that society should make it easier for persons who are sexually attracted to children but have never committed any sexual offenses to receive support and assistance in staying offense free.
_	Though no formal dissent can be found, it is noted at the end of the opinion that Justice Reed would affirm the judgement of the Seventh Circuit on the grounds that no such summary was requested (by the petitioner) and, because of that, it was not necessary to furnish more to the registrant than was given by the hearing officer.
_	It helps stir an already-ensuing media blitz aimed at all young super-heroes turning public sway towards the opinion that all teenage heroes are too reckless and more of an endangerment to society than a protection.
_	In the early 1930s, the museum's curator of paintings, Philip Henry, described the painting as an original van der Weyden, but gave the opinion that its poor condition was hindering wider acceptance of the attribution.
_	Therefore, the Court was of the opinion that when Singapore gained independence on 9 August 1965, it acquired the attributes of sovereignty, and Parliament was bestowed with full plenary powers to enact legislation.
_	General Alexander, although expressing the opinion that it would be regrettable to destroy the Benedictine Order monastery-built around AD 529—supported Freyberg's insistence that reducing the monastery be considered a military necessity.
_	According to the reports on hearing before the Subcommittee on Human Rights and International Organizations of the Committee on Foreign Affairs and the Commission on Security and Cooperation in Europe on 20 September 1983, the national associations justly held the opinion that 10 years of mild public protests, quiet diplomacy, and private conversations with Soviet official psychiatrists had produced no significant change in the level of Soviet abuses, and that this approach had, thereby, failed.
_	Enrique Flórez has pointed out the impossibility of one city supplying such vast quantities of minted silver as has been recorded by ancient writers under the terms "argentum Oscense", "signatum Oscense"; and is of the opinion that "Oscense" meant "Spanish", being a corruption of "Eus-cara".
_	He was of the opinion that China was on the right course of balancing heavy industry on one hand, and light industry and agriculture on the other.
_	Some experts have expressed the opinion that the Croydon Cat Killer may be an example of a moral panic.
_	Some biographers hold the opinion that many of the American Founding Fathers (and especially Washington) believed that, as leaders of the nation, they should remain silent on questions of doctrine and denomination, to avoid creating unnecessary divisiveness within the nation; instead they should promote the virtues taught by religion in general.
_	Paik used the term "super highway" in application to telecommunications, which gave rise to the opinion that he may have been the author of the term "information superhighway".
_	Hauser's critics are of the opinion that he inflicted the wound on himself with a razor, which he then took back to his room before going to the cellar.
_	"Complex Magazine" had the opinion that the song was the first single pre-released from her album that was not "distressing", as "Call It What You Want" is "actually good," and also dropped the "revenge narrative to great effect."
_	Sergey Lavrov, the Russian Minister of Foreign Affairs, suggested that the United States "fears honest competition"; while Vladimir Putin was of the opinion that the United States had used its influence within the IOC to "orchestrate the doping scandal".
_	This alone seems sufficient to support the opinion that beryl corresponds to the Heb. "yhlm".
_	Gunnar Axén of the Moderate Party expressed the opinion that her decision to play the Ebba Grön song "Beväpna er" ("Arm yourselves") was inappropriate and claimed to have thrown out his television so he could stop paying the license fee.
_	AllMusic reviewer William Ruhlmann gave the opinion that "Hearts and Flowers" is "an incremental development in the artist's work [that] doesn't contain any songs that rank among her best".
_	But not long after the fire took place press reports voiced the opinion that ETA was the real culprit, but that its role was being silenced; other sources described the event as an intentional attack.
_	These researchers shared the opinion that the most effective solution to address the health care needs of people living in poverty and those who are homeless is to provide universal healthcare because that would eliminate hospitals incentives to turn patients away based on their ability to pay for services.
_	The advocates of this object relations paradigm all, in exception of Melanie Klein, held the opinion that most differences in individual development that are of importance for mental health could be traced to differences in the way children were treated by their parents or to the loss or separation of parent-figures.
_	Montcalm was of the opinion that "colonial methods had had their day, and now war was established 'on a European footing, with planned campaigns, armies, artillery, sieges, battles…'"
_	Conversely, Vaudreuil was of the opinion that the war should be waged as based on established "colonial methods."
_	He had been of the opinion that Lumumba, though not to resume power, was to be released from prison.
_	Stevenson was of the opinion that had he been allowed to, he "could have successfully prosecuted Adams on six murder counts".
_	One syndicated article on Gillette reported:"Western football critics are of the opinion that if Eddie Gillette, the Badgers' star quarterback keeps up his brilliant work he will surely be the selection for the position on the mythical All-American eleven.
_	Some lawyers are of the opinion that prenups don't have legal sanctity in India.
_	This was of the opinion that the three performance Saker - Bible translation, printing and the foundation of Victoria - had been largely due to Merrick and Fuller.
_	Hitler later stated in hindsight that Greece would have been defeated with or without German intervention, and that even at the time he was of the opinion that the Italians alone would have conquered Greece in the forthcoming season.
_	"Versata Software, Inc. v. SAP America, Inc." and "Bally Technologies, Inc v. Business Intelligence Systems Solutions, Inc." adopted the opinion that "inactive" program could still infringe apparatus claims.
_	Suniti Kumar Chatterji, however, is of the opinion that Shah Jalal brought the script with him when he arrived in the area in the thirteenth or fourteenth century.
_	In Switzerland, Bishop de Barral conferred with a number of his fellow exiles from the episcopal college, who came to the opinion that one might swear the Constitutional oath.
_	Historians such as Philip Shaff have the opinion that "Irenaeus described a form of Basilidianism which was not the original, but a later corruption of the system.
_	Kuhn expressed the opinion that his critics' readings of his book were so inconsistent with his own understanding of it that he was "...tempted to posit the existence of two Thomas Kuhns," one the author of his book, the other the individual who had been criticized in the symposium by "Professors Popper, Feyerabend, Lakatos, Toulmin and Watkins."
_	She brings up several other points that are mentioned frequently in this discussion, including the opinion that white artists heavily draw inspiration from black artists without paying the proper dues and respect.
_	He was of the opinion that nothing other than "subsequent discussions, statements or actions, which can fairly be said to imply a positive intention to depart from that apportionment, will do to justify a change in the way in which the beneficial interest is owned."
_	The vice-president, Thummel, was of the opinion that women's clubs and organizations would be spending their time very profitably if they would study law.
_	AfriForum is of the opinion that farm murders should be declared a priority crime, and has raised widespread local awareness and increasing international awareness of the problem by means of several campaigns, including the ‘Stop the Murders’ campaign.
_	In January 1945, "Democrația", a liberal democratic daily, published Ion Biberi's interview with Popa, where the latter voices the opinion that a truly democratic regime "cannot be tolerant of any form of extremism".
_	Pevsner was of the opinion that it was he "it seems, who was responsible for the firm's masterpieces".
_	Some historians are of the opinion that the selection of Purandar Singha over Chandrakanta Singha as a tributary ruler of Upper Assam was part of British political game.
_	The authors of the "Buildings of England" series express the opinion that it is "one of the most satisfactory Perpendicular churches of Cheshire and its setting brings its qualities out to perfection".
_	"Nəgusä Nägäst" Haile Selassie was of the opinion that the Italians were behind "Ras" Gugsa's rebellion.
_	The whole place is so judiciously laid out, that we hazard the opinion that it has been done by someone who has become eminent in his profession.
_	In 1964 Archbishop Heenan addressed the CCJ and expressed the opinion that the original withdrawal from the Council was due to a misunderstanding in Rome.
_	Typical was the Argentine Alumni Athletic Club, which refused an assigned by the referee penalty to take, because the players were of the opinion that it was wrongly attributed to them.
_	Shomaly gave the opinion that the political leadership of the Palestinians could do more to discourage the use of children by paramilitaries by requesting that the leadership of the paramilitaries sign a memorandum forbidding the training and recruitment of children.
_	Murphy later voiced the opinion that Daly had been a bad choice, given his implication in the Ballyseedy Massacre and other events of March 1923, in which up to 30 anti-Treaty prisoners were killed in the county.
_	In an article in "The Guardian", Jason Webster is also of the opinion that the Sufi Way, as it is known, is a natural antidote to fanaticism.
_	He stated his choice was heavily weighted on the fact that, while covering the 2008 Summer Olympics in Beijing, he saw more writers for websites covering the Games and a smaller presence of newspapers, giving him the opinion that writing for a website was "what the future holds."
_	He is of the opinion that the letters have a prophetic purpose disclosing the seven phases of the spiritual history of the Church.
_	While Serbia holds the opinion that the thalweg of the Danube valley and the centerline of the river represents the international border between the two countries, Croatia disagrees and claims that the international border lies along the boundaries of the cadastral municipalities located along the river—departing from the course at several points along a section.
_	Some people are of the opinion that there was a mulberry tree near holy spot of Kheer Bhawani which, in local language, is called "tul mul".
_	The author of "The Cracks of the Day" offered the opinion that Plenipotentiary was, to his "humble thinking", the best racehorse England ever possessed.
_	However, the Ayr officials were of the opinion that United had made an illegal, unofficial approach to sign Kerr, and an enquiry into the transfer was set up by the International Football Association Board (IFAB).
_	The commission expressed the opinion that the pre-trial investigation had not been properly conducted and that the members felt that no death sentence should be executed where such a doubt existed.
_	New Orleans District Attorney (and later judge) Jim Garrison, who in 1967 brought Clay Shaw to trial for the assassination of President Kennedy also held the opinion that Oswald was most likely a CIA agent drawn into the plot to be used as a scapegoat, even going as far as to say that Oswald "genuinely was probably a hero".
_	The Theatres Act 1843 restricted the powers of the Lord Chamberlain, so that he could only prohibit the performance of plays where he was of the opinion that "it is fitting for the preservation of good manners, decorum or of the public peace so to do".
_	Numerous scholars are of the opinion that varying levels (either higher or lower) of the sex hormones in the animal, in addition to the size of the animal's gonads, play a direct role in the sexual behavior and preference exhibited by that animal.
_	In "The Search for the Perfect Golf Swing", researchers Cochran and Stobbs held the opinion that a left-handed person playing right-handed would be prone to hook the ball.
_	On 30 April 1877 the Comptroller General wrote to the Colonial architect "having conferred with the inspector of Police I am of the opinion that the Gaol should be designed as one of the class now building at Young.
_	Gregory expressed the opinion that codices 47, 56, 58 are in the same hand, and one of them copied from 54.
_	The journal editors expressed the opinion that "her killing is a crime against humanity."
_	Yossi gives the opinion that since the investigated families had prior to the investigation consumed only offerings from outside the Holy Land, from the point of investigative results and onward they were permitted to eat from offerings of the Land of Israel (Ketubot 24b).
_	They were of the opinion that BAM’s construction licence application was lacking in several respects: it clashes with the objectives of the Antwerps structuurplan (urban planning project), the design contains a number of unsafe areas, a number of road safety and traffic efficiency negatives.
_	More generally, the court is of the opinion that allowing patents on higher life forms would involve “a radical departure from the traditional patent regime” and it is for to Parliament to determine whether higher life forms are patentable.
_	Luther Emmett Holt, in his 1913 presidential address to the AASPIM members, opposed the opinion that lowering infant mortality might help genetically unfit individuals to survive and thereby affect the nation's strength.
_	Thury was of the opinion that reducing Boniface to obedience to the Avignon pope was a better way, but, that if Boniface could be persuaded to resign, the plan of the Court was acceptable.
_	We are thus of the opinion that the exercise of the power by the Governor was not in accordance with well-settled principles for sanctioning prosecution.
_	Trino Cruz has given the opinion that "Gibraltarian literature is a literature "nonata"" (not yet born), attributing that status to political forces blocking the "creative instincts".
_	Because the order was manifestly a harassment to the Satsuma han, some samurai of the han were of the opinion that they should fight against the Shogunate, but they were overruled.
_	Since the 1950s, when Jacques Lacan and Foucault argued that each epoch has its own knowledge system, within which individuals are inexorably entangled, many post-structuralists have used "historicism" to describe the opinion that all questions must be settled within the cultural and social context in which they are raised.
_	Carlisle was of the opinion that the administration had done this intentionally, since they might not otherwise have gone at all.
_	O'Higgins in particular voiced the opinion that the use of martial law was the only way to bring the war to an end.
_	Historian Ambeth Ocampo gives the opinion that arguing for Bonifacio as the "better" hero on the grounds that he, not Rizal, began the Philippine Revolution, is moot since Rizal inspired Bonifacio, the Katipunan, and the Revolution.
_	Teodoro Agoncillo gives the opinion that Bonifacio should not replace Rizal as national hero, but they should be honored "side by side".
_	He further expressed the opinion that he did not find it necessary to reiterate this in a new declaration and give undue publicity to something which happened so long ago.
_	Berrangé joined the South African Communist Party of his own volition in about 1938, holding the opinion that it was an organisation which expressed in practice those economic and social
_	In situations where "reasonable minds could not differ" in the opinion that substantial similarity of expression does not exist, a court may make summary judgment for the defendant, closing a case without finding infringement.
_	White was of the opinion that the deal was not sufficiently advantageous and nothing was implemented.
_	Dove fell under scrutiny from the general public as they felt the Dove advertisements described the opinion that cellulite was still unsightly, and that women's ageing process was something to be ashamed of.
_	Swedish and Norwegian authorities officially concluded that Holst committed suicide, but his family and many of his friends and colleagues were of the opinion that Holst was murdered.
_	Arpad Elo was of the opinion that it was futile to attempt to use ratings to compare players from different eras; in his view, they could only possibly measure the strength of a player as compared to his or her contemporaries.
_	Many high-profile attorneys as well as legal scholars were of the opinion that Lippestad had breached the attorney-client privilege as well being disloyal to his client.
_	A number of biographers were of the opinion that Knobelsdorff used his property in the "Tiergarten" only to spend the idyllic summer months there together with his family each year.
_	Some observers held the opinion that Article 51 of the UN Charter set limitations on the use of force in exercising the legitimate right of self-defense in the absence of an act of aggression, and affirmed that there was no such act by Libya.
_	He was of the opinion that the frog, which ate insects and acted as a pest control, should not be eaten in the interest of preserving ecological balance and avoiding the use of chemical pesticides such as DDT.
_	Habash expressed the opinion that what proceeded was not "only military but also psychological warfare" and one had to "hold the Israelis under permanent pressure".
_	Some scholars are of the opinion that the fort was erected by the Fourth Sultan Ibrahim Kutabshah.
